Chapter 1: Wedding of the Season.
30 August 2003.
It was a Saturday, balmy and unseasonably warm. It was as though the weather knew that all
around wizarding England today, weddings were taking place, and it decided to cooperate
with clear skies and perfect humidity.
At the Malfoy estate, the gardens had never looked better. The musky scent of roses was
heavy in the air, each bush perfectly pruned to display the blossoms at their peak. The lawn
was a precise five centimeters high with not a single weed in sight. It looked like velvet, and
three hundred white chairs were lined up in rigid rows, their spacing confirmed with a ruler.
Narcissa Malfoy presided over it all with a critical eye. Only a slight tightness around her
mouth portrayed her stress in arranging an event of this importance and magnitude. Next to
her stood Beatrice Greengrass who was not nearly as serene.
Beatrice had always coped with stress by talking too much.
Draco stared down at his mother and future mother-in-law from the window seat in his
bedroom, his occlumency walls rising as he watched them dispassionately.
In tomorrow’s papers the media would crown one of the events taking place tonight as the
Wedding of the Season, and Narcissa and Beatrice were determined to win it. They had stiff
competition, however: a double wedding that included the entire Golden Trio and Ginny
Weasley was taking place elsewhere at approximately the same time as the MalfoyGreengrass nuptials. Between the two, everybody who was anybody would be in attendance
at one of them. Most of the other weddings that had occurred today had taken place that
morning. The Malfoys had been invited to several others, though they declined due to
Draco’s own marriage that evening. Narcissa believed that Draco’s wedding should be the
only one scheduled for this coveted time slot on the thirtieth of August, and for the most part
the rest of society fell in line when she made her wishes clear.
The Potter-Weasley-Granger double wedding, however, had not gotten the message.
Narcissa, naturally, viewed it as a challenge, and for the last six months all she talked about
was the color of the napkins and the species of birds that would be released upon the binding
and whether candlelight white or ivory was a more appropriate color for Astoria’s dress.
Draco had been fighting a low-grade migraine for months.
He cast a bored eye over the chairs that were slowly starting to fill with guests, and he
wondered who they were. The list of people Draco truly cared about was very short: Theo,
Blaise, and Pansy topped the list. Then came his mother and his father distantly from there.
If Draco was honest with himself, that was his entire list. Not for the first time he had the
uncomfortable thought that Astoria did not rank, and he automatically raised his occlumency
walls to stop thinking about it before it could really take hold.
The occlumency blocked it, as it always did, and Draco felt that comfortable numbness settle
over him. Occlumency was his blessing and his curse. He had become so adept at it during
the war that he used it instinctively. It was the only way he held it together when watching
people get murdered. It was the only way he could cast unforgivable curses himself. It was
how he survived his admittedly short stint in Azkaban while waiting for his trial after the
war. It was the tool that enabled him to finish Hogwarts and then re-enter society with
whispers of his past misdeeds haunting him like ghosts. He relied on occlumency like
breathing, but it made him cold and distant. He had spent years watching his own life pass
by as though it was somebody else’s, and he was simply peering through a window as an
outside observer.
His parents credited the maturity that comes with age for the self-control Draco had
developed during the war. It was only his three closest friends who knew the truth: that
occlumency was destroying Draco as much as it saved him. He turned to it like a drug to
cope with his life and its pressures, the most recent of which was the marriage that would be
taking place shortly.
Marrying Astoria Greengrass came as no surprise to Draco. They had been promised to each
other as children in a nonbinding bethrothal, and Draco always knew he would marry her
someday. He had dragged his feet with a formal proposal and engagement that would allow
them to set a date because he really wasn’t that fussed. She was pretty enough, but she was
placid. She was well-bred. She was soft-spoken. She knew precisely which utensil to use
when faced with a meal that was upwards of seven courses, and Draco had not seen her
engage in any socially challenging conversations since she was fourteen years old. She knew
how to keep relationships inoffensive and shallow.
In other words, she was utterly perfect and therefore entirely uninteresting.
Draco briefly considered other witches when he was fourteen and fifteen years old —
namely, Pansy Parkinson. Pansy, however, was more like a sister and not a lover, and after a
few fumbling kisses they accepted the inevitable. Then he was sixteen and plotting to murder
Dumbledore. Then at seventeen he watched people be murdered in his home on a regular
basis. At eighteen he was back at Hogwarts, fresh from a stint in Azkaban where he
discovered that many of his classmates were thoroughly traumatized and wary of him. There
were only a few witches who appeared interested, but they still held him at arm’s length after
some basic experimentation. He didn’t get very far with them and found little emotional
connection in any event. After all, who could really connect with the youngest marked Death
Eater immediately after the war?
By nineteen he was back at the Manor and starting to accept his fate with his betrothed while
Astoria was finishing Hogwarts too. He hoped a year apart would improve her, but once she
was out Draco took one look at her and still found her so dull there was nothing he could do
but occlude.
With both of their educations complete, there was every expectation that Draco would get
down on one knee, but he didn’t. His occlumency walls were working overtime as his father
was released from prison after a shockingly short sentence and began to ingratiate himself
with society yet again. Draco’s twentieth year passed behind a shroud of occlumency and
then his twenty-first. His parents and the Greengrasses started making not-so-subtle noises
about getting on with it.
Draco occluded and continued to ignore them.
It wasn’t until the previous summer that the matter became urgent. With the wizarding
population in England and Scotland dangerously depleted from the war and fewer marriages
and births than the Ministry was hoping for during the years immediately following, they
instituted the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan the previous summer. It was known as the
MLPP for short.
The MLPP was wide-sweeping. The Ministry immediately outlawed all contraceptives.
Then they announced that the first of September, 2003 would be the date of the first annual
Matching Ceremony. The Ministry declared the first of September to be a traditional day of
change and growth in the wizarding community. It was the ideal day to begin a new
tradition.
Privately, Draco thought they picked it because it happened to fall on a Monday this year.
At the Matching Ceremony all unmarried witches and wizards between the ages of twenty
and forty would be randomly matched and married, with the only avenue for divorce being
the production of three live children. The couple would have three months to consummate
their marriage bond after the ceremony took place, with monthly couplings required from
there. Failure to consent to the marriage would result in an extended stay in Azkaban until
the unwilling party agreed to it. Failure to consummate or couple on schedule would send
both husband and wife to Azkaban together until they agreed to correct the problem. And
use of any contraceptives on the prohibited list by that age group would also result in a visit
to Azkaban, and both witches and wizards were subject to random testing of their bodies and
wands.
Unsurprisingly, the MLPP had received quite a bit of pushback from the affected group of
witches and wizards, but it passed anyway thanks to the outsized weight of the older
generations who still controlled the Wizengamot. Most of them had not fought during the
war so they were – in Draco’s view – rather unfortunately still alive. That meant Minister
Shacklebolt had only to say the magic word to get them to agree to his plan to repopulate
wizarding Britain.
Grandchildren.
That one word had been a rallying cry, and it had greased the wheels for a swift approval. It
was unsurprising to Draco that most of the witches and wizards his age had no immediate
interest in children; after all, their own childhoods had been torn to shreds. But the grayhaired members of the Wizengamot had been dreaming of a do-over, and the moment
Shacklebolt pointed out that babies naturally meant grandbabies, he received overwhelming
support for his mad plan.
And not only that, he presented it as sensible. The first Matching Ceremony would not take
place for a full year and a bit, and purportedly this gave the younger witches and wizards
plenty of time to arrange matters themselves. Those who were married with a consummated
bond before the deadline were exempt from the monthly couplings. Contraceptives would
still be illegal and the requirement for children before a divorce was still applicable, but the
Ministry would not force sexual proximity on those who voluntarily consummated a marriage
bond before the deadline. The powers that be assumed that any couple who did it of their
own accord would be attracted to each other well enough that nature could just take its
course. To Draco’s great surprise, the last year had proven that theory to be largely true, and
couples who married early after the MLPP was passed were now starting to spread their own
happy news.
Draco could only assume that most couples who were doing this on their own didn’t occlude
every time their spouse entered a room.
The enactment of the MLPP had penetrated Draco’s occlumency shields just long enough to
make him formally propose to Astoria and set a date for the wedding. So here he was, on the
last Saturday before the deadline, finally making good on the betrothal his parents had
arranged more than two decades prior. Draco found some dark amusement in the fact that the
Golden Trio had also procrastinated with their own nuptials just as much as Draco did.
Draco was pulled away from his ruminations about his dreadful bride by his door opening,
and his three best friends converging upon him. They never knocked. There was no need.
“Well?” said Theo, as he strode toward a small spread of food and drink the elves had
preemptively laid out for them. “You’re going through with this then?”
“It’s not like I have much choice,” pointed out Draco, as Theo rummaged through the
selection of food and made a small plate for himself and Pansy, who sank down onto a nearby
couch with a groan.
“Just as long as there will be no… gods, I can’t even say the word without wanting to
vomit...” she moaned.
Draco cast a questioning glance at Theo, who mouthed, “shrimp,” and Draco felt a ghost of a
smile cross his face at this. Pansy was newly pregnant, and Draco found himself a bit
fascinated by the whole thing. He didn’t know much about pregnancy and childbirth himself,
having always been told that his only job was to perform on command. But Pansy was like a
sister to him, and he had observed any number of odd things that seemed to be wrong with
her in these early weeks. Draco had spent the last month watching her eat strange foods and
avoid things she had always loved. Her nausea had been debilitating at times and not limited
to the mornings. She even developed an aversion to Draco’s cologne and told him if he
continued to wear it she wouldn’t be able to come within twenty feet of him. And she
persistently fell asleep on the settee in Draco’s room or Nott Manor at half past seven in the
evening. She hadn’t made it to eight o’clock in weeks.
“I’ll tell the elves to get rid of it,” said Draco courteously.
“Good. Hopefully Narcissa won’t kill me, but I just can’t abide…” she cut herself off with a
yawn. “You know what, I need a nap more than I need snacks. Wake me up at the last
possible moment please,” she finished as her eyes fluttered shut.
All three wizards smiled at her fondly, and Theo tucked a throw around her as Pansy started
to drift off.
“She’s not going to make it to the end tonight,” he whispered. “She’s been exhausted. I’ve
never seen anything like it.”
“It’s strange isn’t it? I mean, she doesn’t even look pregnant yet,” said Blaise, as he eyed her
curiously.
Theo gave a wolfish smile. “Oh there are some parts of her that definitely look pregnant.”
“Merlin Theo, we did not need to know that,” groaned Blaise, and Draco had to agree.
Draco believed that Pansy and Theo were perfect for each other, but that didn’t mean he
wanted to hear details. They had gotten married in the spring, having always intended to do
it eventually. The contraceptive ban meant that their family was also growing a bit earlier
than they intended. Still, Theo and Pansy had both come around to the idea of marriage and
early parenthood fairly quickly. Draco was struck by how much they both loved each other
and this baby they had never met before, even though pregnancy was a condition Pansy
obviously detested. She was only ten weeks along, and she already declared it to be
torturous.
Theo grinned for a moment before his face turned serious.
“I mean it, Draco, are you ready? Especially for tonight?”
Draco’s walls started to go up, until Blaise’s sharp voice stopped him. “Don’t do that. It’s a
reasonable question. And you’ve told us before that occlumency… suppresses things.”
Draco grimaced, but forced his walls back down. “Look, it will be fine. It’s just sex.”
Both of his friends gave him identically skeptical looks.
“It is,” insisted Draco. “Besides, I’ve done… things.”
“But not that thing,” pointed out Theo reasonably. “And no other things for a very long
time.”
Draco sighed. “You know why I waited.”
“Yes, because the Malfoy seed is something to be cherished, apparently,” said Theo, rolling
his eyes.
“And because I was betrothed,” pointed out Draco.
“To someone you don’t care about,” added Blaise.
Draco slumped. “Maybe not, but I only have to do it one time, and then we’re home free.
The Ministry won’t make us couple on any sort of schedule. And she’s pretty enough. It will
be fine.”
“She’s going to be a cold fish in bed,” muttered Theo, and Blaise nodded his agreement.
“Well then it’s a good thing I’m done after one night, isn’t it?” asked Draco sourly.
Theo and Blaise exchanged glances.
“I don’t like this, Draco,” said Blaise.
Draco threw up his hands. “What’s the alternative? I don’t have a love match like Theo did.
I’m not a citizen of another country like you are. We both know you would have found your
own match if you hadn’t been able to renounce your British citizenship.”
Blaise dipped his head in acknowledgment. “Perhaps. I’ll admit being a dual citizen gave
me an out. Italy would never dream of imposing something like this.”
“Exactly,” said Draco firmly. “And I’m very happy that you were able to exploit that
loophole, but I had no such advantage. I’ve been promised to Astoria for my entire life and
always knew I would end up here someday if I didn’t find someone better. I’m fine. She’s
fine. It will all be just fine.”
His friends looked displeased by this, but Draco was already shutting them out, raising his
occlumency walls higher than ever. They both noticed of course and just sighed resignedly.
“Well if it’s all fine, let’s keep it that way and get you downstairs. Narcissa will kill all four
of us if you aren’t on time,” said Theo.
“I’ll take him,” offered Blaise, checking his watch. “You can give Pansy another fifteen
minutes before it becomes dire.”
Theo nodded and placed a hand protectively on Pansy’s head as he began stroking her hair
lightly. Not for the first time, Draco felt a pang of jealousy at the easy love his best friends
shared. They were each others’ whole worlds, but they portrayed it in quiet ways: a light
touch here, a knowing smile there. It had become a little more pronounced once Pansy told
Theo she was pregnant. Theo had always spoiled Pansy, but ever since learning that news his
attention never strayed far from his wife. It was both wonderful to watch and gut-wrenching
whenever Draco considered the cold, formal relationship that would be his in the name of
duty.
Duty.
It wasn’t that Theo and Pansy didn’t have their own duties to their families, but their love had
grown despite it. Their families approved of their union – they were both Sacred 28 and very
well-matched in terms of money and property. The Notts’ views of blood purity were
traditionally more severe than the Parkinsons’ – and Theo and Pansy themselves were even
softer than their parents – but ultimately that didn’t matter when Theo and Pansy picked each
other. Neither family could reasonably object when presented with their childrens’ choice in
a match because it fulfilled every criteria both sides could possibly desire. The Notts would
remain Sacred 28 for another generation, and Pansy would be cherished as the bearer of
future Nott heirs.
Draco knew that his own duty was no different than Theo’s on paper, but his was to be a
marriage of convenience and not love. In Draco’s view, that placed his duty in a different
category altogether.
Duty had become Draco’s least-favorite four-letter word. It was beaten into his head from
the moment he was old enough to know what it meant. It was so much a part of him that he
had never thoroughly questioned it until he was in over his head during the war and couldn’t
find a way out.
He had a duty to make his family proud.
He had a duty to hate mudbloods.
He had a duty to serve the Dark Lord.
Duty.
Duty.
Duty.
Draco had eventually wised up and realized that some of his so-called duties were nothing
more than constructs. But those constructs were still a part of Draco, and Draco was
entrenched. That was especially true when it came to marriage. How was he to escape the
ever-pressing duty to his name and his lineage? He had never sorted this out properly, so he
did the only thing he could do and dragged his heels when it came time to marry Astoria. But
then the Ministry of Magic took that option away as well.
Today he would finally fulfill one part of his duty that had never diminished with time and a
dead Voldemort. The other part – an heir – would have to come later. Draco couldn’t face
that prospect just yet.
He wanted to wretch when he thought about it and forced his occlumency walls back up as he
rose to join Blaise. That cool detachment settled over him like a balm. He was here, but he
also wasn’t. He had enough practice with this that he could carry on entire conversations for
hours under occlumency and few would be able to tell he wasn’t really present. Only his
friends could guess, and even they didn’t identify it all the time. He knew they would be able
to see it today – he would have to occlude as hard as he ever had to cope with what was
coming – but he thought they would give him a pass for it under the circumstances. He
strengthened his walls so that nothing could penetrate them. It was the only way to survive
the yoke of duty that was threatening to crush him.
Before he knew it he was in the garden with his mother and Beatrice, Blaise still by his side
watching him warily. He could tell from Blaise’s expression that he knew exactly where
Draco’s mind had gone, but mercifully he said nothing about it.
“Ah Draco, you’re here,” said his mother briskly.
Draco said nothing, but just stared at her. She cleared her throat and gestured at the garden
around her. “What do you think?”
“It’s lovely, Mother, as I’m sure you know,” said Draco cordially.
She made no reaction to this. Narcissa wasn’t fishing for compliments. She knew her work
was exemplary.
“Indeed,” she said. “I only hope it will be declared the Wedding of the Season, compared to
other… events happening this evening.”
“There is no doubt,” said Draco smoothly.
“Draco is certainly correct,” said Beatrice swiftly. “Merlin knows that the Weasleys and a
mudblood are not at all equipped to give you any competition Cissy, even if they have the
Chosen One as a prop.”
She gave an elegant sniff at this.
“True, true,” said Narcissa thoughtfully. “A double wedding is a spectacle to be certain, but
they would not have the resources to take the spotlight away from Draco and Astoria.”
“Absolutely not,” said Beatrice firmly. “In any event, I am surprised the Weasleys are
celebrating it like they are. It’s a sad day for them.”
“Oh?” asked Blaise, and Draco’s walls automatically thickened.
“Yes of course,” said Beatrice with ill-disguised impatience. “Their youngest son Ronald
was their last hope to stay in the Sacred 28 was he not? Six sons – five still alive – and I’ve
heard that every one of them has married a half-blood or worse since the war. Ronald was
apparently the holdout, but now he’s marrying the biggest mudblood of them all. Today the
Sacred 28 will lose another member.”
The others raised their eyebrows at this pronouncement. Draco knew she was correct. He
didn’t keep up with the Weasleys exactly, but it was impossible not to hear about them
through the papers. They had become nearly as famous as Harry Potter after the war. Draco
knew that Bill Weasley had married a quarter-veela. Charlie Weasley had married another
dragon tamer who was the son of a muggle and a foreign witch. Percy Weasley had married
Penelope Clearwater, who was considered a half-blood through her muggleborn father.
George Weasley had married Angelina Johnson, who was also a half-blood, and Fred of
course was dead. Draco supposed Beatrice was correct that Ron was the last hope, but
marrying Granger had seemed so inevitable that Draco never even considered an alternative.
“I rather think that decision was made many years ago,” pointed out Draco. “Weasley has
had years to get used to a muggleborn wife.”
At that, Beatrice’s eyes widened, Narcissa’s mouth tightened, and Blaise struggled not to
smirk. Even through his occlumency, Draco knew the source of their reactions: it was his use
of the term ‘muggleborn.’ Nearly everyone in their circle still called them ‘mudbloods,’
though the term was considered impolite and was falling out of favor with the younger
generation, having less patience for blood politics than their parents. Still, with a group like
the one gathered in the Malfoy gardens today the use of ‘muggleborn’ was almost
inflammatory. It was the one, small rebellion Draco had allowed himself once the war was
over. The moment the Dark Lord was dead and buried, Draco had buried that word too. His
parents had never approved of his shift toward political correctness, but they hadn’t been able
to stop it. Eventually they simply ceased talking about muggleborns in Draco’s presence in
an effort to bury their heads in the sand about the direction of their son’s thoughts.
“You call them…” trailed off Beatrice delicately.
Draco just raised an eyebrow. “Granger is a muggleborn, is she not?”
Narcissa was looking paler than usual, and only now did Draco fully appreciate just how
adept his mother had been at concealing Draco’s own feelings from Beatrice and the rest of
the Greengrasses. The talk of the “other wedding” had always been in reference to the
Golden Trio as a unit. She had never singled out Granger specifically, presumably for this
very reason.
Beatrice snorted. “Yes of course.”
Draco shrugged. “She’s been inseparable from Weasley and Potter since our first year of
Hogwarts. I think the only question on anybody’s mind was which one of them she would
marry. Muggleborn or not, I expect the Weasleys are thrilled she chose their son and left
Potter for their daughter.”
Beatrice’s jaw dropped. “You think a mudblood chose…”
Draco snorted. “Granger is capable of getting almost anything she wants. You don’t have to
know her at all to know that. If she had wanted Potter, she would have gotten Potter.”
Beatrice just gaped as Draco gave her an impassive look. Narcissa used the brief silence to
steer the conversation toward safer waters.
“Draco, my dear, I believe it’s almost time. Why don’t you and Blaise head to the front?
We’ll be starting in about ten minutes.”
Draco gave a short bow from the neck and Blaise mimicked him. Then Blaise gripped his
arm and forcibly steered him through the crowd up to the front.
“Bloody hell mate, that’s one way to start,” muttered Blaise under his breath.
Draco felt very little. “Did I say something incorrect?”
Blaise snorted. “Of course not. Frankly, I’m shocked Granger didn’t marry Potter after the
war. You know they lived in a tent together for months.”
Draco shrugged. “I heard Weasley was with them too.”
“Sure, but supposedly he left for a while. Merlin knows what Granger and Potter got up to
once they were left all alone together.”
Draco couldn’t help a small smile escape at this. “I bet the thought drives Weasley mad. He
was always far more interested in her than she was in him, at least in school.”
Blaise grinned broadly. “No doubt. But it makes it more surprising than ever that she didn’t
just nab the Chosen One for herself. They were both raised by muggles, both only children,
and he’s loaded.”
“Gryffindors were always too temperamental to seek marriages of convenience.”
“Until now,” pointed out Blaise.
Draco sighed. “Until now,” he agreed.
They were silent for some time, and Draco watched dispassionately as the rows of chairs
filled with guests. Before long, Theo and Pansy were heading down the aisle together, and
Theo led Pansy to a place of honor to watch on the front row. Draco gave her a brief smile,
and she flashed one back before grimacing a little and clutching her stomach.
“How is she?” muttered Draco as Theo approached him.
Theo sighed. “Pregnant. Miserable. But there’s not much to be done about it. She’ll
manage through the ceremony at any rate.”
Draco nodded and turned back to the front, his walls rising again.
“Draco,” muttered Theo so quietly that Draco knew that only Blaise and himself could hear.
“Are you sure about this?”
Draco barely spared him a glance. “What alternative is there?”
Theo hesitated.
“Exactly,” said Draco, refocusing on the crowd.
“Well you could always try your luck with the Ministry,” muttered Blaise.
This suggestion managed to penetrate Draco’s walls, and he spun to stare at Blaise.
“Surely you aren’t serious.”
Blaise shrugged and glanced at Theo a bit helplessly. “I know it would be a risk, but this….”
“You aren’t here mate,” said Theo, jumping in. “You’ve barely been here ever since you
proposed.”
Draco huffed in displeasure at this. He knew he was overusing occlumency, but now was
really not the time for his friends to point this out.
“You think I should just leave all this and enter the Ministry lottery next week? Are you both
mad?” he hissed.
They shrugged and looked defeated. “Well it would certainly be more interesting than this
…” muttered Theo.
Draco didn’t deign to respond to this. He just snorted and then turned back to the front. He
had to rebuild his walls and quickly. The first strains of music were starting, and his father
was leading his mother down the aisle.
They were the perfect pureblood couple: proper, aloof, and yet affectionate with each other.
Their match had started as one of convenience, but love had grown between them over the
years. Draco desperately hoped that the same thing would happen with Astoria, but their
match had been promised so many years ago that he somehow doubted it. He had known her
for most of his life and surely affection would have developed by now if there had been any
room for it. Lucius and Narcissa, by contrast, had not known each other very well as young
children. Narcissa was several years younger than Lucius. He had been betrothed to Draco’s
Aunt Andromeda as a child, who was the oldest Black daughter from that side of the family.
When Andromeda ran off with a muggleborn instead, Draco’s grandfather selected a different
daughter to replace her. The family Narcissa had been betrothed to was not as high in the
instep as the Lestranges, so she was the obvious choice. The Blacks would never say no to a
match with the Malfoys, and the Malfoys felt that one sister was just as good as another.
Eventually his parents were married and affection grew. Theirs was a story told over and
over to the children of pureblood society, as an example of the happiness that could be
achieved by doing one’s duty.
As it so often did, thinking of his parents made Draco contemplate the sibling angle when it
came to his marriage with Astoria.
Daphne Greengrass was unfortunately unavailable, having been betrothed and then married
to Marcus Flint. Not that Draco had ever had romantic feelings for her, but he liked her more
than Astoria. Draco often found himself longing for a third Greengrass sister so he could
repeat his parents’ success. But of course Draco was out of luck. It was Astoria or the
Ministry at this point.
The music changed ever so slightly, and now Beatrice Greengrass was walking down the
aisle, being escorted by her son William. Draco had never really cared for William, but he
was the youngest of the bunch – he had only been out of Hogwarts for a year. He deposited
his mother on the bride’s side and then took his place next to Draco, at the far end behind
Theo and Blaise.
Draco secured his walls yet again, and now Prudence Avery was walking down the aisle in a
dress of blush pink that did little for her complexion. Prudence was Astoria’s best friend.
Her father was a former Death Eater, though unlike Lucius he was still in Azkaban. The
Avery’s did not have the same resources as the Malfoy’s to secure an early release for him.
Prudence, Draco knew, was exceptionally quiet, and her mother had died soon after the war.
She had a younger sister who was nineteen and an even younger brother who was about to
start his final year at Hogwarts. Prudence had spent most of her time mothering her siblings
rather than securing her own match ever since their mother’s death.
The outcome of this was that Prudence Avery was unmatched and would be the only member
of the Sacred 28 immediately affected by the MLPP, a fact which had spread like wildfire at
the many weddings that had taken place over the previous few months. Her sister, Paulina,
was a year too young for it and would not be matched until the following September, unless
she could secure a marriage of her own before that time. Draco had always rather liked
Prudence, and he felt sympathy for her predicament once he heard the news.
Now though, he was strangely jealous. How freeing would it be to just roll the dice?
Draco’s occlumency walls quivered, and he took a deep breath to settle them back into place.
He could not afford to have thoughts like that, not right now.
After Prudence came Paulina herself, who was selected not because of closeness, but as a
way to keep the bride’s side even with the groom’s without causing offense. As Draco
observed her through his occlumency haze, he had to admit that she was far more likely than
her older sister to secure a match on her own. For one thing, she was much prettier than
Prudence. For another, she still had another year for it, and Draco knew she was shrewder
than her older sister. If Prudence’s matching on Monday went poorly, Draco was sure
Paulina would be developing a contingency plan for herself that would not fail.
After Paulina came Daphne as the maid of honor, the gentle swell of her stomach heralding
the upcoming arrival of the Flint heir. Draco could not begin to guess just how far along she
was, but she had reached a stage where she was pleasantly round, but not overwhelmingly
so. She practically glowed as she approached the front, the chiffon from her gown
whispering over her small bump. The Flints were seated in the first row on the bride’s side
and sent smug looks toward Lucius and Narcissa, clearly pleased that the House of Flint had
secured their heir before the House of Malfoy.
Daphne gave Draco a soft smile when she approached, and something about it slipped under
Draco’s occlumency walls. He had never been as close to Daphne as his other friends from
their year – he had always known he was betrothed to her sister, so he kept her at arm’s
length to maintain appropriate decorum – but he was still friendlier with her than most of the
other attendees at this event.
Including the bride.
Draco’s walls trembled, and he frantically patched the cracks and secured them once again.
But before he could finish it, the music changed and everyone who was seated rose.
Astoria stepped into view on her father’s arm, and Draco tried to block it out. She was
objectively stunning: her figure elegant, the dress made of the most delicate lace that was
perfectly tailored to her body to end in a subtle train, and her face set on an expression that
appeared to be carved and carefully arranged for the moment. Beatrice and his mother had
thought of everything. The roses in her bouquet mirrored those that had been planted around
the garden – their color perfectly mimicking the blush on her cheeks. She wore drop earrings
from the Greengrass family and a tiara from the Malfoys, with a veil so sheer and delicate
Draco could see every movement of her face. The few members of the media that had been
invited to cover the Wedding of the Season immediately jumped into the aisle and began
taking pictures of her as she and her father slowly approached Draco.
Duty.
She was perfect like this, utterly flawless.
Duty.
There would be decades of affable, shallow conversation with no heat and no love.
Duty.
Draco’s life would be filled with boredom as he gave her a chaste kiss on the cheek each
morning and each evening.
Duty.
He would cope with occlumency and drown himself in the frost of his own mind because it
was still warmer than the coldness of his wife.
Duty.
His walls would be lowered just for tonight so that he could slip between her legs and…
Fuck.
Draco’s occlumency walls started to crack in earnest. His heart began to race. His stomach
flipped and churned. He was lightheaded, as Astoria and her father grew ever nearer. His
entire future was laid bare before him, and it was the most uninteresting thing he could
possibly imagine. Even the thought of bedding her gave him no joy at all. She was so
perfect she was like a marble statue come to life. And though Draco had less experience in
those matters than he cared to admit, he shivered with disgust as he contemplated touching
her alabaster skin.
Could he even do it? Could he even become hard when looking at the most uninteresting
woman he knew? It had never happened before, so why would it start now? Would being
married and naked get him to the finish line tonight?
Duty.
Draco knew that duty certainly wouldn’t help. He had never been one to perform on
command, and yet that’s what would be required of him for this. His father had assured him
several times that bedding a pretty wife was no great burden, and Draco had clung to this
scrap of wisdom. But now, in the face of what he had to do tonight his walls were falling.
The guests were still turned toward Astoria, who was halfway down the aisle now and
growing ever closer. Draco felt himself sway, and then a firm hand gripped his jacket from
behind.
“You can do this,” hissed Theo’s voice.
But could he? Could he really condemn himself to his fate by marrying this woman?
He had no choice, he knew that. His only alternative was…
Theo’s voice floated back through his memory.
“Well it would certainly be more interesting than this…”
Something about those words made his occlumency walls totally collapse as he started to
breathe hard.
Theo said it would be interesting, and he was surely right about that. It certainly wouldn’t be
uninteresting. In fact, going through the Ministry matching would probably be the most
interesting thing Draco had done since watching the Dark Lord die.
What an interesting idea.
“Theo,” he choked.
“What?” asked Theo quietly, but Draco heard the alarm in his voice.
“I have to go.”
“Now?” he hissed.
“Now.”
“Where?”
“Anywhere,” whispered Draco.
By now Astoria had approached Draco, and she was still giving him that cold, placid smile as
her father tried to turn her over to Draco. Draco’s own hand dropped as he swallowed and
stepped back before turning on the spot.
The last thing he observed before he apparated away was Astoria’s shocked expression,
which cleared the final bits of rubble from his wrecked occlumency walls.
Draco thought it was the most interesting moment they had ever shared together.
Chapter 2: Room Service.
A few seconds later.
Draco landed with a CRACK! on High Street in Hogsmeade and promptly emptied his
stomach.
With his occlumency walls gone and the strength of magic required to get from Wiltshire to
Scotland in a single jump, the nausea that had been threatening him for the last several hours
finally won.
“Ewww!” squealed a disembodied voice.
Draco looked up in confusion, pale and shaking. Some of the former contents of his stomach
appeared to be floating in midair.
“What on earth…?” he muttered.
“Malfoy?” hissed the voice.
“What the fuck?” demanded Draco to the voice.
To his utter shock, Hermione Granger appeared from nowhere, shaking out a silvery looking
cloak, which was dripping in sick.
“You couldn’t have aimed the other way?” she demanded, as she wrinkled her nose.
Draco was gaping, as he murmured an apology to her. She was wearing a simple, strapless
wedding dress, magically hiked up a little to show the trainers on her feet. She was carrying
an oddly worn beaded bag and was looking at him with disgust.
“Tergeo,” she hissed.
The sick vanished, and she threw the cloak back over herself to disappear again. Draco
recognized the cloak of course – he knew Potter had one just like this, having covered him
with it after breaking his nose on the train in sixth year.
“Wait!” cried Draco toward the place she had last stood.
He heard her footsteps halt.
“What?” she whispered.
“Aren’t you getting married?” he asked in confusion.
“Aren’t you?” she countered.
“I… think I might have jilted her actually.”
Only now did the weight of Draco’s actions at the wedding fully settle into him.
“Oh fuck, I jilted her!” he cried. “My mother is going to kill me!”
He heard Granger snort from under the cloak.
“You’d best hide somewhere else then,” she advised. “I’d wager no place in wizarding
Britain is safe for you now.”
“I don’t…”
“Go to muggle London,” she said curtly. “There’s an alley behind the Four Seasons, just off
of Old Park Lane and Piccadilly. It’s a good apparition point and their rooms should be
poncey enough for you until you figure it out.”
“But I don’t have…” he started again.
“Just confund the muggles at the front desk to get a room. It will be fine,” she snapped.
“Now I have to go.”
“But what about you? What are you doing?”
“Same as you. And now I really have to go because Merlin knows I’ll have the entire auror
department and a whole pack of Weasleys after me at any moment. I’m not certain they’ll
believe the kidnapping note I left behind.”
“What kidnapping note?” asked Draco in bewilderment.
“The note that said I was being held hostage by hostile parties, and they shouldn’t go looking
for me. Technically it was true — the Wizengamot and Molly Weasley certainly qualify as
hostile in my opinion — but I am hoping they interpret it to mean Death Eaters. It’s possible
they’ll be raiding Malfoy Manor very soon. Sorry about that, but it was all rather lastminute.”
Draco just stared in disbelief as he heard her footsteps hurrying off, toward the direction of
Hogwarts. He was torn between utter shock and bemusement at the mad conversation he just
had, before turning to contemplate the one place in the wizarding world he was sure his
parents would not look for him: the Hogshead. It was so dingy that he didn’t believe his
parents would think to check there before Monday.
Then again, Granger’s advice resonated through his mind. If he hid in muggle London they
would never find him until the deadline passed. As bizarre as it was to discover Granger
running from her own wedding too, it was the most cordial exchange he had ever had with
her. She was in such a rush that something told him she hadn’t been lying to him when she
suggested this Four Seasons place.
Draco debated for a full minute, but he knew he had to make a decision soon. No doubt there
was already a search party out for him too.
He finally nodded to himself and stepped back to turn and apparate one more time when
several more CRACKS! filled the air, and Ronald Weasley and Harry Potter both came
barreling down the street. They skidded to a halt when they saw him.
“Malfoy?” asked Potter in confusion. Weasley looked like he was about to be sick, and
Draco took a step back.
“Potter,” said Draco cautiously.
There was an awkward pause until Potter shook himself out of it. “Look, have you seen
Hermione by any chance? She’s due… somewhere.”
Draco cast an eye over their matching dress robes, which were far nicer than he had been
expecting. He idly wondered if Narcissa really would win Wedding of the Season, before
remembering that there was no wedding taking place at Malfoy Manor any longer. She
would lose by default.
He shuddered to think of her reaction to this.
“No,” said Draco automatically.
“You’re certain?” asked Potter, now narrowing his eyes at Draco. “Because I cast a tracking
spell on her, and it said she came this way.”
Something about this little tidbit rubbed Draco the wrong way. He and Potter had become
carefully cordial since the war ended and Potter testified in his and Narcissa’s favor. It had
led them to a brittle tolerance of one another, which came in handy when they ran into each
other at the Ministry or the odd fundraiser. They could exchange a few, non-hostile words
and then move on. But now, Draco found himself slipping back into the mannerisms of his
old self, as he stared at his childhood enemies.
“Lost her, have you?” he drawled. “What was it then? A lover’s quarrel? Or did she just jilt
the Weasel and leave him standing at the altar?”
Weasley nearly growled at him. “Fuck you, Malfoy.”
“Are you offering then?” asked Draco politely. “I would have thought you were saving
yourself for Granger.”
Weasley said nothing to this and just snarled as he shoved past Draco, now heading toward
Hogwarts too. Draco narrowed his eyes and turned to find Potter watching him a bit coldly.
Unlike Weasley, Potter had evidently learned to control his temper. Then again, Potter wasn’t
the one who had just been jilted. Draco glanced down and saw a thin gold band on his left
ring finger.
“You went ahead and got married then?” asked Draco, raising an eyebrow.
Potter shifted uncomfortably. “Ginny and I went first,” he shrugged. “We didn’t realize
Hermione was missing until…”
“Let me guess. She never showed.”
Potter ignored this. “I’m asking you again, Malfoy. Have you seen her or not?”
“I already told you, didn’t I?”
“Well if you haven’t, what are you doing here?”
A muscle in Draco’s jaw twitched. “That’s my business, Potter.”
“Not if it involves Hermione,” he shot back.
Draco gave him an incredulous look. “What, you think she ran off with me? Is that it?
Granted, I’m a far better choice than the Weasel, but surely even you aren’t that dense.”
Draco watched him deflate at this. “Fine,” he muttered. “But if you see her, please send her
back to the Burrow alright? She left behind a note implying she had been kidnapped. I’m
sure it was bollocks because the Burrow is very well warded, but if I don’t find her soon, I
have to assume it’s a serious threat. Now that I’ve seen you here… well, let’s just say that
Malfoy Manor is going to be the first place I look.”
Draco felt ill as he considered this. He was going to be in seriously deep shit with his parents
thanks to his own behavior. He didn’t think his mother would ever recover if there was an
auror raid too. Draco forced his childhood persona back in its box and decided to extend an
olive branch.
“I think odds are good that she just panicked,” said Draco carefully. “Considering what’s
coming up next week…”
Potter slumped and nodded. “Yeah,” he said. “You’re probably right.”
They said nothing more as Potter moved off to follow Weasley.
Draco waited a few seconds before ducking behind a nearby building and peering around it.
He could see Weasley in the distance, nearly at the gates of Hogwarts and Potter rushing to
catch up. Draco narrowed his eyes and drew his wand, aiming it carefully. He exhaled and
muttered a quiet tripping jinx just as Potter reached Weasley.
“Yes!” he hissed. The spell connected with Weasley, who fell over, bringing Potter down on
top of him.
Draco couldn’t very well warn Granger that the Dumb Arse Duo was in hot pursuit, but he
figured he could make up for the time she lost when he delayed her. He doubted she would
get very far if Potter had indeed managed to place a tracking spell on her, but at least she
would lead them on a merry chase.
Feeling a bit more upbeat, Draco focused on his next destination and disappeared with a
CRACK! A moment later he found himself in an alleyway that appeared to be a tunnel under
a large building, connecting two sides of a city block with each other. He glanced around and
saw that he was alone and then picked a direction at random and headed out of it. He was
pleasantly surprised to find he had chosen correctly, because as soon as he emerged he saw a
large sign designating the building as the Four Seasons.
Draco’s practiced eye took in the sight automatically. There was a uniformed bellman,
several sleek-looking muggle cars, and an elegant woman making her way toward the front
door, which opened for her automatically.
Despite popular belief, Draco wasn’t entirely ignorant about muggles. He – like everyone –
was forced to take remedial muggle studies as part of his final year’s curriculum at Hogwarts
once the war was over. Theo had been especially fascinated and had explored the muggle
world more thoroughly than his other friends. Draco had been dragged along just often
enough to be comfortable exchanging a few words at a restaurant and handling muggle
money. It was true that Draco had never been in the muggle world alone, but it couldn’t be
worse than facing his parents.
Taking a deep breath, Draco gripped the wand in his pocket and strode forward. Granger had
called this place poncey, and Draco assumed his most bored and arrogant expression as he
approached the door. If there was one thing Draco had learned to do as a Malfoy it was to
exert his superiority over everyone else.
The door slid open automatically, and Draco forced himself not to blink in surprise. He had
seen it open for the woman too, but he assumed she had tripped some sort of… switch, if
memory served. Instead, it opened as if by magic, and Draco faltered for a split second
before squaring his shoulders and striding forward.
The lobby was a bit masculine, with black marble floors, a coffered ceiling, and dark walls.
There were several sofas and chairs in rich fabrics, and there was even a piano in one corner,
with a young man playing furiously to entertain guests. The whole thing was large and lush,
and Draco was reluctantly impressed.
He took a moment to check himself, confirming that his countenance spoke of hundreds of
years of apathy and wealth as he made his way toward the counter, where an attractive young
woman looked up at him expectantly.
“Draco Malfoy, checking in,” he said.
Then under his breath he whispered, “Confundus.”
The woman, previously so sharp-eyed assumed a dreamy expression as she gave him a wan
smile and handed over a small piece of rectangular plastic. “Room 412, Sir. The lifts are to
your right.”
Draco stared at the plastic with some confusion, but just pocketed it with a curt nod and made
his way to join a short queue for the lifts. He followed several other muggles into a lift and
saw one of them press the button for the fourth floor. He exhaled with relief. A few
moments later he and an older man exited to the fourth floor, and Draco followed him from
behind. Eventually the man found his room and waved the plastic in front of the door. Draco
stared, but before he could understand what the man had done, he was inside the room and
the door was shut.
Draco gritted his teeth, but there was nothing for it. He found Room 412 and began to wave
the plastic too. Over and over again he waved it and nothing happened. He knew he could
use a basic unlocking charm, but he also knew the Ministry had a way of tracking excessive
magic. The odd confundus here and there wouldn’t draw much attention, but if Draco could
avoid using magic he should.
He began to grow frustrated when another door opened nearby, and a young woman exited,
casting a curious glance at him. Draco’s cheeks reddened.
“I can’t get the door to work properly,” he muttered.
She chuckled a little and approached him. “Mine’s been getting stuck too. Here, let me try. I
finally figured out a trick.”
Draco gratefully handed over the piece of plastic, and he watched carefully as she pressed it
to a small disk on the door and then brushed it smoothly. Suddenly a light on the door turned
green, and Draco heard the sound of a lock opening.
“Ah, thank you,” he said gratefully as he cracked the door open and shoved a foot into the
jamb to keep it from closing again.
She just smiled and handed him the keycard. “No problem. I’m Jennifer.”
“Draco,” he said.
She raised an eyebrow. “That’s a unique name.”
“Unique family tradition,” he quipped.
“Oh?” she asked curiously.
He shrugged. “My mother’s family. Nearly everyone is named after a constellation or star.”
Her eyes lit up. “That’s fascinating. And how long has it been going on?”
“Oh five or six hundred years I’d say.”
Her jaw dropped. “You can trace your family back six hundred years?”
“Ummm… yes?” Draco said nervously. Couldn’t muggles do that too?
“Goodness, I couldn’t even tell you the names of my great great grandparents!”
“Cygnus Black and Violetta Bulstrode,” supplied Draco automatically.
Jennifer grinned. “I take it Cygnus was the constellation then?”
“The swan, yes,” said Draco. “Bit of an unfortunate name for a bloke.”
Jennifer let out a peal of laughter at this. “What’s Draco then?”
“The dragon.”
“That’s much more manly,” she said, and only now did Draco see that she was giving him a
rather appreciative look. “Well Draco, it’s a pleasure to meet you. I must run to join some
friends for a late dinner, but I’ll probably be down by the bar in a couple of hours.”
Draco flushed. “Oh… thanks. I might see you around.”
She gave him a coy smile and then turned to head down the hallway, as Draco slipped into
the room and shut the door with a sigh.
Muggles.
She was rather attractive, Draco supposed, but it had been so long since he had done anything
like that he knew he wouldn’t be going down to the bar tonight to meet her. He was not at all
prepared to break his years-long dry spell after the day he just had, and he certainly wouldn’t
be doing it with a muggle. Merlin knew he would probably breach the Statute of Secrecy
without even realizing it and end up back in Azkaban.
Draco raised his occlumency walls ever so slightly to push her out of his mind and then
opened his eyes to look around him.
The room was nice – far nicer than any wizarding establishment he had stayed in previously
and almost as nice as his room at Malfoy Manor. Draco peered around curiously and shook
his head a little as he took in the luxurious finishes and fluffy linens. For all of the prejudice
exhibited by his parents and their friends, he was certain that every one of them would enjoy
staying in a place like this.
Draco’s stomach rumbled as he explored the room, and eventually he stumbled across a menu
with instructions to order something called room service. It took Draco at least fifteen
minutes to figure out how the fellytone worked and another thirty minutes before the food
arrived. While he waited he played with the buttons on a black stick and made the large
black box turn on, which Draco thought was a TV. He watched in fascination and continued
to stare at it as the food arrived.
Bloody hell, Draco could do this all weekend, and he fully intended to do just that.
It was only when the owl tapped on his window that Draco allowed himself to remember
what he had done earlier that evening.
He sighed as he turned off the TV and rose to let his father’s owl in. It swooped in and
dropped not one, but three letters on the bed, and it was closely followed by a second owl he
didn’t recognize that dropped a fourth. Both owls stuck around to see if Draco would
respond.
Draco raised his occlumency walls as he surveyed the various letters delivered by his father’s
owl Caligula. He recognized one from his father of course and ripped it up without reading
it. He knew precisely what Lucius would say. He would berate Draco, threaten to cut him
off from the portions of the fortune that weren’t already his, and tell him that any fees they
now owed the Greengrasses would come from Draco’s vault.
Fine. Draco didn’t care.
He also ripped up the letter from his mother. She wouldn’t be as cruel as his father, but she
would still make him feel guilty. She had a way of expressing her disappointment that cut
even deeper than Lucius. She would beg him to come back and make things right with
Astoria, and Draco knew it was too late for that. He had made his bed here at the Four
Seasons, and he fully intended to lie in it.
The third letter was from Theo, and this one he did open.
Draco,
Fucking hell you caused a scene. Right after you left, Astoria and her mother both fainted,
Lucius declared you must be imperiused or under some other evil influence, and Narcissa
began to hyperventilate. Once it became clear you weren’t coming back, we revived Astoria
and Beatrice and then started the reception to distract the guests while your parents sent the
elves through the Manor to look for you. I only just escaped your father’s study after he
interrogated me and Blaise. He seems to think we were the ones hiding you. I gave him free
reign of Nott Manor to look for you – I assume you are smart enough not to go there, so I
hope that’s alright – and I expect he’ll return empty-handed any minute now.
They’re in a right state, but these things have a way of working out. You know how Blaise,
Pansy, and I feel about your marriage to Astoria so I won’t belabor the point, but I think you
did the right thing. That being said, we also won’t judge you if you change your mind and
return to marry her before the deadline. We all know that decision was very spur-of-themoment.
My only advice from here is to commit to whichever choice you make. Either return now to
mitigate the damage or stay away and maintain a low profile until it’s time for the Matching
Ceremony on Monday. I have a feeling that if you show up at the Manor at any point
between now and then you will be locked into a room and forcibly wed, whether you like it or
not.
Hang in there mate and write back if you need anything.
Theo
Draco exhaled. It was what he was expecting, though he was glad that Theo confirmed it for
him. His parents might never forgive him, but for the first time in years, Draco found
himself functioning without meaningful occlumency walls to help. He was dreading seeing
his parents again, and he wasn’t even that excited about the Ministry matching. But he was
free of Astoria now, and he could finally breathe. Anyone – truly anyone – would be better
than her.
It was the first time he had ever permitted himself to have that thought. He had been
suppressing it for years.
As he allowed himself to think about it, Draco realized that Astoria embodied every single
thing about his duty that he despised. It wasn’t her fault – their parents were the ones who
arranged it – but Draco couldn’t help it. He associated that crushing weight with her and her
alone. Draco didn’t particularly care who his wife was or what she looked like, just as long
as it wasn’t Astoria. He felt a bit guilty for having these thoughts barely two hours after
jilting her, but now that he allowed himself to really examine it he knew he was right.
He was free of her, and that was enough. He just needed to take Theo’s advice and continue
to stay away until the Ministry matched him with somebody else on Monday. Between room
service and muggle TV, Draco was sure he could manage it.
He then turned to the second owl he didn’t recognize and furrowed his brow. The note was
short and in an unfamiliar, feminine-looking scrawl.
I have to know: did you make it to the Four Seasons or did you fuck it up en route?
Draco’s eyebrows flew up in surprise. Granger was writing to him? She was the last person
he expected to reach out. Then again, she was also the last person he thought he would see
today, and yet here he was luxuriating in a fine muggle establishment based entirely on her
recommendation. This was about a hundred times better than the Hogshead, and Draco
figured he owed her the courtesy a response. He grabbed a small piece of paper and a… pen
he thought it was called… and jotted out a short reply.
Obviously I made it. I would remind you that I am a Malfoy and my fuck ups have never been
so mundane. I will acknowledge that your recommendation was on point. It’s quite nice, and
I plan to lie low until Monday. Are you still a Granger or are you a Weasel now?
Draco chuckled to himself as he handed the note back to the owl and watched it fly off into
the night. He was sure he wouldn’t have a response until the following morning at the very
earliest. It took several hours to send a letter to Scotland, and he doubted she had made it out
of the wards of Hogwarts with Potter’s tracking spell in place. No doubt she was holed up
there or else back at the Weasel hovel, wherever the hell that was.
Draco stripped out of his robes and padded to the washroom to take a quick shower and
prepare for bed. He briefly considered transfiguring his dress robes into something more
comfortable for sleep, but eventually dismissed it. He wanted to avoid magic as much as
possible until he was prepared to leave, and the hotel had provided a shockingly fluffy
dressing gown he could use while he was waiting for Monday to roll around.
His nightly routine mostly complete, Draco emerged and came to a halt as he stared at the
owl from Granger that was sitting calmly on the desk in his room. He cocked his head and
studied it.
“What on earth?” he muttered as he pulled her note from his leg and opened it to read.
A few things:
First, you’re a git.
Second, I will always be a Granger regardless of whether I’m married or not.
Third, I am not married, and I fully intend to leave the country just as soon as my two exbest-friends leave me the fuck alone. They are currently lying in wait outside of my door.
Finally, I’m glad you like the Four Seasons. If I had more time I would consider making this
a Project and introduce you to the finer points of muggle life in an effort to deprogram you.
Alas, there are more urgent things occupying my attention at the moment. That being said, I
am presently at the Ritz down the street, and it’s quite nice as well. I recommend trying it the
next time you need to hide from your parents.
Draco’s eyebrows nearly disappeared into his hairline as he read her response. Evidently she
was nearby, and while Draco had no particular need to write to Granger, he had to admit that
running into her had led to one of the most fascinating evenings of his life. He shrugged and
scribbled a response.
Your utter disregard for wizarding customs when it comes to taking your husband’s name
does not surprise me in the least. That is very on brand for you. Some would call it
Progressive, others Distasteful. I will leave you to guess which camp I fall in.
The fact that Potter and Weasley seem to have you cornered does surprise me very much. I
always thought you were better at that sort of thing than they were. However, as a gesture of
goodwill and to return the favor you bestowed upon me by recommending my current
lodgings, I will note that I ran into Potter and Weasley in Hogsmeade right after you left. I
may have lied to Potter about seeing you, but he did tell me that he placed a tracking spell on
you. He didn’t specify what or where, but if you flee he will be able to find you.
He gave it to the owl, and several minutes later it returned with another response.
I repeat: you are a git and a pretentious one at that.
I knew Harry must have pulled some stunt like that. Thank you for telling me, though now
I’ll be forced to do what Voldemort never achieved and actually kill him once I get around to
escaping. I probably won’t be able to remove the tracking spell without his wand. He uses
some fancy auror version that’s “extra secure” (gag).
I suppose that means I’m a sitting duck until Monday. I’m warded in, so they won’t be able to
get to me, but if I apparate out of here Harry will just track me again.
Fuck my life.
Draco snorted and read it a second time before having an odd thought.
Granger, if you are warded in, do you require sustenance? I recently became familiar with a
concept known as “room service.” It is surprisingly good. Do let me know if I should send
snacks. We need you to keep up your strength so you have enough energy to murder Potter
when the time comes.
Within five minutes he had a response.
Oh my God, please. I’d offer to pay you back, but I know you’ll just confund the muggles
during checkout so there’s no point. Please, Malfoy, I’m so hungry I could eat a hippogriff. I
always forget to pack food when I’m on the run.
Draco chuckled and placed another order for room service, and within thirty minutes he was
sending her a filet with haricot verts and a rather nice bottle of red wine.
The haricot verts are a little under in my opinion, but the filet appears to be a perfect medium
rare. Bon appetit Granger.
She replied several minutes later.
I like my green beans on the crunchy side, thanks, and the steak is delicious. In fact, I wafted
the scent of it under the door to see if those prats were still out there, and sure enough I heard
Ron’s stomach growl when he smelled it. I think he actually cried.
I’m now preparing to drown myself in wine and rant about the fucking gerontocracy that has
led me to this place. I imagine I will wake up tomorrow morning very hungover and
grouchy. Therefore, I humbly request scrambled eggs and toast in the morning, along with an
entire pot of coffee. I take it black.
Cheers, you git.
Draco didn’t know why he was smiling as he put the note aside and allowed his head to hit
the pillow. He had humiliated his family, wrecked several other relationships, and was now
preparing to be randomly matched to a witch for years to come through the Ministry of
Magic. And yet, as his eyes drifted closed, Draco couldn’t help but grin at the image of
Granger taunting the Weasel with a delicious meal from the Four Seasons kitchens. It served
him right. With the notable exception of Potter, nobody had ever been able to direct
Granger’s fire, not really. Her penchant for rule-following and her admiration of authority
figures had always been at the mercy of her inner drive to get the thing she wanted. She
would break every fucking rule in the book if it meant she won, Draco had always known
that about her. Granger might be trapped for now, but Draco was sure she would win the
long game.
He made a mental note to place an order for eggs, toast, and coffee as soon as he woke up the
next morning and then drifted off to sleep.

The Next Morning
Draco awoke to a tapping on his window. This time he recognized Theo’s owl, who was
hovering outside with another note and a copy of The Daily Prophet. Draco groaned as he
got out of bed and let the bird in, which dropped a short note and the newspaper on his head
with an indignant hoot.
Draco glanced at the note first.
Mate,
First, I assume The Daily Prophet is a load of bullshit, but I have to ask.
Second, your father is filing a missing person’s report, and odds are good they’ll begin
looking for you shortly. I won’t send you another owl before midnight, but consider this your
warning to cease using magic until you’re ready to be found.
Theo
Draco grimaced at this unwelcome piece of news, but he hadn’t used magic in nearly twelve
hours. He hoped they wouldn’t be able to trace him with his apparition and a single
confundus, even if Lucius showed up at the Ministry and threw his weight around. It was a
Sunday and there would only be a skeleton staff there today. He just had to make it to
midnight before the deadline passed, and then he would be in the pool of wizards matched
the following day.
Still, Draco was determined to take Theo’s warning to heart, and he put his wand in the
nightstand so that he wouldn’t be tempted to use it. Then he gave room service a call to order
breakfast before unfurling The Daily Prophet. He gasped when he saw the headline on the
front page.
Weasley and Greengrass Jilted! Malfoy and Granger Disappear Together!
by Rita Skeeter
In a turn of events nobody saw coming, Ronald Weasley and Astoria Greengrass were both
jilted at the altar yesterday evening, during what otherwise would have been the Weddings of
the Season. Readers of The Daily Prophet will surely be familiar with the Marriage Law and
Procreation Plan that goes into effect at midnight tonight. During the runup to the Matching
Ceremony on the first of September, any number of voluntary weddings took place, including
quite a few weddings scheduled for the last Saturday before the deadline. This reporter
attended the Greengrass-Malfoy wedding yesterday evening, while her colleagues attended
the Potter-Weasley-Granger affair in the next county over.
While Harry Potter and Ginny Weasley did manage to complete their ceremony, the second
wedding to occur – Ronald Weasley and Hermione Granger – never came to be due to the
absence of the bride who disappeared from her own wedding. And in the case of Astoria
Greengrass and Draco Malfoy, Lord Malfoy waited until Miss Greengrass was being given
away by her father before he apparated and left her there utterly humiliated.
If the surprise jiltings weren’t enough, Miss Granger and Lord Malfoy were seen speaking to
each other in Hogsmeade moments after they left their respective partners. Miss Granger
was wearing a wedding dress, and Lord Malfoy was in formal dress robes. According to
Aberforth Dumbledore, barkeep at the Hogshead, the couple appeared to be discussing their
plans hurriedly before Lord Malfoy sent Miss Granger along first and then hung back to
await the arrival of Mr. Potter and Miss Granger’s former beau who were following her. Mr.
Dumbledore states that Lord Malfoy appeared to distract Mr. Potter and Mr. Weasley, who
evidently were unaware that Miss Granger had been meeting with him only seconds before.
Miss Granger and Lord Malfoy have since disappeared, and the timing could not be a
coincidence. This reporter is left to wonder if this is not a case of star-crossed lovers who
have found each other in the eleventh hour of a law that has divided the public’s opinion.
Rest assured that in the event Miss Granger and Lord Malfoy have run away to elope, the
Office of Marriage Records at the Ministry of Magic will be immediately informed of their
union. They have until midnight tonight to engage in holy matrimony before they will be
subject to the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan themselves.
Tomorrow we will have our answers. Is Draco Malfoy – heir to both the House of Malfoy
and the House of Black – in love with muggleborn Hermione Granger? Did Hermione
Granger choose Draco Malfoy over her lifelong friend Ronald Weasley? And with this
unprecedented move, has Hermione Granger single-handedly eliminated three different
family lines from the vaunted Sacred 28?
Draco winced as he put the paper down and flopped back on his bed while he waited for
breakfast. There was no question about it, his parents would be out for blood – not only his
blood, but now Granger’s blood too. Skeeter called him Lord Malfoy over and over again.
Technically she was correct, and it was not unusual to see him addressed that way in The
Prophet. But it still made Draco cringe. It reminded him of his duty, and he knew it would
remind his parents of precisely the same thing. The article was mostly bollocks of course,
but Draco knew the implications would outrage his parents, at least until Draco showed up to
the Matching Ceremony the next day.
Granger, he assumed, would successfully flee the country per her written plan. Draco was
now giving this some serious thought as well, but deep down he knew he wouldn’t do it. He
would never be able to avoid using magic indefinitely, and that was the only way to escape
his parents for more than a few days. At this point he preferred the Ministry’s method of
providing a bride over the things his parents might do. It would be much safer if he was wed
to somebody else tomorrow. Besides, while the Ministry of Magic might not pursue
Hermione Granger for fleeing the country, he could not trust them to treat him the same way.
Draco would rather marry Astoria than risk going back to Azkaban.
Yes, Draco’s plan was to hide at the Four Seasons for one more day and engage in muggle
television and room service. Then tomorrow he would present himself at the Ministry in time
for the Matching Ceremony. They would select a bride, he would be bound, and then he
would consummate it before his parents could find a way to interfere.
Draco’s stomach rolled at the thought of losing his virginity to a woman he had only met that
day, but he was sure he could do it. Astoria was the person who triggered Draco’s tendencies
to occlude to a dangerous degree, but before she had pushed him deep into his own mind he
had been able to pleasure himself and the occasional female friend. Granted, he had always
felt guilty about engaging in those behaviors with anybody who wasn’t Astoria so he never
got very far with it. But he had done it a handful of times, and the witches seemed to enjoy
it, as did he. It was only Astoria who made him instinctively occlude to the point of being
unable to maintain an erection. As long as he didn’t marry her he should be able to do it.
That’s what he told himself at any rate.
The truth was, Draco hadn’t pleasured himself since the MLPP was announced and he
believed his fate to be sealed. Occlusion made it nearly impossible to feel any type of sexual
desire, and eventually he stopped trying. But with his future open and no longer tied to the
woman that personified the burdens of his duty for him, surely his cock would wake up and
do what needed to be done.
Besides, Lucius had always said that bedding a Malfoy wife was no great burden. Evidently
there was family magic that helped the couple perform. Thanks to his parents’ tendency to
speak in euphemisms, Draco had never been precisely sure what that meant. He knew he
should have asked for details, but that would have involved acknowledging that Astoria was
the wife he would be bedding, and Draco had never wanted to think about it.
Draco assured himself that between a different woman and the elusive family magic, he
would be able to consummate his marriage. He just needed to avoid his parents for another
seventeen hours, and he would be home free.
He was jolted out of his thoughts by a knock on the door, which heralded the arrival of
breakfast for both himself and Granger. Once again, Draco found himself grinning as he
accepted the offerings, retrieved the owl who had spent the night with him, and then sent it
along its way to Granger a few streets over. He even included the article from The Prophet to
liven up her morning.
Granger, do let me know if you would like to fulfill Rita’s every journalistic dream by eloping
before midnight tonight. I suspect it would cause at least four heart attacks – Weasley, Potter,
and both of my parents. You would fulfill your fantasy of killing Potter, and I would fulfill my
fantasy of getting my hands on my full inheritance before I’m thirty. I’ll even split it with
you. It could be mutually advantageous.
Alternatively, you can tell me which buttons to press on this stick that controls the TV and
place an order for lunch and dinner while we wait for midnight to roll around.
Either option works for me.
Chapter 3: I Do But I Don't.
1 September 2003.
Draco made it to midnight.
For better or for worse, Granger rejected his proposal of marriage, though for some reason
her response prompted Draco to ask a second time before he gave up.
I made a pros and cons list, Malfoy, and while I'm tempted by both the destruction of my
closest friends group and the considerable fortune you are offering (any woman who says she
doesn't care about your money is lying, by the way), I am terrified of the type of children we
would produce. I'm sure you would insist upon it at some point because of tradition and
heirs and all that nonsense. Therefore, I'm afraid I must decline your generous proposal.
Granger, don't tell me you're intimidated by our future progeny? They would take after me of
course and be both handsome and witty. Marry me darling, and let's see what happens.
I rather think they would have my brains combined with your arrogance and turn into
annoying little shits, actually (yes, even more annoying than you are). Since you have now
asked me twice, let me be perfectly clear: fuck off Malfoy. Your highest and best use at the
moment is keeping me fed and watered, not arranging an elopement. In light of that, I would
like to get back on track. I will teach you to use a remote control, and in exchange you will
send me a BLT for lunch.
Yes ma'am, I would never dream of disobeying you.
It was odd reading 'fuck off' from Hermione Granger's hand, though it didn't irritate Draco
nearly as much as he thought it should. Instead, he dutifully ordered lunch for her while she
provided plenty of recommendations for muggle television. Draco watched a show called
EastEnders before turning on something called 'pay-per-view,' where he watched a truly
terrifying film titled Terminator 3. Then Granger insisted he needed to watch some movie
about a fish called Finding Nemo. She explained it was very popular with muggles under the
age of twelve. Draco supposed he could see the appeal, but he found it eerily similar to his
current situation. He secretly hoped that Nemo’s father would not find him, at least not
before midnight.
Draco woke on the first of September, feeling more optimistic than he had in years. His
entire future was now before him; he just needed the Ministry to marry him off first. Draco
privately marveled at his own change of heart on this matter since the previous Saturday, but
his panic at the wedding and relief at being free of Astoria had convinced him he was doing
the right thing. He received an owl from the Ministry first thing in the morning on Monday
summoning him for the Matching Ceremony, and some part of Draco was thrilled. It was
now out of his parents’ hands.
So here he was, sending Granger a final breakfast before he left for the Ministry and she fled
to France. She told Draco the night before that she planned on taking muggle transportation
to get there, which he thought was rather ingenious of her. The Ministry had restricted
international travel by portkey and floo for the last year, but of course they could not track
muggle methods nearly as well. It was true they had caught a few muggleborns and halfbloods who tried to leave by muggle train earlier in the year, but today most of the Ministry
would be on call for the Matching Ceremony. By the time they realized she was missing it
would be too late.
I wish you luck on your journey. If you need a place to hide in France, you can seek out the
Malfoy chateau in the Loire Valley. Just provide the family motto (“Sanctimonia Vincent
Semper”) to the elf in charge, and you will be given sanctuary until this blows over. My
parents haven’t visited in years, and the Ministry will never figure out how to cross the
wards.
Draco sent the note and breakfast off to her before checking his watch. He had an hour
before he planned to arrive at the Ministry, and he ate his own meal before finally pulling his
wand out of the nightstand. He made quick work refreshing his dress robes from the
wedding and then confunding the muggle at the checkout counter before apparating to the
Ministry’s visitor entrance. He was twenty minutes early, and as soon as he arrived bulbs
began to flash.
“Lord Malfoy, did you elope with Hermione Granger?”
“Lord Malfoy, have you spoken to Miss Greengrass?”
“Lord Malfoy, will you be matched today?”
Draco said nothing and pushed through the sea of reporters and made his way to the largest
courtroom, which they were using for this event. Draco joined the queue to sign himself in,
took a number, and then smirked a bit when he saw that Granger hadn’t signed in yet.
Hopefully she’s on the train to France by now, he thought to himself.
He certainly wouldn’t call them friends after the events of the previous weekend, but they
had worked together surprisingly well. She kept him lodged and entertained, and he kept her
well-fed. Draco had made a point to avoid Granger even more so than Potter and Weasley in
the years since the war, and it was something of a relief to know that he didn’t need to do that
anymore. Despite her rather colorful language, she obviously no longer despised him.
Draco made his way into a section of the courtroom that had been reserved for wizards being
matched, and he looked around curiously as the seats slowly filled. The wizards were on one
side of the courtroom and the witches on the other. In the middle were seats for family
members, press, and high-ranking Ministry officials. The space was enormous, capable of
holding several thousand people, and Draco suspected that several extension charms had been
used to enhance the space.
“This is a fucking circus,” came a voice from his left. Draco turned to find a wizard he
thought he recognized.
“Anthony Goldstein, right?” asked Draco.
The wizard nodded. “Yes, and you’re Draco Malfoy. I’m a bit surprised to see you here. I
saw the articles in The Prophet.”
Draco just snorted. “I was supposed to get married on Saturday, but I just couldn’t go
through with the arranged marriage bit. The paper is printing bullshit. I did not elope with
Granger. She jilted Weasley by pure coincidence.”
Goldstein grinned at this. “Rita Skeeter is going to be so disappointed.”
Draco chuckled a little, and they fell silent as more people filed in. Draco’s stomach
clenched when the doors opened and Astoria strode in, tears streaming down her face. She
came to an abrupt halt when she saw Draco and then gave an almighty sniff and marched
over to the witches’ section.
“Christ, what will you do if you match with her?” muttered Goldstein.
Draco’s mind came to a standstill. What would he do? Fuck, he hadn’t even thought about
that scenario. He had been so relieved to get away from Astoria at the wedding that it
completely slipped his mind that she would be matched too, and he might end up with her
anyway.
Draco found his occlumency walls starting to go up, and he forced them back down.
No. It won’t happen. I’ll be matched with somebody else. Don’t fucking think about it.
It was a struggle, but with each new witch that came in his walls lowered a bit more. Every
witch was an opportunity to be matched with somebody else. Every witch could be an
escape. He looked at them and wondered which one would be his. He didn’t recognize most
of them, but he was relieved to find that even the plain ones were more compelling to him
than Astoria. As beautiful as she was, she was like ice. He would gladly take the homely,
slightly frumpy witch to Astoria’s left over Astoria herself. That told him he made the right
choice for himself by going through with this, and he clung to it. His wife didn’t have to be
pretty. She didn’t have to be intelligent. They didn’t even have to like each other very
much. Malfoy Manor was large enough that they could live largely independent lives. The
only criteria she needed to fulfill was that she be somebody other than Astoria Greengrass.
That was it.
Draco was pulled out of his thoughts as he caught sight of his parents, Theo, Blaise, and
Pansy all entering the courtroom. They all looked like they had barely slept and Pansy in
particular looked ill.
They skidded to a halt when they saw Draco. He didn’t meet his parents’ eyes, instead
looking at his friends and basking in the relief he saw reflected there. He had not responded
to either of Theo’s letters, having been concerned that it would lead his father to his location.
He was sure that Theo and the others worried he had fled like Granger, which would almost
guarantee another visit to Azkaban. All three of them seemed to relax when they discovered
him.
He then glanced at his parents’ faces, and as he expected his father looked thunderous and his
mother looked hurt. He slid his gaze away and started to occlude until they turned away and
headed to the gallery, but not before Lucius stopped to have a whispered conversation with
Kingsley Shacklebolt.
Don’t do it. Don’t do it. Don’t do it.
Draco was sure he knew what Lucius was saying to Shacklebolt – he was trying to sway the
matching so Draco would end up with Astoria anyway. But Shacklebolt gave a helpless
gesture as though to say it was out of his hands, and Draco gave a sigh of relief. A major
reason the legislation had passed was because the matching would be random and done in
lottery form. It would be fair that way and above outside influence.
Draco was relying on them to keep their word about it.
Draco’s attention was then pulled away again as Beatrice and Daphne Greengrass entered the
courtroom. Beatrice threw a look at Draco that was so reminiscent of a basilisk, he found
himself cowering.
“She looks like she wants to murder you,” muttered Goldstein.
“That’s because she’s Astoria’s mother,” confessed Draco.
“Ah. That’ll do it,” said Goldstein delicately.
Beatrice and Daphne took seats as far away from the Malfoys as they could find. Draco
sighed to himself. It had all the makings of a new family feud between the Malfoys and the
Greengrasses. Draco idly wondered how many generations this one would last.
At precisely ten o’clock, the presiding witch banged a gavel, and the courtroom fell silent.
“Attention!” she cried. “We have before us, two hundred and eighty-seven witches and two
hundred and seventy-two wizards to be matched. In accordance with the Marriage Law and
Procreation Plan, we will draw a number from each pool to ensure the process is fair. As
there are more witches than wizards, those witches who find themselves without a match
during this round will be the first who are matched this time next year. In the event that these
witches consummate a marriage in the next year, they will be exempt from next year’s
Matching Ceremony.”
Draco heard some soft murmuring at this, and he saw quite a few of them straighten up
eagerly, hoping to be one of the fifteen who walked out of here today without a husband.
Draco had to admit he was surprised there was such a small number of participants today.
Then again, the wedding industry had been positively booming for the last year. Nearly
everybody he knew took advantage of a loophole like Blaise did or secured their own match
– often marrying close friends or even the occasional distant family member to avoid this.
Still, given that the age range spanned a full twenty years, Draco was stunned there were so
few witches and wizards who were still unmarried.
“Now then, we shall start with –”
CRASH!
The presiding witch fell silent as the door to the courtroom flew open and a clearly irate
Hermione Granger came striding in, being escorted by Harry Potter. Ron Weasley was
following behind, glowering at her, and behind him came a trail of redheads and their
spouses, all looking very put out.
Granger cast a glance at the wizards as she passed and caught his eye. He grimaced at her in
sympathy. Evidently she didn’t make it to France then. Her nostrils flared, and she raised an
eyebrow before turning forward and heading to the other side of the room.
The witch who had checked Draco in came hurrying forward.
“Madam Marchbanks, we have two more.”
The presiding witch narrowed her eyes, but said nothing as Granger wrenched her arm from
Potter’s grip and flung herself onto the bench on the witches’ side. She was fuming. Draco
glanced up to find Weasley taking a spare seat on the wizards’ side, also radiating anger. He
threw Draco a withering glare before turning forward to watch the proceedings. Potter was
muttering to Granger hurriedly, but she put her nose in the air, crossed her arms, and very
clearly turned her back on him in obvious dismissal. Draco glanced at Weasley and saw he
was watching the spectacle too. He gave a mirthless laugh.
Potter gave a deep sigh and rubbed a hand over his face before heading toward the stands for
family members.
Once he was seated, Madam Marchbanks cleared her throat. “Very well, if we are all present
then… as I was saying, we have more witches than wizards. Those witches who are not
matched today will have the next year to consummate a magical marriage, and any who do
not will be in the first group who is matched this time next year. Now then…. Let’s begin!”
Draco had to admit that it was all rather interesting at first. A tiny, unnamed wizard who
reminded Draco of Professor Flitwick stood at the front and simply selected a number from a
bowl for the wizards and then a bowl for the witches before consulting a list.
“Number fifteen… Evan Mulligan! And number eighty-two… Adele Fairhope!”
The witch and wizard who were called rose and made their way to the front where the tiny
wizard started to speak.
“Mr. Mulligan, do you consent to this marriage?”
“I do,” came the defeated voice of the man who appeared to be in his mid-thirties.
“And Miss Fairhope, do you consent to this marriage?”
“I do,” whispered the young woman who looked to be a teenager. Draco thought she must
have barely made the age cut off.
“In that case, join your hands,” said the wizard.
They did so, glancing at each other and both looking a bit sick.
“I hereby bind you, in matrimony and magic, on this, the first day of September 2003. Take
each other in honesty and integrity to grow your lives together from this day forward.”
There was a flash of magic, and the couple gasped before releasing each other.
“You are dismissed,” said the little wizard, and the couple moved out of the courtroom, along
with a few other people from the stands who must have been their family members. Then he
reached into the bowls to draw the next numbers from each group.
On and on it went. The bindings were short, efficient, and after the fifteenth one Draco found
his attention wandering. The monotony was broken only by the occasional stifled sob,
usually from the witches’ side. The wizards all seemed to be uniformly resigned to their fate.
They worked through eighty-five couples before they broke for lunch, though the unmatched
participants were not released because they were deemed flight risks. Instead, the Ministry
provided a rather nice meal, and after they had all eaten the Matching Ceremony resumed.
The number of witches and wizards slowly started to dwindle.
As they were picked off one by one, Draco’s gaze continued to be pulled to Granger. Unlike
him, she must have packed a change of clothes when she left her own wedding because she
was shockingly casual in muggle jeans, a tee-shirt, and the same trainers he had seen her
wear under her wedding dress that day. Most of the other attendees had made some effort to
dress up. At least a quarter of the witches were wearing white or ivory, and most of the
wizards were wearing dress robes or muggle suits. Draco, of course, was still wearing the
dress robes from his own wedding the previous Saturday, and he noticed his parents, Astoria,
and Beatrice all glowering at his robes as though they were responsible for Draco’s
unwelcome behavior.
Granger had clearly run this morning or tried to at any rate. She was disheveled, her hair
even more wild than Draco remembered, almost as though she and Potter had scuffled.
Draco went cold at the thought.
Why was she here? Surely Potter hadn’t caught her and made her come? Draco knew that
Potter could track her, but after the deadline passed the previous night there was no reason to
try to force the issue any more. The Ministry would not recognize any marriages that took
place between midnight the previous night and the beginning of the Matching Ceremony
today. Potter must have dragged her here to make her comply with the law instead of letting
her run for it.
Draco found his lip curling at the thought. Didn’t Potter owe her everything? Draco
certainly felt like he owed Granger for the tip she gave him in Hogsmeade, not to mention the
years of cruelty he inflicted upon her before and during the war. He was more than happy to
give her a leg up on her journey to freedom, which was why he had offered their chateau as a
place to lie low. Why wouldn’t Potter give one of his best friends the courtesy to let her go?
Granger generally ignored Draco, preferring instead to glare at the Ministry officials and
occasionally Potter and Weasley, all of whom Draco could see were being added to her shit
list one by one. Kingsley Shacklebolt, in particular, was the source of much of her ire, but he
wasn’t the only recipient of her disdain. She appeared to be committing them all to memory
as she wholly ignored the ceremonies taking place at the front of the room. The Ministry
representatives and the assortment of Weasleys and Potters held her entire attention.
It wasn’t until Anthony Goldstein was called that Granger perked up and started to watch
what was happening at the front of the room.
“Good luck,” muttered Draco as Goldstein took a calming breath next to him. He couldn’t
recall ever exchanging a single word with Goldstein during Hogwarts, but the other wizard
had been pleasant enough today. Perhaps Draco would owl him to meet for drinks when this
was all over and they could commiserate.
Draco glanced at Granger and saw she was staring at Goldstein with her eyes slightly
narrowed. Did Granger know him well? Was she hoping to be selected?
But before Draco could work this out, the tiny wizard called, “Number one hundred and
twenty-two… Leanne Parks!”
A petite blonde witch that Draco distantly recognized straightened up.
“Oh God,” muttered Goldstein.
“What?” hissed Draco.
“Leanne… I had a huge crush on her at Hogwarts…” he whispered.
“Well that’s good, isn’t it?” asked Draco under his breath.
“No. She hated me… I was always such a prat trying to get her attention…”
“Mr. Goldstein! Miss Parks!” called the little wizard.
“If I go missing you can assume she killed me…” moaned Goldstein as he made his way
down to the front. Draco found himself chuckling a little before catching his mother’s glare
and clearing his throat to wipe the smile off his face.
Based on the look Leanne was giving Goldstein, Draco made a mental note to send that owl
within the next twenty-four hours. He rather thought somebody should check on Goldstein to
obtain proof of life.
“Now then. Mr. Goldstein, do you consent to this marriage?”
“Yes, of course,” said Goldstein quietly.
“Very good. And Miss Parks, do you consent as well?”
Leanne paused and said nothing, and whispers broke out. Draco glanced at Granger and saw
her leaning forward a bit. Evidently she found this particular match to be just as interesting
as Draco did.
“Miss Parks?” prompted the little wizard.
“If I must,” she ground out.
“I’m afraid that’s not –” he started.
“Fine! Yes, I consent!” she huffed.
Draco looked at Granger and saw she appeared to be faintly disappointed, and then he peered
at Goldstein who looked defeated. Draco couldn’t help but feel sympathetic. Goldstein was
marrying a witch he clearly still admired, but who obviously loathed him. What on earth
would that be like?
They went through the short ceremony, and then Goldstein gestured for Leanne to go ahead
of him to leave the courtroom. He caught Draco’s eye on the way out, and Draco gave him a
small nod of encouragement. Goldstein just sighed and slunk out.
Several more couples were called, and Draco was just starting to get bored again, when the
little wizard called, “Number two hundred and seventy-three… Ronald Weasley!”
Whispers broke out again, and Draco straightened up. He could see Weasley’s ears had gone
red, a sure sign of stress.
Pick Astoria. Pick Astoria. Pick Astoria
Draco prayed to every deity he had ever heard of that this match would kill two birds with
one stone. Astoria still had not been called, and the number of witches was dwindling.
He glanced up at Potter and the enormous number of redheads surrounding him, and they all
looked tense as they waited for the witch to be called. Then Draco glanced across at Granger,
and she was chewing her lip. It was the first sign of nerves Draco had seen from her the
entire day. Rita Skeeter too had perked up, her acid green quill hovering in the air eagerly.
The entire press was on tenterhooks.
Was it just him or was the small wizard taking his time before calling the witch? He
appeared to be enjoying the suspense.
Finally, his hand dove into the bowl and he pulled a number before consulting his list.
“Number seventeen… Prudence Avery!”
Draco let out a great “Ha!” and nearly everyone still present in the courtroom turned to stare
at him. Weasley had an ugly look on his face.
“Have something to say, Malfoy?” he snarled.
Draco just gave a negligent shrug and looked up into the crowd to find Beatrice Greengrass,
who had gone pale.
“Oh nothing much,” said Draco in a voice that carried all the way to her. “It just occurred to
me that the Weasleys will be staying in the Sacred 28 for another generation after all. It’s a
bit ironic, don’t you think?”
At this pronouncement, everyone’s eyes widened, and Rita’s quill burst into action. Weasley
looked like he had been hit by a bludger, and now he looked at Draco uncertainly.
“Do you… know her then?” he asked under his breath.
Draco pursed his lips. There was no love lost between him and Weasley – none whatsoever.
And yet, Draco knew he was at least partially responsible for Weasley being here today.
Draco had, after all, assisted Granger with her escape and subsequent hideout. He decided to
throw Weasley a bone so they would be even, and Draco could go back to despising him in
peace.
“Yes. She’s a little shy, but very kind. Her father was a Death Eater, but she was never
involved in the war. She blames blood politics for wrecking her family. Her father is still in
Azkaban and her mother passed away a few years ago. She has two younger siblings and had
to step up to care for them. She really likes kids.”
Weasley’s eyes widened at this, but he looked relieved as he rose to head to the middle of the
room. Draco saw Granger whispering quietly to Prudence on the other side. Prudence gave
her a tight smile and rose as well.
“Ahem,” said the small wizard. “Right then. Mr. Weasley, do you consent to this marriage?”
“I do,” he said in a surprisingly confident voice. Prudence gave him a small smile.
“And Miss Avery, do you consent as well?”
“Yes, I do,” she said softly.
“Very well.”
The wizard performed the ceremony, and dismissed them both. Weasley bent down to say
something to Prudence who nodded. Instead of leaving, they both made their way into the
crowd. Draco watched Prudence hesitate for just a moment before following Weasley to join
his enormous family. There were whispered greetings, and she shook several hands, before
they both sat down and turned to watch.
Of course, thought Draco. The Weasleys and Potter were staying for Granger and Prudence
was staying for Astoria. They were nearing the end anyway and would probably be done
within the next hour.
Draco listened as names that were not his were pulled from the bowl. The mantra in his head
continued to grow stronger with each coupling.
Pick Astoria. Pick Astoria. Pick Astoria.
But she wasn’t picked. And by the time there were just ten wizards left, Draco had to raise
his occlumency walls again to quiet the slowly growing panic that was starting to unfurl in
his mind. Odds were still good he wouldn’t end up with her, but those odds were narrowing
with each draw.
He glanced at his parents and saw they were watching with rapt attention now, looking back
and forth between Draco and Astoria. While Draco’s hope dimmed, theirs seemed to grow as
there were eight wizards left and then six wizards and then three wizards and then finally just
two left, including him. Astoria still had not been called.
The mood from the witches had been steadily improving as well. At this point there were
seventeen of them and just two wizards. Odds were in all of their favor that they would make
it out of the Matching Ceremony without a husband, and if they didn’t… well the remaining
options weren’t that bad.
Draco and the other wizard glanced at each other. He was a couple years older than Draco,
but rather attractive with a square jaw and dark hair. Draco’s knowledgeable eye swept over
the cut of his robes and his polished shoes. He was clearly well-off, wearing clothes that
were tailored almost as well as Draco’s. Whoever he was, he had both looks and money.
Draco knew that he did too.
Most of the witches seemed to feel there were no bad options at this point. Only Granger still
appeared to be irritated. Even Astoria was looking optimistic, and Draco knew she was so
placid that if they were matched she would probably give him the cold shoulder for a few
days but then decide to do her duty anyway.
Duty.
He occluded the thought.
“Number two hundred and sixty-four… Michael Spencer!”
Draco nodded to the other wizard and then exhaled as he sank back into his chair.
Pick Astoria. Pick Astoria. Pick Astoria.
“Number one hundred and eleven…”
Draco closed his eyes and prayed.
“... Isobel MacDougal!”
Fuck.
They both rose and made their way to the middle of the room. There was an odd rushing
sound in Draco’s ears, and he could barely hear what they were saying. He glanced up at his
parents, who were clutching each other’s hands and then at Beatrice Greengrass who now
looked ecstatic.
Of course, Draco thought bitterly. Either Astoria secures the Malfoy match they always
wanted or she gets another year to find somebody else.
Draco knew Beatrice well enough to know that she was crafting a backup plan at this very
moment. Sure enough, he saw her casting an appraising look at Blaise, who was chewing on
his lip nervously as he watched Draco, wholly unaware that he was being sized up from afar.
Blaise wasn’t Sacred 28, but he was technically a pureblood five generations deep and a
rather wealthy one at that thanks to his mother’s many marriages. The Greengrasses needed
William to secure the appropriate match that would keep their Sacred 28 status intact. That
meant they could compromise with Astoria if they needed to, and Blaise would still keep her
children pure. Draco could see Beatrice’s mind turning this over and over again as she
waited for Draco’s turn.
Draco made a mental note to inform Blaise of Beatrice’s schemes the moment he was free of
this place — assuming, of course, that he didn’t end up with Astoria himself. Blaise was a
perfectly capable wizard, but Beatrice could be formidable when she put her mind to
something.
Before he knew it, the previous couple had moved off, and then the small wizard glanced at
Draco.
“This will obviously be our final pairing for the year.”
He pulled the last card from the wizards’ bowl and cleared his throat. “Ahem… Number
forty-nine, Draco Malfoy!”
Draco just stared straight ahead.
Not Astoria. Not Astoria. Not Astoria.
He had a one in sixteen chance of ending up with her. Surely, surely luck would be on his
side this time. It just had to be. Draco was fighting the urge to occlude himself into an
oblivion. He had to hear the name before he succumbed to that numbness.
The tiny wizard paused for dramatic effect, and Draco wanted to crucio him. Rita’s quill was
hovering eagerly, and it seemed like every person in the room was holding their breath.
Slowly, the wizard lowered his hand into the witches’ bowl and pulled out the final card. He
glanced at the number and consulted his list before pausing for a full ten seconds.
He cleared his throat.
“Ahem… yes. Well, here we have Number Two Hundred and Eighty-Eight… Hermione
Granger!”
There was silence for a split second as Draco’s occlumency walls collapsed with sheer relief
that it wasn’t Astoria. Then the courtroom erupted.
“NO!” cried at least six voices. Draco glanced up and thought they came from his mother,
his father, Potter, Weasley, Beatrice, and to his utter shock Kingsley Shacklebolt. He looked
across the room at Granger, who was staring back at him with the most peculiar expression
on her face.
Draco wouldn’t have been surprised to find her looking at him with horror or disgust.
Despite their interactions over the previous few days, there were years of negative history
between them, and while she might not hate him anymore, she surely wouldn’t want to marry
him either. He had been joking when he proposed to her over the weekend, and he was
certain she knew it. He never once considered the possibility that he might actually end up
with her after all that. Even when she arrived at the Matching Ceremony he didn’t really
think of it, being largely preoccupied by his sincere wish to avoid Astoria. Any thoughts he
had of her were simply ruminations about all the things that must have gone wrong to bring
her to the Ministry today.
But she wasn’t looking disgusted at all. Her expression could best be described as
thoroughly satisfied.
Hermione Granger, it appeared, had gotten exactly what she wanted.
Things had just become very interesting.
Draco raised a single eyebrow at her and then tilted his head toward the crowd as if to say,
See? I told you we could kill the lot of them if we got married.
The tiniest ghost of a smile crossed Granger’s face at this, and she dipped her head ever so
slightly in acknowledgment.
The protests from the gallery seemed to fade away as they stared at each other from across
the courtroom.
Hermione Granger… my wife.
The notion was… compelling. Draco found he didn’t mind it. He didn’t mind it at all. In
fact, compared to the available alternatives he was rather in favor of it. No doubt he would
have to watch his back around her, but everything about her would be unexpected. Draco
would never be bored again.
They both rose and made their way to the middle of the room, ignoring the sobs that were
now coming from Narcissa, Beatrice, and Molly Weasley. The small wizard raised his hand
for silence and after a long while the room quieted, with just the stray hiccup emerging from
the crowd.
“Very well. Mr. Malfoy… do you consent to this marriage?”
“Yes, I do. Rather enthusiastically, as it happens.”
Granger blinked in surprise, and he heard his mother’s voice screech, “WHAT?!”
Draco ignored her and just smirked at Granger who cocked her head to study him a bit.
“And Miss Granger…” said the wizard, “Do you consent as well?”
“Hmmm, no…” she murmured. “No, I’m afraid I can’t consent to this.”
There was another stunned silence, and then whispering broke out. Ink was flying from
Rita’s quill, and disappointment bloomed inside of Draco from somewhere deep. He couldn’t
understand it. What on earth was she saying?
Was she rejecting him? Draco knew he had been a prat. He knew Granger didn’t really like
him, playful notes from the previous weekend notwithstanding. But she hadn’t looked at him
with disgust and she seemed pleased for the first time all day when her name was called.
What was happening?
“I’m sorry,” said the wizard nervously. “Perhaps I wasn’t clear. Do you –”
“No, I don’t consent to this marriage. I do not consent to marrying anybody as a result of this
ridiculous law.”
Oh.
Draco’s stomach eased. Granger was just Grangering. This sort of thing was her modus
operandi. Of course it was. She wasn’t rejecting Draco, she was rejecting the entire premise
of the MLPP.
Draco settled in to watch the show.
“Miss Granger,” came Kingsley Shacklebolt’s deep voice. “I must inform you that failure to
consent will result in an Azkaban sentence until you become willing.”
“Oh I’m very aware,” she said coldly.
Draco studied Shacklebolt. He appeared nervous and was glancing at the members of the
press, all of whom were hanging on their every word.
“Miss Granger…”
“Kingsley,” she said, and Draco heard his mother and a few others gasp. She was calling him
by his first name, completely ignoring his title.
“Miss Granger,” he gritted out. “It would behoove you to consent.”
“Let me be clear,” said Granger smoothly. “You wish for me to consent to marry a man who
was my childhood bully. Presumably you also believe I should move to Malfoy Manor,
where I was tortured during the war? Perhaps we should consummate the marriage in the
drawing room where the entire Malfoy family watched me be tortured? Do you think Lucius
and Narcissa would like to watch again?”
Shock.
There was absolute silence for a moment before it was broken by the furious scratching of
Rita’s quill. Draco looked up at his friends, who were all watching him worriedly, and even
his parents appeared to have no idea how to react to this.
As for Draco, he felt sick. He felt so sick he couldn’t even occlude. Her words cut straight
through his attempts.
“Miss Granger, I –” started Shacklebolt. His face was turning gray, but Granger wasn’t done
yet.
“You do realize that Draco here has the legal right to rape me if I consent to this marriage?
The law provides that intercourse must occur on a monthly basis at minimum, or at any other
time one spouse desires it. That means that he could rape me. Hell, I could rape him. And
that is what every other couple who got married today will be risking. You have gutted the
marital rape laws as part of this mad plan of yours.”
Draco’s stomach turned, and he forced the bile back down.
“We have built in three months for –”
“Ha,” Granger scoffed. “That means nothing, and you know it. You have taken away every
bit of bodily autonomy witches and wizards enjoy, all in the name of grandchildren.”
Now Granger turned to address other senior members of the Wizengamot, who were listening
to her with growing unease.
“Is that worth it? Are you pleased to know that your daughters and sons could be raped in
order to provide you with your precious grandchildren? Was that a better plan than the one I
proposed that involved financial incentives and tax breaks for marriage and children? Are
you aware that the marital rape laws are uniform and don’t just apply to those of us who are
getting married today, but to all marriages? Perhaps your own spouse will pin you down to
get a leg over before this mad law is repealed.”
“Miss Granger!” said Shacklebolt in an angry voice.
“It’s true, Kingsley, as I’ve been telling you ever since the draft legislation came out! Every
bit of it is true. And not only that, but let’s not forget that nothing about the Marriage Law
and Procreation Plan demands fidelity, does it? You all want babies. You want babies from
anybody who is willing to give them to you. Who is to say that your beloved grandchildren
will really be yours? Perhaps the couples who are being forced to wed so expeditiously will
seek comfort from people they know. Or maybe they will be abused by others who are now
in close proximity to them. In my case, you are asking me to join the Malfoy family. It’s
conceivable that Draco would treat me fairly well. But if his father – a convicted Death Eater
who once tried to turn me over to Voldemort – decides to put the little mudblood bitch in her
place, he could impregnate me and there is nothing at all I could do about it.”
Again, the room was stunned to breathlessness at what she was saying. Involuntarily, Draco
looked up at his parents. His mother looked faint. His father… well, his father looked
positively dangerous.
“Miss Granger, are you saying that Lucius Malfoy –” started Kingsley.
“I am speaking in hypotheticals,” she said airily. “But that does not change the fact that
witches everywhere are now at risk for such behaviors. Voluntary termination of any magical
pregnancy has been forbidden except to save the life of the mother, and the penalties for
sexual assault have been eased. It’s almost like you all want it to happen.”
She glared at the members of the Wizengamot who were all very pale now.
“Hermione,” pleaded Shacklebolt. “I can’t make an exception for you. It’s the law…”
“I’m not asking for an exception,” she said, and she appeared to be offended by the very
suggestion. “I’m asking you to call an emergency session of the Wizengamot to repeal this
ridiculous law! Offer a path for annulment for the marriages that took place today. I
seriously doubt that any of them have been consummated in the last six hours. I sent copies
of proposed legislation to every Wizengamot member this morning that would fix the mess
you have created. That’s one reason why I was… delayed this morning.”
She glanced at Potter now and scowled, as Draco’s eyebrows flew up. He looked at his
parents again and he saw his father was now watching her with a calculated expression. As
for Draco, he was utterly spellbound. He knew that everything she was saying was correct,
but he felt such shame as she laid the Malfoy sins bare. She was holding his family up as an
example of everything that could go wrong in an arranged marriage like this because they
were easy fodder for it. They had treated her horribly. They had all watched as she was
tortured. Hell, his father even tried to call the Dark Lord before Bellatrix did that day.
Draco’s brief excitement at being matched with her withered and died as he realized why she
was so pleased to hear her name called with his. He was the single worst choice in the entire
group for her. He was a wizard that most in the room believed was capable of mistreating
her. Even the few people who knew that Draco wouldn’t behave that way still believed that
Lucius would. Granger had been against this law for months — he had read her opinion
pieces in The Daily Prophet now and then. But he didn’t realize she had been fighting it
from the inside as well, even going so far as to provide alternative solutions and legislation.
Evidently she hadn’t been able to make progress with it, so she needed a stunt that would
resonate through the entirety of wizarding Britain. Between the jilting the Saturday before
and the match with Draco now, he knew she had both the Wizengamot’s and the media’s
undivided attention. Draco was sure she couldn’t have planned this better if she had tried.
But how far was she willing to go with it? And where would it leave Draco? A sense of
bitterness was starting to take hold in his gut.
“Miss Granger, I don’t want to send you to Azkaban,” said Shacklebolt in a defeated voice.
“But as you just pointed out,” she said with false sweetness, “it’s the law. It’s the law that
you wrote. And I will not consent to marry Draco Malfoy today. So there you have it
Kingsley. Arrest me.”
The entire room was gaping at her, and she just looked around imperiously.
“Well?” she asked, when nobody moved.
Shacklebolt swallowed. “Auror Potter,” he croaked, nodding toward Granger.
Only now did Draco realize that Potter was the senior-most auror in the room.
“Kingsley, you can’t be serious!” said Potter with dismay.
“Harry, my hands are tied,” he ground out.
“Come on Harry,” said Granger, again with that horribly sweet voice. “You were so eager to
follow the law earlier today weren’t you? What’s stopping you now?”
Potter’s Adam’s apple bobbed, and he took a shuddering breath as he moved forward slowly.
Draco felt a jolt of fear as he stared at Granger’s determined face. Azkaban was the worst
place he had ever been.
“Granger,” he said quietly. He didn’t even bother to hide the note of desperation in his
voice. She might hate him. She might even be using him in a terrible, public way. But he
couldn’t let her do this.
She glanced at him.
“Granger, just marry me. I swear I’m not as bad as I used to be in school. And nobody will
do those… things to you. I won’t allow it.”
Her expression softened just a bit. “I can’t, Malfoy. Not today, at any rate.”
“You would really rather go to Azkaban than marry me?” he whispered. He truly had no idea
how to feel about this. He was humiliated, disappointed, and very hurt. But he also felt a
glimmer of respect for her convictions. All of it was warring in Draco’s head. He wished he
could occlude, but something about Granger made him feel every single thing.
An apologetic look crossed her face. “No. I would much rather marry you. But I can’t do
it. I have to go to Azkaban so Kingsley doesn’t win this,” she replied quietly.
Draco slumped. He supposed it was a small consolation that she preferred him over
Azkaban. Then again, it made no difference. This was the very essence of Hermione
Granger. He had no possibility of changing her mind in the next few minutes.
“Miss Granger, you and Mr. Malfoy are affianced,” piped up the little wizard as Potter
approached them awkwardly. “Miss Granger, according to the Marriage Law and Procreation
Plan, you may consent to marry Mr. Malfoy at any time, and you will be immediately
released.”
Granger nodded placidly at this.
“Mr. Malfoy,” continued the wizard, and Draco snapped to attention. “You are still bound to
Miss Granger and may not seek another wife while she is in custody.”
The smallest glimmer of hope sparked inside of Draco at these words. He would be leaving
today unmarried, but also safe from Astoria. And he would have his freedom. It was truly a
scenario he could not have foreseen.
Then he remembered that Granger would not be free, and he immediately felt guilty about the
relief he felt.
“Is that all then?” asked Granger with a superior expression.
“Yes, Mr. Potter… you may… proceed,” said the wizard a bit hesitantly.
Potter approached Granger very reluctantly, as she cast a cold eye over him. But before she
held out her hands to accept the magical handcuffs Potter produced, she raised her right
middle finger to her lips and blew a slow kiss directly toward Shacklebolt. Fire danced in her
eyes, and Draco watched as she started to burn with it.
The cameras flashed to capture every perfect moment, and Draco knew that Granger’s
enormous fuck you was going to be a picture they would print over and over again in the
coming days.
As Draco watched his fiancée be handcuffed and escorted out of the courtroom by her best
friend, he couldn’t tear his gaze away. Her head was held high, and she gave him one last,
piercing look with a small, conspiratorial nod as she swept out.
Don’t take it personally, she was telling him. This has nothing to do with you, and it’s much
bigger than either of us.
Draco unconsciously nodded back. Somehow, he had found himself squarely in the middle
of Hermione Granger’s plan to object to the MLPP, and he was trying to communicate to her
that he was here, and he was in.
All the air seemed to be sucked from the room as Draco’s eyes tracked her, and he saw a
small smile flit across her face as she turned from him. His anger, embarrassment, and
frustration were swept aside as he watched her be led out of the room, leaving behind
something so unfamiliar that Draco struggled to identify it.
But as he remembered her middle finger touching her lips to flip off the most powerful man
in wizarding Britain, understanding arrived in a flash. Or rather, it came from below.
Because in that moment his cock emerged from its years-long hibernation and actually
twitched.
Well that was certainly interesting.
Chapter 4: Inmate 8724.
Two hours later.
Draco sat in the drawing room where Granger had once been tortured, surrounded by his
three best friends and his mother as Lucius paced in front of them.
Upon Granger’s departure, the courtroom had erupted into chaos once more, the press
clamoring for a quote from Shacklebolt and from him. Draco was rescued by Theo’s quick
thinking, as he practically threw himself down the stairs to make his way toward Draco and
gripped his arm to lead him firmly out the door before he could open his mouth and spill his
feelings before the press.
Draco was grateful for his quick intervention, and moments later Blaise and Pansy were there
too, blocking him off from view.
“We have to go back to the Manor,” said Theo in a terse voice. “You’re safe for now, and
you can’t avoid it any longer. Best to get it over with.”
Draco just nodded mutely, knowing that Theo was right about this, and he was grateful for
his friends’ solid show of support behind him. Normally they would give the Malfoys
privacy for something like this, but this was so far from normal that Draco knew that the
typical rules didn’t apply. They weren’t going to leave him alone during this first meeting
with his parents.
Draco had never been more thankful for their loyalty, as he sensed the heat from Blaise’s
body coming from his left and the light perfume Pansy always wore coming from his right.
His friends were his. Sometimes they felt like the only things that were truly his. They all
knew Draco was in for a tongue-lashing, but it would be four against one if Lucius dared to
raise a wand. Lucius couldn’t kill Draco — the family magic prevented it — but that didn’t
mean he couldn’t make Draco hurt.
“IRRESPONSIBLE…UNBELIEVABLE…UTTERLY HUMILIATING…!”
As often happened when his father got started on one of his rants, Draco began to occlude,
and the words washed over him. Once Lucius began, he was capable of going on for ages.
“...A COMPLETE DERELICTION OF DUTY…”
“Fuck duty,” said Draco suddenly.
The words just slipped out, and Draco was barely aware he said anything at all until Lucius
halted and gave him a baffled look.
“Excuse me?” he ground out.
“You heard me,” said Draco. “Fuck duty. I didn’t want to marry Astoria.”
There was silence for a full thirty seconds as his parents absorbed this news and exchanged
meaningful looks with each other.
“My dear, you never said—” started his mother, and Draco just threw her an annoyed look.
“Please. When have I ever expressed even the slightest bit of interest in her? When has she
expressed any interest in me? Never, that’s when. You two are so far up your own arses
about fucking duty that I went along with it to keep the peace. But no more. I can’t do it. I
won’t do it.”
“So you would marry a mudblood then?” asked Lucius coldly. “You would sully your
family’s entire history with that?”
Draco turned to face his father, a surprising trickle of fury pulsing through his veins.
“My fiancée is muggleborn, that’s true. She’s also famous, righteous, Order of Merlin, First
Class. She’s a fucking legend. I would think that even you could see the benefits of aligning
myself with somebody like her.”
“Draco, the things she said…” started his mother before she trailed off.
Draco now turned to her.
“It might have been uncomfortable for you to hear it, but every single thing she said was
true. She doesn’t hold punches. I should know, she hit me once in third year and broke my
nose.”
Narcissa’s eyes widened at this.
“This is unbelievable,” hissed his father. “I understand your views have… softened
somewhat since the war. But there’s softening in the abstract and then there’s the destruction
of a millennia of pristine blood! You must be out of your mind!”
Draco shrugged and began to occlude. “Perhaps if you hadn’t allowed a sociopath to brand
me for the cause I would still believe in it.”
“Draco!” said his mother in a scandalized voice.
“What?” he asked, now turning his dull stare to look at her instead. “Why is that so
surprising to you?”
“The war changed you, I’ll admit that,” said Narcissa slowly. “But it made you grow up. It
gave you self-control. It taught you to moderate your temper and your… tendency toward
rash behaviors. I can’t fathom what changed this weekend.”
Draco’s expression didn’t alter. “No, Mother,” he said. “The war didn’t teach me any of
those things. It taught me to occlude. It taught me to cope by escaping into my own mind,
where I have lived for years. It taught me that blood purity is a fucking farce, and the Dark
Lord – who was a half-blood in case we’ve all forgotten – was more powerful than any
pureblood who came before him. Then he was brought down by a teenager and his two sidekicks, one of whom is muggleborn and has more raw magical power than any other witch or
wizard in our generation. If my views haven’t been clear to you these past few years, it’s
because you’ve been shoving that frigid bitch down my throat for so long that I turned inward
to escape.”
Narcissa looked stricken.
“But why Draco?” she pleaded. “Why is Astoria so distasteful to you? She’s a lovely young
woman. She’s a paragon! She knows precisely what is expected of her, and she will uphold
the Malfoy name and title beautifully!”
“She’s the most uninteresting person I know,” said Draco simply. “She doesn’t care for me,
and I don’t care for her. I have no desire to tie myself to somebody like that for the rest of
my life.”
“So you’d pick the mudblood over the young woman who was made for you, is that it?”
Lucius spat.
Draco shrugged and studied his father. “Say what you want about Granger, but she’s
certainly interesting, is she not? I find myself… intrigued.”
Lucius got an ugly look on his face, and Draco saw his hand twitch toward his wand. The
slight stiffening of Blaise and Pansy next to him told Draco that they had seen this as well,
before Pansy surprised them all by groaning and collapsing into Theo.
“Pansy!” cried Narcissa, leaping to her feet and running to the witch.
“My apologies, Narcissa,” said Pansy a bit faintly. “I’m not feeling my best.”
Pansy’s distraction successfully halted the conversation with Draco’s parents. Everyone
converged on her, and as Narcissa was calling one of the elves to bring water and some food,
Pansy caught his eye and winked.
He mouthed “thank you,” and she just smirked before groaning again.
Draco took advantage of the moment and slipped out of the drawing room to head back to his
bedroom. He had made his position clear with his parents, and there was no reason to engage
with them any further. He wouldn’t marry Astoria, and that was all there was to it. He knew
his father was irate, and Lucius was the type to be coming up with ways to subvert Draco’s
wishes. But Draco had no intention of letting his father win this one. The moment he broke
free of Astoria his mind began to shake off the years of haze, and he got the faintest taste of
freedom. He wouldn’t, couldn’t go back.
Draco turned to the sound of his door opening, and his friends traipsed inside.
“Well that was a fucking shitshow,” Blaise declared, as he moved to the small sideboard
Draco kept in his bedroom and poured himself a drink. He poured drinks for Theo and Draco
too and gave Pansy a sympathetic look as she shook her head and sighed.
“Thanks for the save, Pans,” said Draco.
“No problem,” she replied. “There was nothing more that any of you could have said.”
Draco nodded in agreement, and he took a long sip from his drink as he contemplated his
friends.
“So what are you going to do now?” asked Blaise.
Draco shrugged. “I suppose I’m going to marry Granger.”
His friends exchanged glances with each other.
“And you… don’t mind that?” asked Theo carefully. “I know what you told Lucius, but you
can be honest with us.”
Draco considered this. “No, I don’t mind it. I was entirely honest. She’s very…
interesting.”
“She’s reckless is what she is,” said Blaise.
“Maybe. But she’s also witty. I didn’t have a chance to tell you, but I really did run into her
in Hogsmeade after I left the wedding. The Prophet got that much right at any rate. I puked
all over her, and then she recommended a muggle hotel where I could lie low. She ended up
at a hotel down the street, and we owled each other all weekend.”
His friends gaped at him.
“You… owled each other?” asked Blaise.
“Sure,” said Draco, shrugging. “Potter managed to land a tracking spell on her, and he and
Weasley were camped outside of her door. I was sending her food so she wouldn’t starve,
and she was giving me muggle TV recommendations to pass the time.”
Theo lit up at this. “What were her recommendations then?”
Draco opened his mouth to respond, but was cut off by Pansy shoving her husband lightly.
“Not now Theo. I need to hear more about this.”
She turned back to Draco. “So what… you two are friends now? Is that it?”
Draco shrugged. “Not really, but I don’t think we’re enemies anymore either. She referred to
me as a pretentious git all weekend, but she also taught me how to use a muggle remote
control so I wouldn’t expire from sheer boredom. We seemed to reach… detente.”
“Detente,” said Pansy skeptically.
“Yes, detente,” agreed Draco. “Not friends, but not enemies either.”
“So all that shit she said during the Matching Ceremony…” began Blaise.
Draco felt a lurch of embarrassment.
“She was speaking in hypotheticals,” he said quietly, as he turned to stare out the window.
“I’ve never thought about it very much, but I suspect she is correct about all of it. The MLPP
practically encourages spousal rape, doesn’t it? And it could put somebody like her in a very
precarious situation given… certain political leanings. It’s not just asinine, it’s dangerous.
She was pointing that out.”
There was an uncomfortable silence at this.
“Draco…” said Theo quietly.
Draco turned to look at him.
“Was she telling the truth? About being tortured in the drawing room, I mean?”
Draco went cold, and he could tell his friends saw his expression change.
“It was Bellatrix,” he said quietly. “She was dead after the war, so Granger never really
spoke up about it until today. There aren’t many who know the details.”
“And you all watched?” prodded Blaise carefully.
Draco just nodded. “My parents asked me to identify her and the others, and I delayed a little
bit… but I couldn’t do anything to help once Bella arrived. She recognized Granger
immediately. She was crazy, you know that.”
“And your parents?” asked Pansy.
Draco hesitated.
“Tell us, Draco,” said Pansy. “I think we need to know.”
Draco sighed. “Yes, they watched too. In fact, they argued with Bella over who would get to
turn over Potter to the Dark Lord. And I think Bella offered Granger to Grayback if memory
serves.”
“Fuck,” said Theo quietly.
Draco just inclined his head.
“You’re going to have your work cut out for you then,” said Pansy.
Draco lifted his eyes to look at her.
“What do you mean?”
She gave him an incredulous look. “What do you think I mean? Even if you two have
reached this detente, she’s still going to resist marrying into your family. And as annoying
and self-righteous as she is, I can’t say I blame her if your parents really did that to her. My
point is, if you want to marry her before Lucius finds a way to force Astoria on you, then
you’re going to need to work quickly. If I’m Granger, then I want some reassurance that I’m
safe here. I want to know that my husband doesn’t despise me. And I need some reason to
go against every single instinct that’s telling me this is a terrible idea and agree to marry you
anyway. I thought she was being dramatic by choosing Azkaban over you, but she really
might feel safer there than Malfoy Manor.”
Coldness crept over Draco as he considered Pansy’s words. She was right of course, except
for one thing.
“I asked Granger if she preferred Azkaban over marrying me,” said Draco quietly.
“And?” prompted Theo.
Draco shrugged. “She said no. But she said she had to do it so Shacklebolt wouldn’t win.”
Pansy opened her mouth to react to this, when she was cut off by a tapping at the window.
An owl Draco didn’t recognize was hovering there, waiting to be let in. Draco looked at it
curiously, but he let it in and pulled the parchment off its leg. It took off without awaiting a
response. His hands were shaking slightly as he opened it.
Dear Lord Malfoy,
This letter is to inform you that Miss Hermione Jean Granger (inmate number 8724) has
arrived at Azkaban Prison and has been booked in semi-solitary confinement per the
applicable provisions of the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan. As her legal next-of-kin, I
must inform you that the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan permits you to exercise your
conjugal rights with at least twelve hours’ written notice. Additionally, you are to be given
reports of any visitors she receives and any disciplinary proceedings that take place against
Miss Granger. This is for informational purposes only in accordance with the Azkaban
Reform Act of 2001.
In furtherance of the above, please note that on 1 September 2003 Miss Granger received the
following visitors:
Harry Potter (designated auror in charge during initial booking)
Ginevra Potter
Kingsley Shacklebolt
Rita Skeeter
Arthur Weasley
Molly Weasley
Ronald Weasley
Miss Granger declined all visitors after she was brought into custody.
Additionally, the following disciplinary actions were taken against Miss Granger on 1
September 2003:
Physical contusion of the face and head due to failure to submit her wand during the initial
booking process. Miss Granger was revived and healed.
If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to write.
I am, yours most truly,
Lawrence Boles
Head Warden
Draco gaped at the letter and read it twice. Then he spun to stare at his friends.
“Listen to this!”
He read it out loud, and all three of them looked as perturbed as Draco felt when he reached
the end.
“She was right then,” said Pansy quietly. “They’re practically inviting sexual assault, aren’t
they? I suppose you’re considered her next-of-kin because you’re affianced under this
ridiculous law. Even if she can stop other visitors, she can’t stop you if you decide you want
to have sex with her in Azkaban. They must have written it that way to encourage these
‘visits,’ even if one party was unwilling. Bloody hell, this is crazy.”
“And they beat her,” said Draco, as he read about the disciplinary actions, a dark anger
coursing through him as he read about it. “I can’t believe they told me.”
“They have to,” said Theo. “I got similar reports for my father before he died last year.”
Draco glanced at Theo in confusion. Theo had never told him this.
“Wait. Really?”
Theo nodded. “It was one of Granger’s landmark pieces of legislation, actually. She’s the
reason the dementors are no longer there and those who are designated as next-of-kin get
reports about visitors and the treatment of inmates. Supposedly it’s all embedded with some
novel spell she created so the warden can’t lie about it either. It’s meant to give family
members insight about what’s happening to prisoners, and it gives them the opportunity to
hire lawyers if things get too far out of line.”
Draco gaped. He had heard of the Azkaban Reform Act of course, but he had occluded most
of the details. He didn’t like to be reminded of that terrible place, and Lucius had been
released a couple months before it passed.
“Is that why she wasn’t afraid to go then?” asked Blaise suddenly. “She knew what it would
be like?”
“Maybe,” Theo shrugged. “At the very least she knew there would be a record of how she’s
treated.”
“And maybe that’s why Shacklebolt was so against it…” said Pansy slowly.
“Fuck,” whispered Draco as he looked down at the letter again. Then his eyes met Theo’s.
“What else will they tell you?” he asked intently.
Theo shrugged. “They tell you whenever they’re disciplined or injured by another inmate –
though I suppose in Granger’s case she’ll be safe from that if she’s mostly in solitary. There
are weekly visits with a healer, but they let you know of any medical visits that aren’t
routine. They also let you know if the prisoner is making any special requests.”
“Like what?”
“Books, newspapers, that sort of thing. They are permitted certain kinds of mental
stimulation now, but it’s limited and has to be provided by the next-of-kin. Azkaban doesn’t
supply those things.”
“Bloody hell she’s probably going to ask for the contents of my entire library,” muttered
Draco.
“Well if you really want to marry her, you should give her whatever she asks for,” said Pansy
firmly. “And after reading this…” and now she gestured at the letter, “I believe you when
you say she was doing it to fuck with Shacklebolt.”
“What do you mean?” asked Draco quickly. He knew that was what Granger said, but he
needed to believe it. Merlin, he needed to believe she was telling the truth. If she really
preferred Azkaban over marrying him, Draco would probably have to occlude again.
Pansy shrugged. “Evidently you have the legal right to force yourself on her whether she’s
married to you or not. You know what an enormous swot she is. Granger probably knew that
when she told Shacklebolt to arrest her. She wasn’t trying to avoid you, Draco. She can’t
avoid you, not really. This is just a stunt to make Shacklebolt look bad.”
Draco remembered the satisfied expression on her face when her name was called, and
something inside of him eased just a little.
Pansy was right of course. It was clear that Granger knew this law intimately. She didn’t
appear frightened or worried when she was matched with Draco. She wasn’t scared of him.
She decided to make an example out of him, it was true, but Draco sensed no real trepidation
from her. Draco knew he would never force himself on a woman, not ever. But how could
Granger know that for sure? He had been a Death Eater…
“Erm, Pansy… can I ask you something?” said Draco quietly.
Pany raised her eyebrow in invitation for him to continue.
“Do witches… know?”
“Know what?” she asked in confusion.
“Know when a bloke is dangerous? Or willing to do… that to them?”
She looked thoughtful. “Certainly not always, but sometimes, yes. It’s just… a feeling.
Some blokes are creepier than others.”
“Who?” asked Theo immediately, his expression darkening.
Pansy hesitated.
“Who Pans?” he insisted.
She pursed her lips. “Well at school, Goyle gave me those vibes. So did Cormac
McLaggen.”
“Granger went with him to some party once, didn’t she?” asked Blaise.
Pansy nodded. “Yes. I was patrolling that night and caught her hexing him so he would keep
his hands to himself. I helped her, and she got away. It was the one and only time we were
cordial to each other at Hogwarts.”
Draco felt his lip curl. Fucking McLaggen?
“So you’re saying her instincts about that sort of thing are bad,” said Theo.
“Not at all. She’s just willing to flirt with danger if she gets something out of it. Surely you
all know that.”
Draco did know that, but it didn’t make him feel any better.
“What could she have possibly gotten from McLaggen?” he asked with consternation.
Pansy just rolled her eyes. “It made Weasley jealous, of course. Granger’s a big girl. I’m
sure she thought she could manage McLaggen for one night if it meant taunting Weasley.”
“And her opinions about me…” said Draco quietly.
Pansy cast him a sympathetic look. “She’s not scared of you Draco, if that’s what you’re
asking. You don’t give off creepy vibes. You never have. Granger’s comments about you
being allowed to rape her were inflammatory because evidently they’re true.” Pansy pointed
toward the letter again. “But that doesn’t mean she thinks you would actually do it. She
would have been terrified of you if that was the case.”
Draco huffed out a breath, feeling marginally better.
“So what now?” he wondered out loud.
“Now you exercise your conjugal rights,” said Pansy promptly.
Draco glanced at her in alarm. “Excuse me? We were just saying how I would never…”
“Not like that,” she said, rolling her eyes. “I mean you go talk to her. You are the only
person she can’t turn away, and based on what I saw in that courtroom today, I don’t think
she would mind a visit from you. She looked like she wanted to cruciate every other person
on this list at one point or another, but she actually seemed pleased with you. Write to
Azkaban for a conjugal visit. Show her that you won’t take anything from her she doesn’t
want to give. Then listen to what she has to say. You won’t be able to convince her to marry
you if you’re aiming blind.”
“Pansy’s right,” said Blaise. “You know Lucius is going to be working on some scheme to
match you with Astoria again. You need to work fast, and this is your in.”
“Agreed,” said Theo. “Granger’s incredibly stubborn, and I don’t think an Azkaban stint by
itself is going to sway her.”
Draco bit his lip and read the letter one more time, and then he checked his watch. He had to
give them twelve hours’ notice.
“Fine,” said Draco, and he slipped out a piece of parchment jot off a quick note. A few
minutes later he watched his owl grow smaller in the distance. His first conjugal visit would
be scheduled for the following day.

2 September 2003
Draco was led into a small room with a basic bed and thin linens. It was shoved up against a
wall, under a miniscule window that had magically enhanced bars on it. In one corner there
was a tiny round table and a couple of chairs secured to the floor. Draco shook off the guard
and lowered himself into one of them.
He looked around and tried not to shiver. Even though the dementors were gone, he could
still feel their essence. It was in the very stone itself and made the whole place feel
unnaturally cold.
The guards of Azkaban were a mixed bunch. While none of them had been Death Eaters or
convicted criminals themselves, some were sympathizers. Others were firmly on the side of
Harry Potter. And all of them were here because of the power trip it gave them to exert
authority over their prisoners.
The guard who had escorted Draco here today seemed to be a Death Eater sympathizer, if his
treatment of Draco was any indication. He didn’t taunt Draco for his prior stay, and he gave
Draco a knowing leer when Draco presented himself for a conjugal visit.
After depositing Draco into the room, the guard left to fetch Granger. Draco did his best to
project an air of authority, as though this place of his nightmares wasn’t affecting him. He
raised his occlumency walls just enough to take the edge off. For some reason he didn’t want
to occlude around Granger, but he didn’t think he would be able to manage this conversation
with her without a leg up.
That morning, Draco had called an emergency meeting with his solicitors to get a crash
course on the MLPP and the Azkaban Reform Act. He needed to know what his rights were
and who would be watching when he visited Granger for the first time. He was certain that
his father had spies, and this visit would be reported back to Lucius if it was monitored. To
Draco’s surprise the conjugal visit itself was private — evidently the drafters of the MLPP
wanted to make sure there were no barriers to performance — but Draco knew that every
interaction with a guard might make it back to his father.
He had spent the last few hours considering the message he wanted to send to Lucius.
He was pulled out of his thoughts as the door opened, and Granger was brought in, being led
by the same guard who escorted Draco into the room. Her hair was loose and slightly damp,
the curls heavy over her shoulders. She was barefoot, her toes oddly cheerful and painted hot
pink, and she was wearing loose cotton trousers and a matching V-neck shirt. The shirt was
too large for her, and Draco’s eyes unconsciously roved over her. Evidently she had not been
allowed a bra, and he could see her nipples peaking under the fabric.
Draco swallowed and forced his face to remain impassive as she was presented to him.
“Here’s your fiancée,” said the guard with another leer.
He pulled Granger’s hair back over her shoulders to give Draco a clear view of what she was
wearing. He touched her neck as he did it, and Granger shuddered ever so slightly. She was
handcuffed and couldn’t stop him.
“She’s mine, not yours,” said Draco in his best aristocratic drawl.
The guard glowered, but Draco just raised an eyebrow.
“Just having a little fun,” he pouted. “She’s only a mudblood.”
“And as I said, she’s mine. Once she comes to her senses, she’ll be my Lady Malfoy. I
strongly suggest you keep that in mind as you interact with her.”
The guard gave him an ugly look. “We both know the Ministry’s only after one thing.
What’s it to you?”
Draco stood up and strode toward the guard so quickly, he blinked in surprise and reflexively
released Granger. Draco was several inches taller than him, and he committed the bastard’s
face to memory.
“What’s it to me? You dare ask me that when the Ministry has determined that she’s to bear
my heir? You’re young, so perhaps you aren’t aware of who I am or what I’ve done. But
let’s just say that the only reason I’m not in Azkaban today is because I took the Dark Mark
when I was underaged. I had to prove myself first, you know. He didn’t just give them to
anybody. I lived with the Dark Lord in my home for two fucking years, and I rarely
displeased him. I got out of Azkaban on a mere technicality and nothing more. So when I
say that something is mine, I mean it. Do not touch her. Do not speak to her except to offer
her meals or the books and newspapers I will be sending to her. She is here on a temporary
basis, and I can make your life a living hell if you cross me.”
The guard went a bit pale, and he took a step back. He had an ugly look on his face, but
Draco could tell he was nervous.
“Now why don’t you uncuff her? We all know why I’m here, and she’s going to need her
hands for it.”
Granger flushed a bit at this, but she said nothing as a muscle in the guard’s jaw twitched.
“Fine,” he ground out. “You have thirty minutes.”
He released Granger’s cuffs and then moved toward the door. Draco and Granger stared at
each other as the door shut and the lock turned.
She was watching him a bit warily, but she didn’t appear scared. She was massaging her
wrists where the cuffs had been, and Draco reached into a hidden pocket of his robes and
pulled out a tube of cream while he grabbed her hand.
“What are you…” she started, but she trailed off as he began to rub the cream into her wrists.
“I’ve been here before, remember?” he said.
Her eyes narrowed as he dropped her hand and stepped back.
“How did you get it in?”
He snorted. “Simple concealment charm in my robes. The guards are idiots.”
She nodded a little, and he gestured toward the table and chairs.
“So I'm to be Lady Malfoy, huh?” she said as she sat down. “And I’m bearing your heir
now?”
He grinned. “What’s the point of being a Malfoy if you can’t be an arrogant bastard?”
She rolled her eyes at this. “Seriously though, why bother? We both know you’re getting a
fantastic deal out of this.”
Draco sat back and considered her for a moment. “Let’s just say that my father has a lot of
determination. I don’t know what he’s planning yet, but I’m sure he’s planning something.
I’ve been betrothed to Astoria since I was in nappies, and he’s not going to let this go.”
“So you have to act like a caveman because…” she prompted.
He rolled his eyes. “Because every interaction I have with a guard will be reported back to
him. And right now he probably thinks that I’m having second thoughts about my decisions
over the last few days. I want it to be very clear that I am going to continue resisting
Astoria. The Malfoys are rather famously territorial when it comes to their witches, so if I
claim you publicly he’ll know I’m serious. And hopefully it has the added benefit of keeping
those arseholes away from you.”
Her eyebrows went up at that. “You don’t have to pretend when it’s just us. These visits are
private.”
“Who said I’m pretending? I don’t want them to touch you.”
Her eyes narrowed a little.
“Alright,” she finally said. “So to summarize, I’m a pawn in a pissing contest with your
father. And now that you’re in it you’ve decided you actually care about how they treat me.”
Draco’s mouth thinned. This was not going how he had planned.
“Look Granger, I don’t want the guards treating any witch the way they treat you. The fact
that you’re here at all is appalling, and you’re vulnerable. You and I both know it. If I can
put on the ex-Death Eater act and get them to leave you alone, can you blame me for doing
it? As it is, I do have a legal bond with you right now. It makes sense to use it to keep you
safe while you’re here.”
She chewed on her lip a bit, but finally seemed to deflate as she nodded.
Draco exhaled. It was a small victory, he knew, but it was important that she learn to trust
him if he was going to get her to agree to everything he wanted from her.
“Fine,” she said. “You can’t fix everything, but I’ll admit that the innuendos are unwelcome.
I wouldn’t hate it if they stopped.”
Draco nodded. “And what can’t I fix?”
She gave him a wry look. “My lack of knickers for one thing. Evidently going without
undergarments is a brand new Azkaban policy for conjugal visits related to the MLPP. They
want to make sure there’s easy access in case you choose to exercise your rights. They even
gave me a bath first to make sure I was nice and clean for you.”
Draco’s mouth went dry, and he instinctively occluded so he wouldn’t look where his eyes
wanted to look.
She raised an eyebrow when she noticed his eyes didn’t leave her face. “You have
exceptional self-control.”
He swallowed. “Yes, well, I’m an occlumens.”
“Ah. That’s right. I had forgotten. Well I’m not complaining. I’ve gotten my fair share of
oggling today.”
Draco felt distinct displeasure at these words. Somehow, over the last twenty-four hours he
had come to think of Granger as his. He had always been selfish and wasn’t the type to share
very well. The notion that the guards were looking at her while she was dressed for a
conjugal visit — or rather not dressed — was perturbing.
“I’ll make it clear I don’t appreciate that,” he said.
Granger inclined her head in thanks.
“Is there anything else you need?”
She quirked an eyebrow. “Why? Are you hoping I’ll stay in here indefinitely? That leaves
you in a pretty sweet spot doesn’t it? Unmarried but also safe from your ex.”
Draco debated how much to tell her and finally decided he might as well be honest. He
didn’t have time for games.
“Actually, no. I want you to marry me, Granger.”
The stunned look on her face was worth his candor.
“You still want that?” she asked.
“Yes,” he confirmed. “But I also know how stubborn you can be, and I don’t think you’ll
agree to it right away. So in the meantime, I can get you the things you need.”
She frowned. “Why do you want to marry me?”
“Because I don’t want to marry Astoria.”
“But why me?”
He shrugged. “You’re very… interesting.”
“I’m interesting?”
“Yes, interesting. My world is filled with people who are decidedly uninteresting. Astoria’s
the worst of the lot. She’s not a bad person, but she might as well be a mannequin or a pretty
doll who plays dress-up. She has no fire, no passion, no real interests. She’s absolutely
perfect, and I can’t abide it. Any others my parents would choose are similar. You
though…”
Draco allowed himself to survey her including her lack of undergarments he had thus far tried
to avoid.
Fuck.
He gathered his thoughts.
“You are the opposite of that,” he continued. “I would never be bored. Besides, the Ministry
already matched us. When I left my own wedding I decided to make it work with anybody
who wasn’t Astoria. You were actually a pleasant surprise.”
She looked incredulous, but he could see her mind swirling.
“We would kill each other,” she finally said.
“I know. It might be fun, don’t you think?”
She huffed a small laugh at this.
“I don’t know anything about you except that your parents are bigots and you’re a pretentious
git.”
“That about sums it up. Though I do have a title, and I’m in line for another one so you will
be Lady Malfoy to start and eventually Lady Wiltshire if you marry me.”
“God,” she muttered.
Draco just shrugged a bit apologetically.
“Look,” she finally said. “Even if I were to agree that it’s not the worst match in the world…
on a purely hypothetical basis I mean… I can’t marry you. You know I can’t. Kingsley
would win if I did, and he can’t win this. I probably owe you an apology for my behavior in
the courtroom yesterday, but it was the first time I finally got through to some of the
members of the Wizengamot. I need them to understand how terrible this is.”
Draco felt another flash of disappointment, but he forced it away. He knew she would do
this. And something told him it would work in his favor if he went along with it for now. If
he fought her, she would become entrenched.
“I actually agree with you,” he said, and he relished the moment of surprise he caught on her
face. “It is a terrible law, and you identified the perfect opportunity to make it clear to them
just how bad it can be. Don’t apologize to me for it. I’m the one who owes you a dozen
apologies. The only reason you could make an example out of my family was because of the
way we’ve treated you. I certainly didn’t enjoy it, but we must reap what we sow.”
She blinked, clearly thrown off by his words.
“Alright,” she said slowly. “I’ll admit, you continue to surprise me, Malfoy. So why don’t
you tell me why you’re here?”
He shrugged. “A few reasons. First and foremost, I wanted to make sure you’re okay. I
wasn’t lying when I said I don’t like the thought of witches in this place, and we are
affianced. I’m the type to take my responsibilities seriously, and I now feel some
responsibility toward you. Second, I truly don’t know how this is going to play out, but I do
know that my father and his friends are powerful. He and I are on opposite sides this time,
and I want you to know that I plan to align myself with you. If it comes down to it and you
think that marrying me is the best course of action to get what you want, I don’t want you to
hesitate because you only know the old me. My loyalties are to my wife. Full stop. She
comes before everybody else, including my parents. And finally, I need you to tell me how
the fuck Potter got you to go to the Matching Ceremony in the first place. I’m surprised he
didn’t drop dead from the looks you were giving him, and I’ve been dying to hear the story.”
Her mouth was slightly open by the time he was done, and he sat back and studied her with
some satisfaction. He had discussed his approach with his friends late into the night, and
they finally decided that being direct was best. It was the sort of thing Granger valued, and in
any event there wasn’t time to play games. Draco had to make her trust him as quickly as
possible in case his father tried to back Draco into a corner. He wanted her to work with him
and not against him if that happened. So for the time being, Draco would work with her too
and give her the things she wanted.
Based on her expression he thought they had called it perfectly.
“Well I suppose I can tell you…” she said slowly.
Draco perked up.
“So I did receive your final note, and I planned to head to the Loire Valley as soon as I was in
France. I thought that if I didn’t show up to the Matching Ceremony I would be able to rally
support from the continent. Thanks for the offer to stay at your chateau, by the way – I fully
intended to use it.”
“But…” Draco prompted.
Granger sighed. “But Harry had that fucking tracking spell on me, and my train was late. He
caught up to me.”
“And that’s it? He clearly didn’t want to arrest you yesterday.”
“No, it’s true he didn’t. But I was breaking the law by fleeing the country, and he was
supposed to arrest me at the train station when I was caught. Instead of doing that he begged
me to stay. He said I could put up a better fight if I was here and in a place of moral
superiority. If it had become known that I ran, then Kingsley could always use that against
me in the court of public opinion. Besides, I needed help mailing out copies of the legislation
I drafted to repeal the MLPP. I really wanted it to reach the Wizengamot before the Matching
Ceremony started. Harry offered to help if I stayed in England.”
“So Potter wanted you to make an example of yourself and go to Azkaban?” asked Draco
incredulously.
“No, of course not. He wanted me to get married and just keep doing what I’ve been doing
— you know, lobbying, letter writing, that sort of thing. I don’t think he’s ever thought
through all the ramifications of the law when it comes to things like rape and sexual assualt
— most people haven’t because all we’ve heard for the last year is news about weddings and
babies. It was the perfect public distraction so people wouldn’t look deeper, and Harry fell
for it like everybody else did. He thought getting married through the MLPP was better than
Azkaban.”
“But you saw the problems with the law,” pointed out Draco.
“Of course,” she said. “I worked for a think tank until very recently, and I’ve spent the last
few years trying to influence legislation. I’m rather good at it, but the MLPP was different. I
just couldn’t make any inroads using normal channels. Everyone was preoccupied by what
might happen to them if they had a match they didn’t like, and then they became distracted by
all the weddings and babies, and of course the Wizengamot itself was practically salivating
over the possibility of grandbabies. It was like screaming into an empty room every time I
tried to point out all the foul things they wrote into that law. By the time my own wedding
rolled around… well, I was desperate. After Harry caught me at the train station I realized he
was right and the point would be better made if I stayed here and objected to my match.
Harry had no idea I decided to go to prison the moment I agreed to stay in England. He
thought I would get married and just hex my husband if he put a toe out of line. I’m not a
bad shot.”
“Then why were you so angry with him yesterday?”
She scowled. “Because that git put the damn tracking spell on me, and I had to hide from
him and Ron for two sodding nights! He had no right!”
“And Weasley?”
She waved a hand airily. “The usual with him. He said some very rude things through the
door at the Ritz. I spend half my life not speaking to him for one reason or another. This was
just more of the same.”
Draco couldn’t help the chuckle that escaped. She scowled at him a little, and he just raised
his hands in mock surrender.
“Fine! You’re right. Potter shouldn’t have done that, and Weasley is a git. But Potter must
have at least suspected you would run. I’m happy to say that nobody saw mine coming. In
fact, I only decided to do it about three seconds before I apparated away.”
She cracked a reluctant smile at this. “Mine was a bit more planned, that was true. I packed
some essentials just in case I wanted to run for it.”
“Except for food,” he pointed out.
She rolled her eyes. “I told you I always forget food.”
He grinned briefly. “So why didn’t you just call it off?”
She sighed. “I probably should have, but I was going in circles about it and couldn’t make up
my mind. Everything about a Weasley wedding is loud and a lot, and I just didn’t have the
space to think it through. Once Ginny and her mother finally left for the ceremony I had a
few minutes to myself, and it was the first bit of silence I had in weeks. I realized I was
letting Kingsley win by going along with the mad plan to marry Ron. I’m the reason we
were so late to do it, you know. Harry and Ginny wanted to do it as soon as the law was
passed, but they also wanted a double wedding with us. I agreed to marry Ron if I had to, but
I also kept thinking I would be able to get the law overturned so it would become a moot
point. Then eventually I ran out of time, so I went along with it to avoid the Matching
Ceremony. Once I could finally think properly, I knew I didn’t want to marry Ron. I’ve
never wanted to marry Ron. It was everybody else who wanted me to marry Ron. I’m sure
Harry could tell I was reluctant, so that’s why he tracked me.”
“You felt duty-bound,” said Draco knowingly.
“I don’t know if it was a duty exactly, but it certainly felt like an obligation. I love the
Weasleys. They and Harry are the closest family I have. And it seemed like everyone – not
just them, but all my other friends and acquaintances too – expected it. Ron and I had a few
dates and a couple of snogs over the years, but he always wanted it more than I did. He
wasn’t that subtle about his feelings and after all the things we went through together
everyone thought we’d make a real go of it eventually. Then the MLPP was passed, and he
was the obvious choice. When your whole world is telling you that a certain decision is the
right one, sometimes it’s hard to hear your own voice when it disagrees.”
Draco was watching her in fascination as she spoke. She was so expressive, so passionate.
He understood as well as anybody how easy it was to listen to the things other people were
saying and eventually believe them to be true.
“That’s how I felt about Astoria,” said Draco quietly. “I’ve known for a long time that I
didn’t want to marry her, but we’ve been betrothed for most of my life. I couldn’t imagine a
different future, and then the MLPP forced my hand. My closest friends disagreed with the
match for several reasons, but every other person in my life was telling me how perfect it
was.”
She nodded knowingly. “Yes, and I imagine it was the same reason you got in over your
head with blood purity and the war too. You were indoctrinated. It’s very hard to see a
different path when you’re in it. I couldn’t see the situation with Ron clearly until I was
about to walk down the aisle.”
An odd feeling washed over Draco at her words. She was absolutely correct that he had been
indoctrinated when it came to blood purity and then Astoria. And his parents were still
indoctrinated. A part of him was embarrassed, but another part – the part that hoped she
would agree to marry him sooner rather than later – was relieved that she understood this.
Her own indoctrination when it came to Weasley might not have been as severe as his, but it
sounded like she still personally experienced it at least some degree.
“You’re right, of course,” he said. “And in the spirit of being honest, you should know that
my views have changed a lot since the war. My parents though…”
She gave him a wry look. “I could tell.”
He grimaced.
Draco then heard footsteps coming toward them to hover outside of their door, and he
glanced at his watch. They only had a couple minutes left.
“Tell me if there’s anything you need before they end this,” he said quietly.
“A copy of The Daily Prophet as often as you can spare it,” she said back. “Also parchment,
quills, and ink. If I have those things I can make a proper list for you once I have a chance to
think about it.”
He nodded quickly. “I’ll send those along this evening. I haven’t even had a chance to look
at The Prophet today, other than the picture on the front page.”
Her face lit up in an impish smile. “Tell me. Did that picture feature my middle finger by
any chance?”
“What do you think?” he asked wryly.
She looked positively delighted, and he chuckled a little before turning serious. “I also want
to know if I can visit you again. I won’t force you to see me unless it’s urgent.”
She bit her lip. “I… wouldn’t mind seeing you whenever you’re free to come by. The
conjugal visits only require advanced notice because of the preparations.”
She rolled her eyes at this but turned a bit pink. Once again, Draco forced himself not to look
there.
“But they’re also private,” she added in a hurried whisper. “Regular visits don’t have to be
scheduled in advance, but they are monitored by guards.”
Draco thought quickly. “How about this, then. If I have news that’s private, I’ll schedule a
conjugal visit. If it’s just to chat, I’ll make a regular visit so you don’t have to… prepare for
me.”
“I appreciate the offer, and I wish it were that easy,” she said slowly. “But if I agree to see
you outside of a conjugal visit then it looks like I’m softening toward you.”
Draco thought about this for a moment and realized she was correct. She drew a line in the
sand the previous day, and if Shacklebolt learned that she was accepting regular visits from
Draco he might believe she was coming around to the MLPP. And if his father learned about
it, he might expedite whatever plan he was surely brewing for Astoria.
“Fair enough. Conjugal visits only then unless circumstances change.”
She nodded. “I think that’s best… even if I’m a bit underdressed like this.”
I can’t say I mind it. Fuck.
“We can use it to our advantage,” he said instead.
“Oh?” she asked.
“You’ll see,” he said under his breath.
Just then the same guard entered and cast a suspicious eye over them. Draco automatically
assumed the customary, arrogant expression he used when he wanted to get his way. This
time Granger was watching him a bit curiously instead of suspiciously. Draco decided to put
on a little show for the guard, and he hoped she would play along.
They both rose and Draco quickly reached out to pull her toward him, cupping her cheek as
he did so.
“Darling,” he purred. “I thank you for your time today. I will keep trying to… convince
you.”
To Draco’s delight Granger seemed to intuit precisely what he was trying to do. She gave
him a harsh look and shoved him back.
“Malfoy,” she said coldly. “As I’ve already told you, I wish you would leave me alone.”
“Ah, but I have rights, don’t I? And those rights involved you and me. Together. I’ll be
back soon so we can continue our conversations darling. You’ll come to see that being Lady
Malfoy has many advantages besides being in my bed.”
“In your dreams,” she said.
“Oh I’ve been dreaming about you for years, Granger.”
He smirked at her, as the guard stepped forward and cuffed her again. Then Draco turned on
him.
“Don’t forget, she belongs to me by right of law. I’ve already heard rumors that you and the
others enjoy looking at her. Let me be very clear about something. All of this…” and now
Draco finally allowed his eyes to rove over her hungrily, taking in every detail of her
knickerless and braless body, “...is mine. That means she’s mine to look at, not yours. The
same goes for physical discipline. I’m her next-of-kin, so I’ll be getting her reports. No
more contusions or I’ll happily castrate you and serve your balls to my peacocks for dinner.
They developed a taste for human flesh when the Dark Lord was alive.”
The guard blanched, and even Granger looked a bit disturbed by the threat. But he also saw
the slight blush on her cheeks as the guard gripped her by the arm and started to lead her out.
“Handle her with care,” Draco said in a mocking voice. “We wouldn’t want to find any
bruises on her the next time I visit. Isn’t that right, darling?”
They both paused as Draco approached them one more time, and he tucked a curl behind her
ear. “You’re mine to look at. Mine to touch. Remind the guards of that if you must.”
“Fuck you, Malfoy,” she said angrily, but Draco caught the glimmer of appreciation in her
eyes.
He gripped her face tightly and said, “Oh I would love nothing more than to fuck you,
darling. But I plan to be a good boy and marry you first. We must do these things properly if
you’re to be my Lady Malfoy.”
On the surface she looked outraged, but again Draco saw a flash of something else in her
eyes. He couldn’t immediately identify it, but he was sure it wasn’t anger.
He leaned in and gave her a slow kiss on the cheek. Through the harsh scent of prison soap,
he could smell her, and fuck if she didn’t smell good.
“I’ll be back soon,” he breathed into her ear so quietly the guard couldn’t hear.
Then he pulled back and gave her a saucy wink as he released her. “I can’t wait until our
next visit. You do know how to keep me entertained.”
She glared at him, but said nothing else as the guard nudged her along, and she turned to
leave. With her back to him, Draco’s eyes immediately dropped to her arse, and he indulged
himself in a long look. The cotton trousers were thin, and as she moved he tried to imagine
what she looked like underneath.
This time Draco’s cock didn’t just twitch. He started to get hard for the first time in well over
a year.
This was very interesting indeed.
Chapter 5: Monthlies.

Three weeks later.
The Daily Prophet was having a field day, and Granger was at the center of it all. After the
first bombshell piece was printed the day after the Matching Ceremony, several journalists
evidently decided to dig. What they found — The Prophet could exclusively reveal — was a
story of a young woman who had been trying for months to change the course of the
Marriage Law and Procreation Plan.
She had been stymied at every turn, her usual fame and fire ignored because of the selfish
whims of the Wizengamot. And now the crusader who had been trying to reverse this from
the very beginning was locked in Azkaban and engaged to a former Death Eater. It was not a
great look for Kingsley Shacklebolt.
The Prophet reached a new level of frenzy when Granger started using that parchment and
ink Draco sent to her to write op-eds from prison.
The Guards Who Want Me
by Hermione Granger
I write this from my cell that is only a few meters square. It is nearing time for the
‘preparations’ for my next ‘conjugal visit’ with the man who was affianced to me against my
will. That is the irony of this punishment course — as a woman who is engaged in name only,
I am still nothing more than a warm body for some man to use for his pleasure in the hopes
that he will impregnate me while he does it. Not even prison bars will stop the Ministry of
Magic.
The conjugal visits can only be requested by my next-of-kin, who is presently Draco Malfoy
thanks to the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan. These visits are buried in the footnotes
and cross-references of the law and are clearly designed for a single purpose: to give the
Ministry their babies, whether a couple has agreed to get married or not.
Lord Malfoy may request a visit at any time, and while I can refuse any other visitors I am
not permitted to refuse him. During the ‘preparations,’ for these visits I am made to strip and
bathe in front of at least four guards, all male. They don’t look away of course, blaming their
‘duties,’ as an excuse to glory in my humiliation. They offer to ‘help’ me. They speak of
their fantasies about me. Those fantasies are brutal and violent, and I am certain it is only
the Azkaban Reform Act, which provides magical documentation of prisoner-guard
relationships, that keeps them from touching me.
Well that and the threats from Draco Malfoy himself. They struck me the moment I entered
Azkaban.
Lord Malfoy is not shy about the fact that he views me as something that is now his, whether
we are married or not. His behavior toward the guards who want me is perfectly in line with
the sort of insidious thinking the Ministry is promoting by allowing the MLPP to stand. I am
always brought to him in loose fitting prison garb, scrubbed fresh of the grime from my cell,
and made to stand there before him without even the privacy that undergarments would
afford me. The best thing I can say about him is that he hasn’t forced me to have intercourse
yet. But he has the right to do it any time, and the Azkaban procedures for these visits are
clearly intended to tempt him by giving him a prisoner who is clean and bare, available for
the taking.
At what point does one break? Is it when the guards announce yet another conjugal visit and
tell me they would rape me if they believed they could get away with it? Is it when my
affianced lays claim to me by threatening those same guards because he already views me as
nothing more than a possession to be kept? Is it when the guards ejaculate into my food and
force me to ‘eat their cum’ in order to nourish myself? Or is it when my former fiancé
Ronald Weasley — a man who has been a cherished friend for most of my life — shows up to
visit and tells me I deserve to be treated this way because I failed to marry him when I had
the chance?
Do I deserve it, when all I wanted from him was that innocent friendship we always shared?
Did my desire to preserve my virtue and my reluctance to spread my legs for him warrant all
of this?
Who is really to blame for the guards who want me, the conjugal visits with my childhood
bully, and my former best friend who is capable of looking at a woman and telling her she
brought it on herself?
The answer is simple: it’s Kingsley Shacklebolt and his Marriage Law and Procreation Plan.
At least we are still free to tell that truth.
Draco didn’t know if he was impressed or enraged. These details had not been shared with
him during the five other visits he requested from her, though he had received the report of
her accepting a visit from Weasley. All of it made Draco see red.
“What the fuck has been happening to you?” he demanded the minute the door shut on their
first conjugal visit following her article.
“I thought I was quite clear,” she said as she moved to sit down.
“Is this true? They’re tossing off into your food? They are seeing you naked? I told them I
would –”
She raised a hand to stop him, and Draco could barely bring himself to do it. He was
seething with outrage.
“Yes, it’s all true, including your rather possessive tendencies that I wrote about. At first I
thought it was an act, but now I’m wondering if you really do believe it when you tell the
guards I’m yours every single time I visit.”
“Those possessive tendencies are meant to help you and keep you safe! How can I help you
if you don’t tell me this is happening?”
“Are you being honest with them, then?” she retorted. “Do you really think I’m some sort of
object of yours?”
“I think that you’re far safer with me than with them!” he seethed. “And I think I really
would like to murder every one of them for treating you that way! Not to mention the
Weasel, who is apparently an even bigger fuck-up than I realized if he’s telling you that you
deserve to be fucking oggled like –”
He clamped his mouth shut when she reached across the table and gripped his hand.
“Thank you,” she said.
“For what?” he asked a bit rudely. His temper was barely under control.
“For making it clear you don’t think I deserve it.”
“Of course you don’t fucking deserve it! I can’t believe that wanker would even imply it! I
mean, do I sincerely wish you would just take the easy solution and marry me so you can get
the hell out of here? Of course I do. Please darling, marry me whenever you decide you’re
ready. But it’s your choice to do it or not, isn’t it?”
Her eyes softened a little. “That’s one reason I’m going to keep writing these op-eds,” she
said.
“I don’t follow.”
“Because if it ever gets to be too much… I don’t want Kingsley to win if I do take the easy
solution. I want the world to know just how bad this law can be. I can tolerate a lot, but we
all have breaking points.”
“Are you reaching yours Granger?”
Draco tried not to sound too hopeful. He didn’t want her to be miserable. He just wanted her
to marry him and be done with it.
Her eyes looked haunted. “Aside from the guards and terrible living conditions, even without
the dementors here, it’s… challenging. And you aren’t helping things.”
“What does that mean? I’m doing nothing but trying to help you!”
She glanced at him and blushed a little. “I mean you’re not as bad as I thought you would
be. Unfortunate possessive tendencies aside, you continue to make the easier solution look
better and better by comparison.”
Fuck, am I actually wearing her down then?
Draco knew it was too early to celebrate, and Granger had only been here a few weeks. She
had a lot of fight in her, and he wouldn’t allow himself to become too optimistic yet. But he
was buoyed by the thought that she was being tempted by the alternative he could offer her.
And what she could offer in return was so very interesting that Draco had thought of little
else since they were matched.
“What do you mean, ‘unfortunate possessive tendencies?’ Are you saying you don’t want a
bloke who would burn the world for you?”
“Why, are you offering?”
“Well I don’t know about the world, but I’d happily burn Azakaban and all of the guards
while I’m at it. I’ll throw in the Weasel too if I can find a reason to get him to come here
before I light it all on fire. Surely that’s a decent start.”
A reluctant smile crossed her face. “And what about me, then? Am I to burn in this inferno
of yours?”
“Of course not, darling. We’ll escape to the sea. I wouldn’t be worthy of those possessive
tendencies if I let you burn too.”
“Maybe I want to watch.”
“Mmm you do have a violent streak in you, I’ll grant you that. And you’re doing a fairly
good job of burning this place down all on your own.”
It was true. When Draco made himself ignore the hot anger that coursed through him when
he thought about the guards and Weasley, he realized she was using her prison sentence
strategically and building a very specific narrative that would undermine Shacklebolt and the
Wizengamot. And when he read her article again after her confession about being tempted to
take the easy path, he also saw what she was doing when it came to him. Her description of
him wasn’t flattering, but he was arguably the least worst of the group. She also planted the
idea that something might make her break. If she did choose him at some point, it wouldn’t
necessarily undermine the story she was telling about the brutality of this law.
As much as he disliked it, Draco no longer objected as vehemently when she continued to
write about the guards leering at her or the time they pissed all over her parchment and
destroyed it or the subsequent visit with Weasley that also ended in a shouting match. In fact,
Granger’s opinion pieces – which she told him were inspired by an American muggle who
had once done the same thing when imprisoned during something called the ‘civil rights
movement’ – were prompting others to share their experiences too. The other authors usually
remained anonymous, but they were submitting articles to The Prophet that proved some of
Granger’s darker predictions were coming true: the MLPP encouraged spousal rape.
I told him I didn’t want to have sex, and he took me anyway.
He cites the law when he says he’s allowed to have me twice a day. It doesn’t matter how
sore I am or how little I wish it.
I lost my virginity to a stranger.
By the time the first week of October rolled around, Granger had been imprisoned for over a
month, and the Minister was facing a true political crisis thanks to the media firestorm she
had started. As irritating as her stubbornness could be, Draco was oddly proud of her.
“I have to admit, she might be onto something,” said Pansy as she threw down the latest copy
of The Prophet. His friends were in his room, away from the prying eyes of Lucius and
Narcissa.
“It’s true,” agreed Blaise. “Last year everyone was too distracted by the weddings and birth
announcements to really dig into this law in depth. But now that the MLPP is in place there
are none of the trappings of romance.”
“And she picked her target well, using you,” added Theo.
“That was just sheer dumb luck,” grumbled Draco. Her latest op-ed had reported some of the
more covetous things he had said about her in front of the guards. Her article was scathing,
though he was still a more sympathetic character than Weasley who evidently called her a
‘stupid slag’ and made her cry the last time they met. Draco was still angry about it.
“She does seem to loathe you,” added Pansy.
“She doesn’t,” said Draco quickly.
All of his friends looked at him skeptically.
“She doesn’t,” he insisted. “I mean sure, she tells me I’m a pretentious git every time I see
her, but for the most part we’re perfectly cordial. We just play up the possessive boyfriend
angle for the guards.”
“And being a territorial prat helps you how?” asked Blaise.
“Because I need to look bad enough in the press that if she ever does agree to marry me
Shacklebolt still hasn’t won. It can’t look like he was right to insist on our marriage all
along.”
“So you’re letting her wreck your reputation for –” started Pansy.
“No,” said Draco, cutting her off. “It was Father who wrecked my reputation. She’s just
been given plenty of ammunition, and I’m inviting her to use it. If she ever does marry me,
I’ll make sure the narrative starts to change. We’ll have some growing pains, but eventually
she’ll be publicly adored as a Malfoy wife should be.”
“Unbelievable…” muttered Blaise, but Pansy was looking at him critically.
“What?” asked Draco.
She shrugged. “I was just thinking that Granger’s more shrewd than I thought, given the fact
that she voluntarily went to prison. It’s true she’s making you out to be a misogynistic arse,
but you are clearly a better choice than staying in prison or even marrying Weasley based on
the things he’s said to her. She’s portraying herself as somebody who has no good options,
but you are the least worst.”
“That’s right,” said Draco with some satisfaction. “That’s how I know she wants to marry
me.”
“That seems like a stretch mate,” said Blaise delicately.
“No, no. Granger wants to marry me. She just can’t let Shacklebolt win. But I’m wearing
her down, and she’s planting the seeds in the press to give herself an out. She’ll come around
eventually.”
His friends gave him politely skeptical looks at this.
“And your parents?” asked Theo. “How are they coming along?”
“I wouldn’t know,” muttered Draco. “They’re giving me the Malfoy silent treatment. This
one has broken our previous record.”
“They really haven’t said anything to you about it?” asked Blaise in amazement.
Draco shook his head. “Not since the day of the Matching Ceremony. Neither of them have
said a word to me since.”
Draco had to admit, it was concerning. He was sure Lucius was working on something
behind the scenes. The Malfoys held a hereditary seat on the Wizengamot, which Lucius
currently filled as head of the family. Though he was only one vote out of many, his was an
influential one. He had consolidated a reliable faction that nearly always voted his way, and
though he had never been reticent about sharing most of his political maneuverings with
Narcissa and Draco, this time Draco had been completely cut out of the conversation. Draco
wanted to make his own inquiries, but he didn’t even know where to begin because his father
had left him no crumbs at all. The only thing he could think to do was contact Astoria
directly to see if Lucius had been in touch with her, but Draco couldn’t stomach the thought.
Even now, the memory of her made him occlude hard.
“Do you really think they’ll want to force a match after the things you said about occlusion?”
asked Pansy quietly.
Draco shrugged, a bit uncomfortable with the direction of the conversation. “I don’t know.
Mother is an occlumens, but I don’t think she’s ever over-occluded like I did. She doesn’t
understand what it was like. And I suspect Father just thinks I’m being obstinate and
childish. He probably thinks I’m using occlumency as an excuse.”
“It’s better with Granger though, right?” asked Theo with a piercing look.
Draco nodded. “Yes,” he said quietly. “I barely have to occlude with her at all. The little
occlusion I use around her is entirely because of Azkaban. It’s still a terrible place, and I
have to block it out when I’m there. But I don’t occlude anything about Granger.”
All three friends exchanged glances, and then Theo straightened up.
“Right then,” he said. “In that case, you should know I’ve heard a rumor.”
“What?” asked Draco, staring at his friend eagerly.
Theo’s mouth thinned. “Not much. Just that there may be an amendment to the MLPP. I
heard it entirely by accident. I was waiting for Pansy at St. Mungo’s during one of her
appointments and overhead a couple of older wizards talking about it. One of them was
wearing Wizengamot robes. I didn’t hear enough to learn details, but it sounds like
something is in the works.”
Draco felt an unpleasant lurch.
“It’s almost inevitable really,” said Pansy fairly. “Granger has caused a huge political issue
with this. You know Shacklebolt and the Wizengamot have to respond somehow.”
Draco nodded slowly. He knew they were right. He had been expecting it. That was why he
was softening Granger. He was preparing for the inevitable fallout.
“If any of you can press your contacts, I would appreciate it,” said Draco.
"I'll try," said Theo, "though I'm out of the loop since Father died. The Nott family seat on
the Wizengamot has technically been open ever since that blessed event."
"When are you going to claim it?" asked Draco. "It's been nearly a year."
Theo sighed. "It's on my to-do list, but I've had more important things..."
"Like dealing with the blasted MLPP. Of course," acknowledged Draco.
"Yes. I can put in my notice that I'm officially claiming my seat, but it takes a few months,
and I don't have that many connections yet. Father never brought me around before the war."
Draco sighed. "Well if you don't mind trying, I would appreciate it."
Theo inclined his head.
“And what if the MLPP is repealed?” asked Blaise.
Draco shrugged. “If that happens, I’ll ask Granger out on a date once she’s released from
prison. I’m still not going to marry Astoria.”
They all raised their eyebrows at this.
“You actually like her then,” said Pansy. “And not just because she’s the alternative to
Astoria.”
Draco thought back to the furtive looks he gave her during their conjugal visits whenever she
was lost in thought and unaware that he was memorizing the sight of her in the loose prison
top and no bra. He considered the intelligent banter, the one-upmanship, and the fiery temper
that he loved to tease out of her. He remembered finally dropping his hands to his cock a few
nights ago when he was showering, just to see if it still worked after such a long dry spell. To
his great relief it did work once he allowed himself to imagine her.
A lifetime of pureblood indoctrination made Draco tempted to lie about this. But these were
his closest friends, and the evidence was clear.
“Yeah, I do,” said Draco. “She’s not just interesting. She’s fascinating.”
It was the highest compliment Draco could pay her, and they all knew it. Their eyes widened
simultaneously.
“In that case we’ll try to help, mate,” said Blaise.
“Thank you,” said Draco. “I need to know anything you can learn about it.”
Draco may not know what was being floated around the Wizengamot, but there was one thing
he was sure about: it wouldn’t be repealed.
Shacklebolt wouldn’t allow it.

15 October 2003
Granger was wasting away.
It had taken a long time for Draco to notice it because he usually visited her at least twice a
week. He was always at war with himself, torn between the urge to come more often and the
knowledge that every time he did a group of guards would see her naked. She still did not
want to switch to regular visits, and a small part of Draco didn’t either. Their visits were just
theirs, and they didn’t have to perform for anybody.
Seeing her multiple times a week meant that Draco didn’t notice at first as her weight began
to melt off of her. It wasn’t until Granger was escorted in for a conjugal visit by a new guard
that he realized just how thin she had gotten.
“Here’s your fiancée,” he said in an arrogant voice. Evidently this guard had not yet heard
about Draco’s threats.
“Though why you’d want her, I couldn’t say,” he continued. “Skin and bones. I like a
woman with at least a little meat on her.”
The guard gave her a small shove toward Draco. She stumbled, and he caught her as he
glared at the guard’s retreating back. Draco didn’t have a snarky response to this because as
his arms wrapped around her, he could tell that the guard was right. It was the first time he
had touched her like this since his initial visit.
He now looked at her with a more critical eye and saw the thin wrists and protruding
collarbone. She smelled of the prison soap and her of course – she had been bathed for him
as always – but as he gripped her waist he could feel her hip bones sharp under his hands. He
moved them up slightly and felt her ribcage too.
“Granger, what are you doing?” he asked, now glowering down at her.
“What do you mean?” she asked in an airy voice as she slipped from his grip. Draco let her
go, but examined the rest of her body closely now. Usually he only snuck glimpses at her,
but today he didn’t care if she caught him. She really was looking malnourished.
“You’re not eating. That arsehole was right – you’re skin and bones.”
“I eat precisely the right amount,” she said.
“No you don’t. I’ve never seen you this thin except –”
He cut himself off, before he could say it.
Except for that day you were tortured at the Manor.
It was true. She had been this thin back then as well. Even under the ratty clothing he had
been able to tell. The lights of the drawing room chandelier had thrown the angles of her face
and arms into sharp relief while she was screaming on the Manor floor. Draco still had
nightmares about it on occasion. Usually in those nightmares she died, her thin skin melting
off her body to show the skeleton underneath.
Granger gave him a knowing look. “I’ll admit that’s what gave me the idea.”
“Pardon?” he blinked.
She pursed her lips. “Not that it’s any of your business, but I’ve decided to stop my cycles.
It’s a safety measure in case one of the guards decides to try something. It has the added
bonus of making me unattractive to them. That one – Shepherd is his name – isn’t the only
guard who thinks I’m too thin.”
Draco blinked in confusion. “Stop what cycles?”
Granger looked at him like he was dense. “My cycles? My… period?”
She turned a faint pink as she said this.
“I’m not following,” he said.
Her eyes widened. “Oh my God, surely you’ve heard of a period? Menstruation? Code
red?”
“Erm…” said Draco, feeling very foolish now, though he couldn’t fathom why.
She narrowed her eyes and seemed to study him for a moment.
“Monthlies?” she tried again.
“Monthlies!” said Draco in relief. “Yes, of course I’ve heard of monthlies.”
“Christ, you are such a sheltered ponce.”
“Well it’s not like I have them!”
“No of course not, but women all around the world do! Surely one of your girlfriends has
familiarized you with the concept, since your parents obviously did not?”
Draco sniffed. “I have been faithful to Astoria for years.”
“I’m sure Astoria has periods.”
“Monthlies,” corrected Draco.
“No, periods.”
“Well she might,” said Draco, “but that’s hardly the sort of thing one discusses in polite
company.”
Her eyes widened at this. “Draco Malfoy, tell me what a period is.”
“A type of punctuation mark that denotes the end of a sentence, as you very well know,” he
said with a scoff.
“Malfoy…” she warned.
“A monthly,” he continued, “refers to a few days during the month when a witch can’t
perform her marital duties. It also makes her cranky and crave chocolate – generally Belgian
chocolate over Swiss I’m told.”
She just stared at him with mounting horror. “And?” she prompted.
“And what?”
“And what else happens?”
“How should I know?”
“Oh my God,” she murmured, as an expression of true amazement settled on her face.
“You’re clueless aren’t you? Do you know how children are conceived? Or how a woman’s
periods are connected to sex? Wait, do you even know about sex?”
“Of course I know about sex!” said Draco hotly.
She narrowed her eyes. “Alright, then. Prove it. Tell me how babies are made.”
Draco was feeling flustered. “That’s not appropriate–”
“Just tell me, Malfoy.”
He huffed. “Fine. A couple engages in relations. The wizard deposits his seed inside of her.
The witch takes it from there.”
Granger just stared at him in disbelief.
“What?” asked Draco. “That’s all there is to it! If you prefer to be crass, then cock goes into
cunt. Cock is engaged while they fuck. He comes inside of her. Do it enough times and
eventually a baby is made.”
“That is the most asinine, simplistic, ridiculous –”
“Am I wrong? Does that not result in a baby?”
Draco was torn between annoyance and mortification. Of course he knew about sex in the
abstract. At one time – before his years of occlusion – he had even wanted to experience it.
His interest in it had gone on hiatus once he committed to Astoria, but it had finally returned
along with his now-fully-functioning cock. He had been between a few witches’ legs with
his fingers. One time he even got close with his mouth before she stopped him. He was now
quite keen to find out what it would be like if he did it with his cock.
None of this had been remotely appealing with Astoria, and Draco really was the type to stay
faithful once he fully committed to a witch. Draco had resigned himself to Astoria years ago,
and now he was committed to Granger who didn’t seem terribly interested in sleeping with
him just yet. If she married him though…
Truly, the baby aspects of the act had always been secondary to wondering what exactly he
had been missing all these years. Besides, up until very recently thinking about babies would
have meant acknowledging his duties with Astoria. The Malfoy magic was supposed to help
him with that, so he had never given it very much consideration.
“It can result in a baby I suppose, but —”
“Ha!” announced Draco in triumph.
She gave him a magnificent eye-roll.
“But it ignores all the other factors that go into it.”
“Like what then?”
“Well like timing for one. A witch can’t get pregnant all the time, you know.”
“Right, like during her monthlies,” agreed Draco.
Granger huffed. “Yes, but most other days too. There are only a few days per month when a
witch is considered fertile. The rest of the time you might as well be shooting blanks for all
the good it will do.”
“Shooting blanks?” he asked in confusion.
“Nevermind,” she muttered. “My point is, there is more to it than cock goes into cunt.”
“Well sure. But there’s magic to help with the rest of it.”
Now she looked at him in confusion. “Magic?”
“Of course,” said Draco, now feeling superior because he knew something about sex that she
didn’t. “The Malfoy family magic will help me… fulfill my marital duties.”
“In what way?” she asked curiously.
Draco reddened a little. “From what Father has told me it will help me identify the most
auspicious times for relations. It should also help me… achieve completion.”
Granger gave an inelegant snort. “Somebody needs to write a book translating pureblood
sexual euphemisms into plain English. I’m shocked that any of you can locate a woman’s
vagina at all with those instructions. I’d wager the clitoris is a true mystery.”
Draco glowered at her and ignored her jab. Assuming a ‘clitoris’ was another word for ‘clit,’
then he wasn’t sure if he had ever touched one. According to the older blokes in Slytherin it
was an elusive thing, but it made witches pant for it if it could be found. Draco’s other
partners had seemed pleased, but not exactly panting, so he was never certain if he had
located it or not.
Still, he wasn’t going to let Granger know that she was right about this.
“Well be that as it may, my point is that with magic it really is as simple as cock goes into
cunt.”
“But do you know why some times are more ‘auspicious’ than others?”
Draco shrugged a bit uncomfortably. “I was always just told to follow the marital magic, and
it would guide me.”
She huffed. “It’s because a woman’s period and her fertile window go hand in hand. Hence
the term ‘cycle.’ So if you stop one…”
“Then you stop the other…” Draco finished.
Then his eyes widened as he realized what she meant.
“So you’re starving yourself so you can’t become pregnant? In case the guards…” he trailed
off, feeling sick as he thought about it.
“Yes,” she said. “I don’t trust them, and I’m not allowed contraceptives. Nor do I think they
would let me pick inauspicious times, so… this is my solution. It’s not perfect, but it’s the
best I can do. With enough weight loss a woman’s cycles can stop because her body can’t
sustain a pregnancy.”
Draco knew his eyes were wide as he considered this.
“And it worked?” he asked hesitantly.
“Yes. I started to cut food the moment I arrived. Fleur and Molly put me on a wedding diet
anyway, so I had a decent head start. The only time I’ve cheated over the last six months was
that weekend at the Ritz.”
Because I fed her from the Four Seasons.
Draco’s eyes swept over her again.
“So you’ve done this before,” he said simply.
She shrugged. “It happened on its own during the war. We didn’t have much food on the
run. But yes, it’s happened before, so I knew I could do it again.”
“And you can get your… cycle… back?”
“Once I gain some weight, yes. It will come back.”
But she won’t allow it to happen while she’s here.
“Let me get you out of here Granger. Marry me.”
She considered this for a long while, but Draco didn’t break eye contact.
“Malfoy, maybe we should talk about the other part of this. It’s not just getting married.”
Draco’s pulse ticked up.
“I assume you’re talking about consummation?”
She nodded. “Is that… something you feel you could do with me?”
Fuck yes.
“Granger, I would consummate it right away if you let me.”
“But I’m a muggleborn…”
“Oh really? I wasn’t aware of that,” he said, rolling his eyes.
Her lips pursed. “I mean it, Malfoy.”
“So do I, Granger. I’m well aware of who you are. Consummating it won’t be a problem
from my end.”
“I might want some time…” she said a bit nervously.
“I’ve already asked my solicitors about it, and we are still entitled to three months. The clock
starts from the day we get married, not the day we were matched.”
“If I need more than three months, what then?”
Her eyes were boring into him now, and he knew what she was implying.
“Granger, you have every reason to hate me. I know I was horrible to you in school, and I
ended up on the wrong side of history with the war. If we get married you’ll be thrust into a
world of bigots, because I have duties and responsibilities to my family and fortune I can’t
just ignore. But for all of my faults, I am not and have never been a rapist. I won’t take
anything you aren’t willing to give.”
She looked a bit ashamed now. “I didn’t mean —”
“You did,” he said, forcing himself to stay calm. “And I don’t blame you for asking about it.
But I mean it when I say I won’t take it from you. That being said, I also don’t want to go
back to Azkaban. I despise this place, and it… does particularly foul things to my head. So
if you marry me, I will give you anything you want: money, property, privacy, an ally who
will blow up the Ministry with you, I don’t care. You can have it. The only things I want in
return are fidelity and a promise that you’ll at least meet the bare minimums of the MLPP so
that I don’t have to go back to Azkaban.”
Her eyes softened at this. “That’s a fair request. I would want fidelity from you too.”
“You would have it,” he said instantly. “I’m faithful. I was faithful to Astoria for years even
though I didn’t want anything to do with her, and I’ve stayed faithful to you from the moment
we were matched. I will certainly stay faithful to my wife. Besides, the Malfoy family
magic might not let me stray even if I wanted to. I’ve never looked into it.”
She nodded a little. “And it would be stupid to marry you so I could get out of here, only to
come back three months later because I refused to consummate it.”
He inclined his head in acknowledgment as he watched her chew on her lip a bit, lost in
thought.
Finally she said, “Alright, I’ll make a deal with you, Malfoy.”
Draco straightened up, heart pounding.
“I’m going to assign some reading for you about reproduction and contraception. I did a
deep dive on it over the last year because of the MLPP, so I’m going to send you to my flat to
read the same things I did so you can learn about it. And I want you to find everything in
your library on this Malfoy family magic. I’ve never heard of such a thing, and I need to
understand it better if it might affect me too. So you read my books, and I’ll read yours. If
you can do that, then I will think about marrying you.”
“You’ll think about it?” he said, feeling himself perk up at this news.
She smiled a little. “I’ll think about it.”
Chapter 6: Weaseled.
20 October 2003.
Draco dove into his homework right away because he wanted Granger to think about
marrying him as quickly as possible.
He started with the family magic because that was something he didn’t know much about
either. He thought it best to be aware of what Granger was reading before he gave it to her,
so he spent a couple of days scouring family records and journals to find everything he could
about it.
The family magic was old, something cast hundreds of years ago and tied to the Malfoy line.
Unsurprisingly, it was primarily aimed at securing an heir, but there were other factors in play
too. Draco knew that the Malfoys weren’t the only family with this sort of magic — it used
to be fairly commonplace for purebloods — but breaking or changing it was complex and
could only be achieved by the combined efforts of the master and heir together after the heir
came of age. Lucius had never offered to break the magic, and Draco had never asked. As
Draco learned more about it, he thought he understood why.
The precise details were largely wrapped up in more of those euphemisms that Granger
disliked, but there were a few kernels of truth Draco managed to unearth. For the wizard, it
did indeed assist with his marital duties because it helped him desire his wife, and it would
help the wizard intuit the best times to perform to produce an heir quickly. That part of the
magic would last until the heir’s blood was added to the Manor’s wards. The Malfoy magic
ensured that the children were always boys until the direct heir’s blood was added, and
apparently the distinctive blonde hair was also a byproduct of the spell.
Draco snorted as he read about it. Evidently he needn’t have worried about being able to get
it up for Astoria if he had just gone through with his wedding as planned. Then again, if he
had known that the magic would help like that he might not have panicked and been given
the opportunity to have Granger instead.
Perhaps it was for the best that Draco had occluded himself to the point of ignorance.
Draco found several accounts in journals describing what the magic felt like, and it didn’t
seem to do very much when the wizard had those urges anyway. The marriages that were
love matches or near-so described the magic as simply enhancing what was already there.
The Malfoys thrust into loveless marriages wrote that the magic was a relief because it
simplified their husbandly duties a great deal.
Draco decided he wouldn’t mind feeling a magical inclination to bed Granger. He felt a nonmagical inclination to do it already.
For the witch, the marital magic was more restrictive. It didn’t make her want her husband,
but it did make it impossible for another man who was of age to touch her unless she was
pregnant. Any male who touched her while she was not pregnant would be magically
repelled. The only exceptions were men who shared her own blood like a father or brother.
It was a way of securing her fidelity, at least until the heir was born. This part of the magic
could be broken once the heir's blood was added to the wards, but until that happened she
would be untouchable by any other man unless she was pregnant with a Malfoy heir.
Draco winced a little when he realized the fidelity aspects of the magic were one-way.
Evidently the Malfoys weren’t that concerned about bastards — they just wanted to ensure
the paternity of the heir.
Then again, there was a silver lining to it. Draco knew it would be a means of keeping her
safe, at least for a time. Not even Lucius or the male Azkaban guards would be able to lay a
finger on her while Draco was heirless.
And speaking of safety, the Malfoy family magic had thought of that too. Malfoys could not
cause direct, life-threatening harm to each other. They could cause mild pain, but they could
not kill each other. It applied to both sexes and all generations. That meant that Lucius
would not be able to murder her, at least not by his own hand. He would die first. Likewise,
Granger would not be able to murder him, no matter how many foul things he said to her.
The family magic was intended to prevent eager heirs from offing their fathers or jealous
siblings from ending their older brothers. In this specific instance, it might keep an
unwelcome wife safer than she otherwise would be.
While the magic that affected their sexual relationship would break with an heir’s blood, the
magic prohibiting life-threatening harm did not. Once a Malfoy was born or married into the
family, that magic only broke when the Malfoy in question left the family through divorce or
magical disownment.
Draco hoped it meant Granger that would feel safe enough with him. Lucius could be a wily
old bastard, but getting around that family magic would not be simple because it would
naturally involve a third party who could rat him out. Besides, if anything did happen to
Granger the Ministry would surely look to him and Draco first. Lucius was many things, but
he wasn’t stupid.
After Draco spent a few days buried in the library, he copied the relevant sections and
brought them to Granger to read too. Then he turned to the next thing he had to study so that
Granger would think about marrying him: human reproduction.
It took very little time for him to learn how much he hadn’t learned about this critical
subject. Evidently his seed wasn’t as special as he had always been led to believe because he
made more of it all the time. It was the woman who held the very special thing that produced
babies: an egg, usually just one, that appeared for about twenty-four hours each cycle and
then started to disintegrate if it wasn’t fertilized in time.
Apparently his seed — no, sperm — could live for a few days and just wait around inside of
the woman for the moment that fertilization became a possibility.
That was bizarre.
Yes, it was the witch’s body who did nearly everything. He hadn’t been wrong when he
summarized conception for Granger, but he was chagrined to discover that it was far more
complex and invasive than he realized, especially for the woman. Even more remarkable was
that her body prepared for a baby all month long and then bled if one didn’t take.
He was positively mortified to learn about the shocking, awful detail he had somehow missed
whenever Pansy claimed to be feeling poorly because of her monthlies. How on earth had
nobody ever told him about it? Why did he think it was limited to mood swings and
cravings? Draco had been under the impression that the only time his wife might bleed was
in the marriage bed on his wedding night. Supposedly it was an indication that the witch was
pure, but that was just a small detail his father had once mentioned in passing. There were
spells to confirm virginity in advance if anybody really cared about that sort of thing. The
notion that there could be blood every single cycle was dumbfounding to him. It was no
wonder Granger looked at him like he had three heads.
Code red indeed.
When he moved to learning about contraceptive methods, he discovered there was far more
to it than the charm his father taught him after his first year of Hogwarts. Witches could take
potions — he had heard of this before — but they were detectable with blood work.
Historically most muggle methods were not detectable with standard blood work, but the
Ministry had spent the last year developing a test for it that would be used during the health
screenings. That meant muggle hormonal methods could now be found too.
Her notes were extensive, tracking the requirements of the law and all the ways she might get
around it. Unfortunately there weren’t many good options. Anything that might manipulate
a witch’s hormones could be discovered by the blood testing couples were subject to. The
most reliable non-hormonal method was a muggle one that could be discovered with a pelvic
exam, which was a possibility if the couple did not have a confirmed pregnancy after a mere
three months post-consummation. According to Granger, that method was rather invasive
and could be very painful to place, especially if the witch had never had a child before. It
involved some small device that looked like a metal T, and Draco shuddered to think of
Granger sticking that up her…
No. He didn’t need to think about it because Granger had dismissed it in her notes. She
concluded that its useful life before it could be discovered was too short to make the
procedure worthwhile.
Furthermore, the wizard had to ejaculate inside of the witch to fulfill the terms of the
Ministry’s edict, which precluded using muggle condoms when meeting the baseline
requirements. She speculated that something called a diaphragm or spermicide might work to
get around the law, but there was no way to be certain without trying it and risking Azkaban.
No, the only two options she felt sure could work were controlling the timing of intercourse
and stopping a witch’s cycles entirely by reducing her body mass index. Neither were
foolproof to prevent children, but they would allow the couple to meet all the requirements of
the law and lower the likelihood of having a child while they did it. Draco wasn’t shocked
that the Ministry hadn’t considered starvation as a way of preventing children, but he was a
bit surprised that they hadn’t considered timing. Then again, with so many couples to
monitor, odds were good that quite a few of them would end up in Azkaban if the Ministry
had specified coupling during fertile windows only. Evidently identifying fertile windows
could be challenging without medical assistance. Even then, cycles weren’t always even and
witches could skip entire months. Granger speculated that the Ministry created the once-amonth rule for administrative ease and was simply relying on most couples being ignorant
about timing to prevent children.
His stomach clenched again when he remembered that Granger’s two solutions for avoiding
children had been reduced to one when she entered Azkaban. If one of the guards snapped
and raped her, he might lose his job, but he wouldn’t get more than a slap on the wrist unless
Draco took matters into his own hands. The laws against rape and sexual assault were still
on the books, but the penalties for doing it had been reduced to mere trifles.
Granger was right about that too. She was right about all of it. These laws were draconian
and had horrifying implications beyond the obvious discomfort of marrying someone you
didn’t know well. It was no wonder Granger was fighting so hard against it.
Some part of Draco felt guilty for being complicit in it whenever he urged her to marry him,
which he now did nearly every time he visited her.
“Marry me, Granger,” he would always say.
“Not yet, Malfoy,” she would respond with a smile and eye-roll.
It was the part of him that recognized he had no real autonomy either that kept pushing for it,
despite the horrifying things he was learning. Draco was sure it had something to do with the
indoctrination Granger liked to ramble on about, but Draco had never believed he could have
a real choice in who he married outside of a vanishingly small pool of “acceptable” witches.
Whether it was his parents or the Ministry, his wife would be selected for him. His small act
of rebellion by jilting Astoria didn’t change his underlying beliefs about that.
Intellectually the MLPP disturbed him. But emotionally he never thought he had much
choice anyway, and the MLPP had opened up a possibility that could never have been
considered before.
That powerful witch — though she was emaciated now and her fire was growing dimmer
with each passing visit — was still the most fascinating thing that had happened to him in
years. She made him wake up. She pushed away his occlusion. She was surprisingly pretty,
or she would be with some weight on her.
He was sure he wouldn’t be so eager to marry her right away if the law wasn’t pushing them
to do it, but he knew he was drawn to her despite the Ministry’s interference. Gryffindors
had always been the ones driven by idealism, and Granger was the perfect example of that.
Slytherins, however, were far more pragmatic and simply looked for better outcomes. Now
that Draco had discovered his better outcome, he no longer found the MLPP all that troubling
as it applied to him. Granger was softening toward him with each visit, and Azkaban was
getting increasingly difficult for her. It was only a matter of time before she agreed to marry
him, Draco was sure of it.
Yes, Draco knew he was making progress — good progress. She was thinking about it, and
Draco believed that a few more weeks of patience was all it would take. But then a wrench
was thrown into Draco’s plans by none other than Ronald Weasley.
“What the fuck is this?” asked Draco, as he slapped the paper down in front of Granger, who
pulled it to her curiously.
An Open Apology to Hermione Granger
by Ronald Weasley
I met Hermione Granger on my first day of Hogwarts when we were eleven years old. I was
fortunate to share a compartment on the train with Harry Potter by sheer luck, and Hermione
arrived half-way through the trip to tell us Neville Longbottom had lost his pet toad. I’ll
never forget how she looked that day: bright-eyed, bossy, and authoritative. She’s always
been much smaller than me, but I could tell her power was impressive, even back then.
It took some time for us to warm up to each other. I was a git and she was a know-it-all. But
then Harry and I locked a mountain troll in the toilet with her by accident on Halloween
night, and we saved her from it. Up to that point Hermione had been nothing but a
scrupulous rule-follower. After we were caught with an unconscious troll, she proceeded to
lie to three teachers so Harry and I wouldn’t get into trouble. That was how the Golden Trio
came to be.
Since that day we’ve spent most of our holidays together, we’ve fought a war, we’ve tied our
lives together with our families and friends, and we’ve laughed and cried.
Hermione and I have always bickered and fought – I can be hot-headed, and she can be
stubborn. But at the end of the day we have always found our way back to each other, and
even though our lives are very different than I thought they would be just a few months ago I
don’t want that to end.
When Hermione jilted me, I reacted poorly to it. I was embarrassed, and I lashed out at her
over and over again after it happened. Even seeing her in Azkaban wasn’t enough to calm
my temper, and I said some terrible things to her that I deeply regret. Since our last
encounter she has refused all further visits from me, and I can’t say I blame her for it.
Since I can’t apologize in person, I am apologizing in writing. Hermione, I’m sorry for
treating you the way I did. I’m sorry I didn’t listen to you, and I will try to do better. I want
you back in my life. I want to see you, laugh with you, argue with you, and help you. Please
answer my visitation requests Mione. I love you too much to let you go.
Draco was desperately trying to keep his temper under control. He knew this wasn’t
Granger’s fault. He received a report every time Weasley showed up to Azkaban, and she
had declined his last three visits. But Draco was struggling to keep his anger in check.
Granger was his now. She was thinking about marrying him. Draco had dutifully visited
Azkaban two or three times per week for nearly two months to keep her company, even
though it was terrible for his own mental health. He had sacrificed what little reputation he
had recovered since the war so Granger could prove her point. Weasley had his chance with
her, and he botched it. Now he was married to somebody else. So what the fuck was he
playing at, saying “I love you” publicly to Draco’s fiancée?
As she read it, Granger’s face cycled through shock, sadness, anger, and hurt, and then it
settled on something that made Draco’s heart stall out: hope.
“What?” asked Draco angrily.
“He apologized,” she breathed. “He’s never really apologized like this before.”
As she read the article, Draco sensed she was slipping away from him already. Weeks of
effort and planning were being pushed aside for the Weasel.
Draco’s anger started to build. He knew he should stop it. He needed to keep his feelings
contained. He tried to occlude, but he couldn’t do it around Granger. She always broke
through his walls so easily, and usually that was welcome. Right now though, he felt his lips
turn into a sneer and the vitriol poured out of him as though the years of emotional growth
and maturation had never happened.
“Do you love him too, then? Do you regret being so rash that you didn’t get your happily
ever after with the Weasel? Do you wish you had opened your legs for him to give him a
dozen red-headed brats all because he said sorry to his precious Mione?”
Her jaw dropped, and she stood up angrily. “What the hell is wrong with you?”
“What’s wrong with me is the fact that you’ll forgive him for two months of shitty behavior
all because he wrote some sodding article for The Prophet!”
“Well I forgave you for seven years of shitty behavior all because you sent me a bleeding
steak with green beans when I was staying at the fucking Ritz Carlton! You weren’t even my
friend when I forgave you, and it’s not like you’ve ever bothered to apologize! Ron’s been
one of my best friends for more than half my life, and at least he said he was sorry!”
Draco faltered, and he knew he should back down, but he couldn’t seem to do it.
“I’ve told you I owe you a dozen apologies before!”
“Saying you owe them to me and actually giving them to me are two different things! And
then to imply that I’m some sort of baby-crazy slag because your fucking caveman complex
can’t handle the fact that I have male friends is completely unacceptable! I have never done
that with Ron, I’ve never wanted to do that with Ron, and you… you…”
She gave a great shuddering breath and then dissolved into tears.
Draco just stared at her, his anger fizzling out of him and guilt setting in.
“Granger,” he said quietly.
“No! Go!”
“Granger…” he said more fervently.
“Get out, Malfoy! I don’t want to see you anymore!”
Draco reached forward and gripped her arm. “Please, Granger, I’m –”
She yanked it out of his grip and stumbled backward, tripping over the chair and falling to the
ground. Draco winced as she cracked her head against the stone wall.
“Granger!” he cried, as he approached her, but she just scooted away from him and rubbed
the back of her head gingerly as she sniffed.
“Don’t,” she said in a small voice. “Please just go away, Draco.”
The use of his first name froze him in place. It sounded so sweet and so sad coming from her
lips. His gut twisted as he realized just how badly he had fucked up.
He slowly rose and backed away from her. She refused to look at him, though he was
searching for any sign of forgiveness, anything that might tell him he could salvage this. He
found nothing and slumped as he made his way to the door.
“Guards,” he called dully.
A moment later a cocky guard – it was Shepherd again – came strolling into the room. He
took one look at Granger huddled in the corner and Draco standing over her.
“So you finally got tired of her, did you? She’s a mouthy little bitch, I don’t blame you.”
Draco snapped, and he shoved the guard against the wall, one hand holding his wand arm,
and the other choking him. The guard made a strangled noise, and he heard Granger gasp
behind him.
“Fuck you,” Draco growled.
The guard could hardly speak. His eyes were wide, and he was starting to turn blue.
“Malfoy!” cried Granger. “You have to stop!”
She sounded frantic, and instinctively Draco’s grip loosened. The guard took a deep,
shuddering breath and he slumped, glaring at Draco with fury.
“I could have you thrown back in here for that,” he hissed.
Draco leaned toward him, all of his hatred for Weasley and himself flooding him as he did
it.
“Try it and see what happens to you,” he said.
Something in the guard’s eyes changed ever so slightly as he looked at Draco. Then his eyes
slid to Granger, who was still on the floor. Draco’s blood went cold at the look he saw there.
“If you so much as fucking breathe near her, I’ll end you,” he said quietly. “Call somebody
else to collect her. She needs a healer, and I need to go.”
Draco and Shepherd engaged in a staring contest for a few more seconds until Shepherd
broke it and turned to fetch another guard. Draco turned to look down at Granger, but she
just stared straight ahead, looking furious. A muscle in Draco’s jaw twitched.
“I’m sorry you had to see that,” he said stiffly.
She gave him no reaction, and he didn’t press his luck further. When the door opened, a
second guard was standing there, leering down at Granger just a bit.
“The little lion is learning her lesson, isn’t she?” he crooned, as he pulled her to her feet.
Draco’s temper started to spark yet again, but Granger finally met his eye and shot him a
warning look that told him this would end poorly for her if he couldn’t get it together. He bit
his tongue and forced his anger back down, instead taking note of the name badge on the
guard’s uniform.
Owen Fry
He gave her one last glance, but her eyes were downcast now as she was led down a hallway
deeper into the prison and Draco followed Shepherd toward the exit. Shepherd said nothing,
but Draco felt hate radiating from him, and only now did Draco realize the kind of danger he
had put Granger in by rising to his taunts. His stomach churned as they passed the familiar
hallway that included the Head Warden’s office, and before Shepherd could stop him Draco
ducked into it without knocking and locked the door behind him.
Lawrence Boles looked up at Draco in surprise. He was a bit older than Lucius, but they
used to run in the same circles, and Draco had seen him at the Manor a time or two. His son
Lucien had been an acquaintance of Draco’s in Slytherin House. Draco was certain that
Lawrence was the one reporting everything to his father.
“Lord Malfoy,” he said a bit warily. “To what do I owe the pleasure?”
Draco got straight to the point.
“I’ll give you fifty thousand galleons to fire those wankers Henry Shepherd and Owen Fry.
You can have half the money today and the other half when you send me a copy of their
termination letters.”
Lawrence barely blinked. Draco knew that bribes were his bread and butter.
“And if anybody asks why they have been terminated without notice…?”
“You can tell them the truth. They are disrespectful to prisoners and their guests.”
Lawrence cocked his head and studied Draco. “I’m surprised at you.”
Draco shrugged. “Whatever Father has told you is a load of bollocks. I was matched with
Granger, and I’ll not have my future wife be mistreated. It’s not becoming.”
“There are other things not becoming…” started Lawrence, but Draco raised his hand to cut
him off, affecting a bored expression. He needed Lawrence’s cooperation for this. Draco
knew he was a blood purist, though not as rabid as Lucius.
“Save it. I’ve heard it a thousand times from Father, but what’s done is done. I jilted Astoria
because frankly, she’s a fucking cold fish. I certainly didn’t expect to be matched with
Granger after I did it, but here we are. I’m doing the best I can with it under the
circumstances.”
“And…” prompted Lawrence.
“And disrespect is disrespect. It doesn’t matter how I feel about it, she and I are engaged.
That gives me certain responsibilities toward her. Besides, say what you will about Granger,
but at least she’s fiery. There’s not a single thing about her that’s cold.”
Lawrence pursed his lips a little, but Draco sensed him wavering. Finally, he nodded to
himself, as though conceding the points Draco just made. Draco gave an invisible exhale of
relief.
“Very well. Send half as soon as you return to the mainland, and I’ll fire them at the end of
their shifts. I’ll expect the other half to arrive within a day or it will be the last deal we do
together.”
Draco nodded. “I’ll send an elf with proof of funds. And make sure they are assigned to
other prisoners during the rest of their shifts today.”
Lawrence waved him off as though this was obvious and then pulled a slip of paper out of his
desk and handed it to Draco. “My account information. I trust you know what to do with it.”
Draco suppressed a snort as he realized Lawrence had these small slips of parchment ready to
go. For all of Granger’s reforms, Azkaban was still incredibly corrupt.
“Expect my elf,” said Draco, as he pocketed the paper and headed back into the hallway,
coming face-to-face with an irate-looking Shepherd.
“Shepherd!” called Lawrence’s voice from inside the office. “I have a new assignment for
you!”
Draco just smirked as Shepherd scowled and slunk off.
Despite the wretched fight with Granger, Draco exited Azkaban with a bit more spring in his
step. He had a bribe to fulfill.

6 November 2003
Two weeks.
It had been two full weeks since Draco last saw Granger.
After bribing Lawrence Boles to fire those guards, Draco’s pleasure at resolving at least one
of Granger’s issues started to evaporate when he remembered how he left things with her. He
gave her a couple days before writing a letter to her, asking if she would be willing to see him
again. She didn’t respond.
Draco decided to give her a few more days until he received one of Granger’s reports stating
that Ron Weasley had requested a visit with her, and she accepted it. Draco had no way of
knowing what happened during that visit, but he found his stomach rolling as he thought
about Weasley worming his way back into her good graces while she was completely
ignoring Draco.
He waffled about scheduling a conjugal visit to make her see him, but he really wanted her to
invite him to do it first. He worried that if he made her show up for him it would make things
even worse than they already were. He wrote her another letter instead, and that also went
unanswered.
He started to occlude again.
Then Draco got a second report about a visit from Weasley, and he decided he had enough.
If she could see Weasley after all the shit he had said to her, then she could bloody well see
Draco too. Draco had to talk to her. He had to apologize and bring her back around to him.
It wasn’t just about Astoria anymore. Draco couldn’t believe how empty he felt without
those visits to look forward to. They had become a welcome diversion, something enjoyable
that shattered the monotony of his life. He couldn’t stand this emptiness he was living with.
Still, Draco hesitated about scheduling a conjugal visit. He wanted something – anything –
from her that told him she was receptive to hearing him out. So Draco showed up to
Azkaban the day after Weasley’s second visit and checked in as a regular guest.
“You’re not here for a conjugal?” asked the guard in confusion. His name was Brian
Maywood, and he was one of the few guards Draco didn’t despise. He had always been
entirely professional whenever Draco arrived and left the premises.
“No,” said Draco. “Last minute decision. I couldn’t provide notice.”
Maywood nodded. “Alright then, suit yourself. I’ll check to see if she’s willing to visit with
you.”
Draco nodded and sat on a metal chair in the waiting area, which was a new experience for
him. Usually he was taken straight back to their room. He chewed his lip and bounced his
leg nervously as he waited for the guard to return. At long last he came back with an
apologetic look on his face, and Draco’s heart sank.
“I’m sorry sir, but she’s refusing your visit.”
“Please…” begged Draco. “Please tell her I’m so sorry, and I just want to apologize to her in
person and…”
“I wish I could,” he said simply. “But she has a right to refuse you and not be disturbed again
for twenty-four hours. You can try again tomorrow or…”
Maywood trailed off.
“Or?” prompted Draco.
“Or schedule a conjugal so she has to see you.”
“I don’t want to make her!” he said in dismay. “I just want her to listen to me!”
“I know,” said the guard, and Draco was surprised by how sympathetic he sounded. “But
she’s got her rights. She’s also stubborn. I’ve refused more visitors for Miss Granger these
last two months than the rest of the prison combined.”
Draco knew this of course. She received visitor requests several times per week, and she
accepted a surprisingly small number of them.
“You, though, are the only person who can make her show up,” said the guard. “And you’ve
been doing it for two months, so I’m not sure why this time is any different.”
“I know that,” said Draco quietly. “I just… the things they do to prepare her for me… she
hates it. I hate it. And it will make her even angrier than she already is. We still argue a lot,
but I thought we were finally getting somewhere. Then we had a huge fight the last time I
was here, and…”
Draco sighed. He didn’t know why he was telling the guard all of this. It was stupid and
could wreck their carefully crafted narrative.
To his surprise Maywood started to chuckle.
“What?” asked Draco in confusion.
The guard just shook his head. “That witch is head over heels for you lad.”
Draco blinked. “Pardon?”
“You heard me. She pretends to hate you, but she doesn’t.”
Draco knew she didn’t hate him — or at least she didn’t before he fucked it all up — but he
thought “head over heels” was a bit of a stretch.
“How do you know?”
The guard waved a dismissive hand. “The number of times she’s threatened us with you?
That’s half the reason her guards dislike you. She never shuts up about you.”
“Really?” asked Draco in slight disbelief.
Maywood rolled his eyes and started to speak in a high voice, in a credible impression of
Granger.
“Carter! If you don’t stop looking at me this instant I’ll tell Malfoy about you the next time
he summons me! Bradshaw! Mind your fucking manners! Malfoy gets very angry when
you lot are rude to me! Paulson! You think that’s an insult? Maybe you should hang around
Malfoy and ask him for some lessons. Or perhaps you shouldn’t bother. Your intellect is
barely a fraction of his after all…”
Draco felt a bit faint. “She says all that?”
Maywood snorted. “Of course she does. When she showed up, we all thought we would be
answering to Potter. But instead, it’s all about you. It’s Malfoy this and Malfoy that. I doubt
she’s said another bloke’s name the entire time she’s been here. She’s made it clear enough
she belongs to you.”
“But she hates it when I’m a possessive arse!” he said in confusion.
“Nah, she just wants to hate it. She’s stubborn, I’ll grant you that, but she’s flattered by the
attention.”
“The attention?”
“Of course the attention! How many next-of-kin show up two or three times per week, every
single week while a prisoner is incarcerated?”
Draco stared blankly at him.
“Just you,” he supplied. “And Miss Granger knows it too. She wrote that reform law, didn’t
she? She did her research. That’s one of the reasons she drives us all mad — she likes to
throw that bloody reform act in our faces whenever she’s not talking about you, not to
mention all the things she’s written in The Prophet. Truly, that woman is an utter menace.
But my point is, she knows how often most prisoners receive visitors. She knows she’s
getting special attention.”
“It’s just because it’s Granger though,” said Draco. “You said yourself that she gets a lot of
visitors.”
“That’s part of it, but it’s also because of you. Even Potter and Weasley only visit every other
week or so. From what she’s said, you two hadn’t spoken in years until right before you were
matched by the Ministry, and yet you’re still here all the damn time.”
Draco was silent. “So you really think she doesn’t hate me?”
“Not at all. But if you fought with her worse than usual the last time you were here, that
would explain a lot. She’s not been looking well, and her temper has turned vicious ever
since you disappeared.”
Draco sighed. “So what do I do?”
“Schedule a conjugal. Tell her you’re an idiot. Let her shout at you and slap you around a
little bit. She needs to get it out of her system. Then grovel for whatever bullshit you said to
her.”
Draco thought about this. He really had no other choice if she was refusing regular visits
from him. Merlin knew he couldn’t stand the silent treatment much longer.
Draco finally nodded and rose. “Alright then. Let me put in my notice for a conjugal visit
tomorrow.”
Maywood smiled a little. “Right you are, sir. And now that I’ve done you a favor, you can
do one for me too.”
“Oh?”
“If she ever agrees to marry you, drop me a note about the date. There’s a betting pool
among the guards about how long it’s going to take you to wear her down. I want to win it.”

Chapter 7: The Conjugal Visit.
6 November 2003.
Draco called an emergency meeting of his best friends the night before his conjugal visit with
Granger.
“I need you all to think back and tell me every time I’ve been an arse to Granger or to
somebody who was Granger-adjacent.”
“By Granger-adjacent does that include Potter and Weasley?” asked Theo.
“Ugh, I suppose. But also anybody else. Lovegood, the Weaselette, those sorts.”
They stayed up late into the night collectively brainstorming – Pansy’s pregnancy-driven
narcolepsy had now been replaced by pregnancy-driven insomnia. By the time they were
done with it Draco surveyed the enormous list with some dismay.
“Damn,” he muttered.
“Mmmm,” agreed Blaise. “I’d say you’re fucked.”
“It’s not like you were that much better,” grumbled Draco.
“I was just an arrogant prick,” said Blaise loftily. “I didn’t even bother to engage most of the
time. But you were a cruel bastard. There’s a difference.”
“Pansy then,” said Draco a bit desperately.
“I was bitchy, that’s true,” she acknowledged. “But most of it was because I was trying to get
your attention. Besides, it’s not like I’m the one trying to marry one of the many…” she
peered down the list again, “... many people I tormented.”
“Well I was perfectly pleasant to nearly everyone,” chimed Theo most unhelpfully. Draco
glared at him before crumpling a bit.
“Fine. Obviously I need to grovel.”
“I can’t believe you haven’t already,” pointed out Pansy.
“She seemed fine around me? I don’t know – she said she forgave me when I sent her that
filet from the Four Seasons.”
His three friends had equally skeptical looks on their faces.
“Well she’s a bleeding heart,” said Theo slowly. “She probably decided to let bygones be
bygones. I doubt she thought she would ever have to see you again when you two were
exchanging television recommendations.”
“But if you want to marry her,” added Pansy, “you do owe her an apology for… a lot. In
fact…”
She narrowed her eyes as she thought about something.
“In fact what?” asked Draco, and he winced to hear the note of desperation in his voice.
“In fact, I’d wager your lack of an apology is a big reason she hasn’t agreed to marry you
already. You know how principled she is,” and Pansy rolled her eyes at this. “You said she
was thinking about it but she hasn’t made up her mind yet.”
“I –” Draco cut himself off as he thought about this possibility.
Could it be? Was this the reason there had always been a bit of a wall between them with
every visit? It was subtle, but it was there – some impenetrable thing that Draco could never
seem to fully identify, let alone break through. He had always thought it was the Ministry of
Magic – and yes, that was part of the problem too – but was it also his lack of an apology?
Granger clearly made a distinction between Draco’s comments about knowing he owed her
an apology and an apology actually given. Perhaps this had been his achilles’ heel all along.
“You’re probably right,” he said in a defeated voice.
Pansy’s eyes softened. “Draco, you can fix this. Just go in there tomorrow and give her this
list. Then grovel. Be honest with her. It’s the best you can do.”
“Grovel. Right,” said Draco.
His friends left and Draco stayed awake late into the night, as he practiced his apology to the
woman he wanted to marry over and over again.

7 November 2003
Draco woke the next morning feeling remarkably clear-headed given the thing he had to do
today. He had spent hours examining it from every angle and concluded that Pansy was
right: all he could do was throw himself on her mercy and beg for forgiveness. He didn’t
believe that this would be enough to make her come around to marrying him, but if they
could reach detente again then perhaps he could continue to work toward it.
He wasn’t looking forward to their meeting exactly, but he also wasn’t dreading it as much as
he thought he would. He had been going mad without her, and he didn’t think he could get
any lower than this.
He showered, dressed, and then made his way to the breakfast room, fully expecting to be
alone again as he had been for every meal since the Matching Ceremony.
“Draco,” said his father as he walked in and came to a halt. Both of his parents were sitting
there, enjoying breakfast as though the last two months of silence hadn’t happened.
Alarm bells immediately went off in Draco’s mind.
“Father,” he said cautiously. “Mother,” he nodded to her.
Narcissa met his eyes and gave him a tight smile before glancing at Lucius and then focusing
back on her breakfast.
Draco watched them both out of the corner of his eye as he made a plate for himself. His
father was reading The Daily Prophet, and his mother was picking at her food daintily. Draco
brought his plate over to the table and lowered himself into his chair, waiting for the
inevitable confrontation as he started to chew slowly.
But it didn’t come. Lucius made his usual noises as he read various articles in the paper —
he had always been the type to react out loud to whatever he read. Narcissa moved some
food around her plate before pushing her chair back and rising.
“I’m afraid I must run. I have an appointment in Diagon Alley.”
“Of course, my dear,” said Lucius cordially as he and Draco rose too.
Narcissa swept out of the room, and Draco sat again, the tension building as his father did not
speak. He appeared to be totally absorbed in his paper.
Draco took advantage of his father's distraction and ate quickly before glancing at his watch.
He needed to move along if he was going to make it to his visit with Granger on time. He
rose to leave and was stopped by Lucius’s voice.
“Have a pleasant day, Draco,” he said casually.
Draco stopped and turned back to his father. “You too.”
Lucius nodded and then looked back down at his paper as Draco slipped out.
He leaned against the wall outside of the breakfast room, heart pounding for some
inexplicable reason. This wasn’t entirely out of the norm. When he and his parents gave
each other the silent treatment in the past it was usually broken this way: just a few words at
a time over the course of several days before things were back to normal. As a rule, Malfoys
did not apologize – a characteristic that Draco was now viewing as a deep flaw in light of his
immediate plans. But still, the timing of this struck him as suspicious, and Draco just knew
his father was plotting something.
Draco checked his watch and swore. He only had a few minutes before he really needed to
leave for Azkaban to be on time. He hurried up the stairs to his room, grabbed his list of
indiscretions, and then hurried back down the stairs where he saw his father again.
“Draco,” he nodded again. “Heading out?”
“Yes,” said Draco. “I have an appointment as well.”
Draco didn’t elaborate. He was certain his father knew where he was going.
Lucius inclined his head. “Very well. Best not tarry.”
Draco narrowed his eyes for a moment, as he waited for his father to chastise him, but it
didn’t come. He hesitated a moment longer and then nodded in agreement as he turned to
leave through the front door to head to the apparition point at the foot of the lane. As he left
he could feel Lucius’s eyes boring into his back as the front door slammed shut behind him.
Draco started to head to the apparition point, but something made his feet slow and then
halt.
It was odd – too odd, really... breaking the silence this morning, confirming that Draco was
going for his first conjugal visit in more than two weeks, watching to be sure he left…
Draco hesitated and checked his watch. He really had to leave soon or he would be late, but
his curiosity was piqued. Perhaps he could spare just five minutes.
Without taking the time to second-guess himself, Draco tapped his wand on his head and
disillusioned himself. He walked around the side of the house and slipped in through one of
the side doors near the kitchen and crept up the servants’ staircase to his room. He made
quick work of searching the drawers in his dresser for the thing he was sure he still had and…
there. He found a pair of very old extendable ears that he had acquired during the war.
Draco wasn’t certain if they still worked, but it was the best he could do given his time
constraints.
He shoved them into his pocket and slipped back down the stairs to the foyer, before darting
behind a statue in a niche just as the fireplace in the foyer turned green to announce the
arrival of someone via floo.
Draco peered around the statue to find Kingsley Shacklebolt stepping out onto the rug. A
moment later the fireplace turned green again and Beatrice Greengrass arrived. Draco began
to creep forward to follow, but then it turned green a third time, and his jaw dropped to find
Ron Weasley stepping out and following the other two to a room that Draco recognized was
his father’s study.
Draco waffled for a split second. He was due to see Granger very soon, and she would surely
be outraged if he stood her up. He absolutely hated the thought of her going through the
preparations for him without even seeing him. But then again, this was suspicious as hell.
Neither Draco nor any of his friends had deep enough ties at the Ministry to learn what was
going on. Lucius had an absolute chokehold there, and they were waylaid every time they
tried to discover whether the MLPP would be amended. This opportunity was too good to
miss.
He crept toward the study and pressed himself into another nearby alcove while he fed the
extendable ears under the door. To his great relief, the volume turned on as though he was
standing inside the room with them.
“...gone to see her?” asked the voice of Weasley. Draco scowled.
“Yes, he left a few minutes ago,” said Lucius.
“She’s properly hacked off at him,” said Weasley, and Draco could hear the satisfaction in his
voice. “I’m guessing she’ll try to make him leave as quickly as possible.”
“Then we’d best not linger,” chimed Shacklebolt. “It’s been several weeks since we’ve been
able to meet. If she’s really that angry with him, he may not push for another visit for a
while.”
Draco went cold as he realized the implications of this: his father was meeting with these
three whenever Draco gave notice of a conjugal visit because he was sure to be out of the
house.
“In that case, let’s jump right in. I believe we have the necessary votes,” said Lucius
smoothly. “The amendment will pass.”
“Then do we really have to wait until the three months is up?” asked Weasley’s voice. “I’d
prefer to just marry her now.”
“We need to wait,” said Shacklebolt. “The original couples were given three months to
consummate. We can’t change the rules about that, and in any event you aren’t the only one
who hasn’t consummated your marriage, Ron. There are quite a few others who seem to be
waiting until the last minute.”
“But –” he objected.
“No buts,” insisted Shacklebolt. “The amendment is going to allow the Wizengamot to select
a new spouse for any matched couples who have refused to wed during the first three
months. Their new spouses will be selected from the pool of witches and wizards who were
originally unmatched because of uneven numbers or who have marriages that are
unconsummated within that time frame. Given what she has written about you in The
Prophet, it is best if you are the Wizengamot’s only choice, Ron. There will be some couples
who wait until the very last day to consummate.”
Draco’s heart was thudding, and he forced himself not to occlude. He couldn’t afford to miss
a single thing.
“The open apology worked though,” said Weasley. “My reputation has improved.”
“Of course it has,” Lucius scoffed. “Because I practically wrote it for you.”
Draco’s jaw dropped.
“You’re right Ron,” said Shacklebolt smoothly, ever the politician. “But she still did plenty
of damage before Lucius intervened. This needs to be spun as a romantic thing. You’ll say
that you failed to consummate your marriage because you love her, and you decided to brave
Azkaban with her, rather than be bound to anybody else. It’s a huge gesture, and the media
will eat it up. You’ll say that the amendment took you by complete surprise, but you are
pleased with the softening position of the Ministry because it allowed you to marry the love
of your life. You will also say that the Ministry is being generous to your former wife, who is
a dear friend of yours now – since the Wizengamot is annulling your marriage by edict, she
will simply be put back into the pool of the unmatched instead of being forced to go to
Azkaban too. They’ll forget the things Hermione wrote, and she will be released from prison
wed to the person she should have married all along.”
“And Astoria?” came Beatrice’s voice for the first time.
“I have no doubt that Astoria will be selected for Draco,” said Shacklebolt calmly. “We have
multiple witnesses who say that Draco simply panicked at the altar. They’ve been betrothed
for years, and the Wizengamot is allowed to take those factors into account when selecting a
more appropriate match under this amendment.”
Draco felt sick as he continued to listen, and he forced himself not to occlude as he heard
them casually discuss his coming match with Astoria.
You knew Father would do something like this, he told himself. Don’t put up any walls.
Listen to everything.
“It had better work, Lucius,” said Beatrice. “You assured me two years ago that if the
Ministry instituted the MLPP it would make Draco propose.”
Draco blinked, wholly unprepared for this turn in the conversation. He tried to process this.
Father had been behind the MLPP in the first place?
“Yes, and it did,” said Lucius hotly. “But the boy has an independent streak, he always has.
He just got cold feet Beatrice, and now he’s stuck in a Ministry-mandated match that he can’t
get out of. I would remind you that the only reason he can’t get out of it is because the
Ministry put in no time limits for those who refused their marriage. As the law is currently
written, Miss Granger could waste away in Azkaban for years, and Draco could not seek
another match while she’s doing it.”
“Well we didn’t think anybody would actually choose to go to Azkaban,” muttered Kingsley.
“Let alone last as long as she has…”
Beatrice harrumphed. “Draco and Astoria should never have been at the Matching Ceremony
in the first place, Lucius!”
“I know,” said Lucius in a weary voice that told Draco they must have had this same
conversation a dozen times. “But they were, and we should focus on the silver lining here.
Astoria is unmatched. And Draco managed to match with the one witch who is apparently
stubborn enough to prefer prison over the marriage bed. It’s given us a perfect opportunity to
amend this law and force a match between them, Beatrice.”
Don’t occlude. Don’t occlude. Don’t occlude.
“And I’ll get Hermione,” added Weasley happily. Draco’s stomach soured.
“You’ll get Hermione,” agreed Kingsley. “And I’ll appear to be responsive to the public’s
complaints about the law because it softens some of the penalties for noncompliance.
Everybody wins here.”
Except for me and Granger.
“I still have some concerns,” said Beatrice.
“And what are those?” asked Lucius in a tight voice.
“These conjugal visits. He keeps scheduling them.”
“According to my contacts there, it appears that all they do is talk. Miss Granger has given
no indication that Draco has tried to exercise his rights.”
“But you can’t be sure,” added Beatrice.
“Hermione would have told me,” said Weasley in an arrogant voice. “She’s angry at him
because he’s a right tosser – no offense – but if he had… done that… she would have said
something by now.”
“And she probably would have written about it in one of her articles,” pointed out
Shacklebolt.
Draco checked his watch and saw that he was officially late. There was no way he would be
able to see her today. He closed his eyes, wishing more than ever that he could be there with
her, but this was more important. He had to stay and remember every single word.
There was silence for a moment when Beatrice said, “But what about their emotional
connection?”
Weasley scoffed. “Emotional connection? She hates him.”
Draco’s stomach dropped. Had she told Weasley that? Or had it been an act to convince the
guards?
“But he doesn’t seem to hate her,” said Beatrice coldly. “He continues to visit her. He’s
there right now.”
“I won’t deny that he seems to have a certain… fascination with her. But I’ve explained how
the Malfoy magic works,” said Lucius curtly. “The moment he’s wed to Astoria, his attention
will shift to his wife until an heir’s blood is added to the wards. That is more than enough
time for this little interest of his to burn itself out. He will be eager to consummate their
union, and there will be no getting out of the marriage for either one of them until three
children are born. The same goes for Weasley and Granger.”
“And what about Miss Granger?” asked Beatrice. “Will she also be eager to consummate?
Do the Weasley’s have similar family magic?”
Draco held his breath as he waited for an answer.
Weasley snorted. “Our family magic is just tied to fertility. Why do you think my mum had
seven kids? They didn’t add Bill’s blood to the Burrow until they finally had a girl.”
Draco’s stomach froze at this.
“So she will produce your children quickly then,” said Beatrice. “But will she want to?”
Weasley shrugged. “Does it even matter, as long as Malfoy and Astoria consummate theirs?
They will be just like everybody else once they consummate. Besides, Hermione and I have
done some things. Once she adjusts, she’ll want to shag me.”
Draco felt sick as he imagined it. Weasley sounded so sure of himself.
“You’ll be given thirty days since you'll be operating under the amendment,” said Kingsley
sternly. “And she must do it, Ron. I can’t afford the political fallout if we send her back to
Azkaban until the next Matching Ceremony. With Draco wed to Astoria there will be no
other wizards to choose from. I can’t have this fight with her for another eight months.”
“I’ll get it done,” he said. “Whatever it takes, I’ll make sure it happens.”
Fuck no. She’s better off in Azkaban than this.
“Good,” said Kingsley. “See that you do.”
“I still –” started Beatrice, but she was cut off by Lucius.
“It will work, Beatrice. We’ve been over this. Draco will consummate with Astoria. She’s
dutiful, and he will desire her.”
Beatrice sniffed. “I was going to say that I am still concerned about the next few weeks. He
has until the end of November to change her mind.”
“But he won’t,” said Weasley in a comforting tone. “She’s seeing me again. She’s resisted
Malfoy this long, she will resist a few more weeks. She’s probably shouting at him as we
speak.”
“And we will pass the amendment in a closed session the night before the three months is
up,” added Kingsley. “As Minister I can call an emergency session with no public notice.
She won’t have any warning that it’s coming, as long as Weasley doesn’t tell her about it.
They will be rematched at midnight and married immediately after that.”
“I haven’t breathed a word,” confirmed Weasley.
“There you go then,” said Kingsley. “They won’t marry each other, Beatrice. She’s lasted
this long.”
Draco heard some shuffling and melted away, moving quickly to the staircase to get to his
room before they saw him. He was thinking quickly. His father would surely receive an alert
that Draco was a no-show today. He had to have some explanation for his absence.
He got into his room and grabbed a sheet of parchment and scrawled a quick note, which he
sent off with his owl.
Lawrence,
My apologies for failing to arrive today. I got food poisoning at breakfast and didn’t make it
onto the boat to Azkaban. I’ve been laid up for the last hour. Please go ahead and
reschedule my conjugal visit with Hermione Granger for tomorrow morning instead. I
should have recovered by then.
Regards, Draco L. Malfoy
Then he started digging through his drawers to pull out one of the things he had noticed when
searching for the extendable ears: a very old puking pastille.
He grimaced as he stared at it. It was surely past the expiry date, but there was nothing for
it. He moved to the bathroom where he ate one end of it, and then promptly felt his stomach
turn. He emptied it into the toilet, forced down the other half, and then gasped, “Patsy!”
The little elf that typically cared for Draco appeared with a CRACK!
“Yes Master Draco?”
“Patsy, I’m ill,” he groaned, gesturing to the evidence in the bowl of the toilet. “I was feeling
off right after breakfast.”
Patsy’s eyes widened and then she started to fuss over Draco, gently scolding him as she
settled him into bed.
“Master Draco must be telling Patsy he is sick before he is getting this ill!” she chided.
“Patsy is getting a potion for Master Draco!”
He groaned his thanks. “Please tell Mother and Father I was hoping to eat lunch with them
today, but I’m too ill. I saw them at breakfast. I don’t want them to think I’m still cross with
them when I don’t show up.”
Patsy’s eyes shone with unshed tears. “Of course, Master Draco. I is telling Master Lucius
and Mistress Narcissa that you is sick and is not angry with them.”
“Thank you,” he said as he rolled over.
Draco knew that Lucius would be by for a visit once he heard the news to confirm that Draco
hadn’t eavesdropped. For once, Draco was ready for him. He knew exactly what his father
was plotting now, and Draco had no intention of letting him win.
Draco was more determined than ever to marry Hermione Granger.

8 November 2003
Draco had never been this nervous as he made the short, frigid trip across the sea in the tiny
magical dinghy. The twenty minute trip felt like a lifetime as he prepared himself to see
Granger for the first time in weeks.
As Draco expected, his father had shown up to his room a few minutes after Patsy left with a
stomach potion. Draco made a credible effort to moan and groan and told his father he didn’t
even make it to the boat before he was vomiting in the bushes near the apparition point.
Lucius appeared wary, but seemed to accept Draco’s explanation when he appeared for
dinner, acting for the world as though he was pleased to be back on speaking terms with his
parents.
It was all an act of course. But Draco had to play the game because he had to get this news to
Granger without his father suspecting.
She was bound to be furious with him, and he knew he deserved every ounce of her anger.
But Merlin did he hope he could talk some sense into her today. The amendment they were
facing was catastrophic, and Draco had been up most of the night teasing out various
hypotheticals in his mind.
There was one thing he had settled on. Draco would not, under any circumstances,
consummate a marriage with Astoria. If he couldn’t convince Granger to marry him before
the amendment was passed, then he would be matched with her for thirty days. Surely he
could resist the Malfoy magic that long. Surely. At that point his bond with Astoria would
dissolve and then… what? Would he go to Azkaban? Would he be matched with one of the
other fifteen witches who left the Matching Ceremony that day?
Draco didn’t know for sure, and he didn’t want to find out. He wanted to marry Granger so
he would never find out. But if she wouldn’t agree, then Astoria would be a detour on the
way to someone else or prison. It wasn’t just the occlumency problem anymore — it was the
principle of the matter.
Draco had to acknowledge that he had never been principled before. It made him think of
Granger.
He needed her to forgive him. He needed her to marry him. He just needed her.
The dinghy hit the dilapidated pier, and Draco looked up at the ugly prison, its thick stone
walls covered in moss from the sea. It was always gray here, and his occlumency kicked on
instinctively. He checked in, exchanged a brief word with Maywood, and then was escorted
into the familiar room where he waited impatiently.
A few minutes later, the door opened, and Draco’s breath caught as he stared at her.
She had deteriorated. There was no other word for it. She was thinner than ever, her skin
was nearly translucent, and her hair hung limply over her shoulders. She gave him a look
that was filled with pain, mixed with anger. She said nothing as she stared at him.
“Here she is,” said the guard. “Heard you were ill. Try not to be sick, will you? We just got
her clean.”
Draco nodded curtly, and the guard left the room, locking it behind him, and Draco made his
way slowly toward her, as though approaching a skittish animal.
“Granger…” he said quietly, but he was stopped by the look she cast at him. She looked
deeply hurt.
“Why didn’t you come?”
Draco furrowed his brow. “Pardon?”
“Yesterday! Why didn’t you come? You don’t look ill… and I had to… they made me…”
she choked back a little sob.
Draco’s stomach sank, and he reached out to grip her arms. She looked up at him with wide
eyes.
“Granger, I’m so sorry. Please know that. You’re right I wasn’t ill. I was eavesdropping on
a meeting about an amendment to the MLPP. Apparently Shacklebolt and my father have
been meeting at the Manor whenever I visit you. Father was acting a little odd yesterday
morning, so I hung back and saw Shacklebolt arrive. I’ve been trying to find out what
they’re up to for weeks, and I couldn’t let the opportunity go. I had no choice. Please
forgive me.”
She blinked. Clearly whatever she expected him to say it was not this.
“Oh,” she said softly, looking taken aback. “Well then can you tell me –”
“Yes,” said Draco firmly, “but I need to say something else first.”
A wary look crossed her face now, as though she knew what was coming.
“Granger,” he said. “I need to apologize to you for so much. I was an utter prick to you for
years all because of something that doesn’t matter at all. I made this list…”
Here he pulled out the roll of parchment he brought through security – Maywood barely
checked him anymore – and he unfurled it.
Her eyes widened when she saw it.
“This is every single thing I can remember that I should be sorry for. I’m sure I have missed
a few things, but it’s a lot. Theo, Pansy, and Blaise even helped, and I realized just how cruel
I was when I wrote all of this down. I am so sorry. I’m sorry for all of it. I’m especially
sorry for that name I used to call you. I want you to know I haven’t said that word since the
day the Dark Lord died. And fuck, I am so sorry for that day at the Manor. I know I
hesitated to identify Potter, but I did identify you. That day haunts me, Granger. It’s haunted
me since the moment it happened. And most recently I’m sorry for the way I reacted to
Weasley’s apology in The Prophet. You’re right that I have a bit of a caveman complex. I
truly wasn’t aware of it until recently– nobody but you has ever drawn it out of me before.
Astoria could shag a hundred men, and I wouldn’t give a shit. But you? Just the thought of it
makes me sick, and I think it was the declaration of love at the end that just made me see red.
But that’s really no excuse. You have male friends, and having male friends doesn’t mean
you’re doing… things with them. Even if you were, it’s none of my business, not yet. I
promise I’ll work on my jealousy.”
Draco realized he was rambling and bit his lip as he stared down at her face. She wasn’t
making eye contact with him, but was reading through the list as he spoke.
He waited for her to finish, and at long last she looked up, and Draco thought she was peering
into his very soul as she seemed to weigh his words.
“There’s one thing you forgot on this list,” she said quietly.
Draco’s stomach clenched. “Tell me.”
“Buckbeak,” she said simply.
Draco’s face fell.
Buckbeak. Of course. That hippogriff his father had arranged to be executed. Then he
realized she was still speaking.
“...and I had to rescue him and…”
“Wait,” Draco interrupted. “He wasn’t killed?”
“No, I was just saying that,” she said impatiently. “I spent all year working on his appeal and
of course your father intervened so they sentenced him to death anyway. I had to go to his
bloody execution to rescue the poor thing, all because you were being a whiny little git about
it! You were warned, and you baited him anyway. Then you blew the whole thing out of
proportion just to hurt Hagrid.”
“But it didn’t die?” Draco breathed.
Draco hadn’t forgotten about the hippogriff at all, he just didn’t know that Granger cared that
much.
“No, of course not. Harry and I rescued him and then used him to break Sirius Black out of
Professor Flitwick’s office, and they went into hiding together. Last I heard, Buckbeak’s
living in the Forbidden Forest again.”
Draco gaped at her for a moment, before easing into a surprised smile. “Father told me he
was killed… I’m so happy he wasn’t.”
Then he looked down at her. “I’m sorry for that too, Granger. Truly.”
Her eyes softened, and she nodded. “Alright then.”
His heart leapt. “Alright? Does that mean you don’t hate me?”
She pursed her lips. “Unfortunately, you’re rather difficult to hate. Believe me, I’ve been
trying. But you insist on writing to me and visiting me… and I find myself unable to do it.”
Draco was smiling so broadly now he thought his face might split. “Never say so, Granger.”
“You’re still a pretentious git.”
“Always, darling.”
She rolled her eyes, but Draco thought she was struggling not to smile. “Alright. I forgive
you. Though as for the caveman thing…”
Draco quirked an eyebrow.
“You probably shouldn’t be giving out bribes to have guards fired if you really are trying to
turn a new leaf. You could have just had them reassigned to a different prisoner.”
Draco flushed. “Ah. You heard about that,” he said delicately.
She just gave him a knowing look.
“Well they disrespected you and…” he sighed, seeing the look on her face. “Fine.
Caveman. Noted.”
She hesitated before turning a little pink. “Well if I’m being honest, I might like it more than
I let on. It’s come in handy around here, I can admit that. But bribes to ruin people’s careers
are a step too far. So is implying that I’m complicit in whatever thing is making your
instincts go haywire. I have never shagged Ron, nor will I ever shag Ron. I jilted him and
went to Azkaban for many reasons, but one of them was so I wouldn’t have to shag him.”
Draco swallowed, knowing that she might not be getting that choice very soon. But instead,
he just nodded.
“I’ll… try to reign it in then.”
“Thank you,” she said, as she reached down to tug on his hand to lead him over to the table.
“Now we should talk about this amendment.”
They settled themselves into their usual seats, and he watched as she seemed to brace herself.
“How bad is it then?” she asked.
“Bad,” said Draco. “Very bad.”
Granger slumped. “An extended prison sentence then? True solitary where I’m no longer
permitted visitors or mental stimulation? Just tell me, Malfoy. I can take it.”
“None of the above,” said Draco, trying to stay more calm than he felt. “If we don’t get
married by the time the first three months is up then we will both be rematched and forcibly
wed to somebody of the Wizengamot’s choosing. It sounded like there would be no
opportunity to object this time.”
Her eyes started to widen. “But who…”
“The eligible pool will be witches and wizards who were unmatched originally due to uneven
numbers and anybody who has not consummated their own marriage by the deadline. The
Wizengamot will have discretion to pick from that group.”
Draco fell silent as he watched her absorb this. He wanted nothing more than to excoriate
Weasley in front of her, but after their last fight he couldn’t risk it. Not yet. Besides, the
thing about Hermione Granger was that she was truly brilliant. She was the type who could
make connections herself and draw conclusions – usually the correct ones. Draco was
learning that sometimes it was best to just let her arrive there on her own.
“So your match will be Astoria,” she said quietly. “If your father has the political capital to
get the MLPP instituted in the first place, then he can certainly arrange that…”
This was sufficiently diverting that Draco said, “Wait. You knew about his involvement?”
“You didn’t?” she asked in confusion.
Draco shrugged, looking bewildered. “Not until I overheard them talking about it yesterday.
I know he’s involved in politics, and obviously he’s on the Wizengamot himself, but I had no
idea the MLPP was his idea until I eavesdropped.”
Granger looked at him oddly. “That’s… comforting, actually.”
“What? Why?”
She shrugged. “I don’t know. I guess some part of me has always wondered if you
supported it too.”
Draco looked at her squarely. “Granger, I’ll be honest with you. I’m pretty pleased with my
match, and that has made my feelings about the law complex in recent weeks. You never
would have been a possibility without this mad law, and I like that you’ve become a
possibility. I like it a lot. But no, I didn’t support it when it first came out. I still don’t
support the idea of it – I’ve read all the things you assigned me to read, and it’s dangerous.
Besides, according to Beatrice Greengrass – she was at the meeting too, by the way – one of
the reasons my father cooked up the plan in the first place was to strong-arm me into finally
marrying Astoria. As I see it, he promoted a dangerous law purely as a means of
manipulating me and finding a solution to one of Shacklebolt's problems after the war, which
put the Minister in his debt.”
She was flushing a little at this, but her eyes started to shine. “Well… that’s good, Malfoy.
I’ve worked on the other side of your father for years, you know. The think tank I used to
work for was usually in direct opposition to the things he wanted.”
“Was it now?” asked Draco, smiling a little. “Then it’s no wonder he’s so intimidated by
you.”
She gave a light laugh at this before trailing off. “Yes, well… he did soundly beat me when it
came to getting the MLPP passed. But if he was trying to strong-arm you as part of it, I can
see why he was so determined to get his way.”
Draco inclined his head. “Yes. And that means you’re also correct. My match will be
Astoria. They discussed it yesterday.”
“But mine…” she trailed off, as she furrowed her brow to think.
Say it. Say it. Say it.
“I suppose mine would have to be somebody who hasn’t consummated,” she said slowly.
“There were no wizards leftover.”
Draco said nothing, and she looked at him and narrowed her eyes. “You know.”
Draco bit his lip but stayed silent.
“Draco Malfoy, there’s something you aren’t telling me.”
He sighed. “Let’s just say there were four people at the meeting, Granger. Not three.”
She studied him, and Draco willed her to see the truth so he wouldn’t have to tell her.
“But who…” she whispered. Then her eyes widened. “No. Surely not.”
“I don’t want to hurt you again.”
“Malfoy… tell me if it’s true. I need to know. Tell me all of it.”
He sighed as he nodded slowly. “Fine. I'm sure your suspicions are correct. Weasley was
there. He hasn’t consummated his marriage to Prudence, nor will he. Evidently there are still
some other holdouts, but they think every other couple will do it before the deadline to avoid
Azkaban. They intend for him to be the last man standing, and if he is then he will be
rematched if we aren’t married, instead of being sent to prison. He will be the only choice
for you, and they are in the process of rehabilitating his reputation so that when you’re wed it
undermines everything you’ve been writing. That’s why his apology was in The Prophet. It
was partially to get back into your good graces, but also to make him sympathetic when you
marry him. They plan to spin the whole thing as a romance. He’s going to claim that he was
so in love with you he was willing to go to Azkaban instead of betray his feelings and
consummate a marriage with somebody else. Then you get to avoid marriage to the evil exDeath Eater and live happily ever after with the man who pined for you.”
At this she crumpled, and Draco was struck by how small she suddenly looked.
“Granger,” he said gently. She looked up at him, and Draco saw her eyes were starting to
water. His heart broke for her, and he quickly stood and walked around the table. He knelt in
front of her and cupped her cheek, swiping back the tear that had just spilled from her eye.
She started to shake, but she wasn’t resisting his touch, so Draco took the opportunity to pull
her to him, off the chair, until she was cradled in his lap on the floor.
He held her while she cried, rocking her ever so slightly. She was so small now, so frail. It
had been her against the world since the day the day the MLPP was announced, but
everybody had limits. Draco wondered if this betrayal had finally broken Hermione Granger.
“I’m surprised you believe me,” he murmured.
She gave a giant sniff. “I knew something was off,” she said in barely a whisper. “He’s
visited me a couple times, and it’s been different. He’s been more confident than usual and
very careful not to argue with me. He’s been one of my best friends for twelve years, and
he’s never once acted like that. Our entire relationship is filled with bickering, but there
hasn’t been any the last couple of visits. It felt wrong, but I didn’t… I couldn’t… oh God…”
She dissolved into tears again, and Draco tightened his grip on her.
As if on instinct he dipped his face and found the top of her head. He inhaled and smelled
that same prison soap and unique scent that was distinctly hers. But it was mixed with grief
and exhaustion too.
He said nothing as he waited for her to cry it out, preparing for the next part of this. He knew
what he was going to ask, and he was not optimistic about his chances. Even though Weasley
had betrayed her, he was still Weasley. There were years of positive history there, some of
which was romantic. Draco’s years of history with her were overwhelmingly negative. But
he had to try. He decided to say it as soon as she gave him an opening.
At long last she started to quiet, and she still hadn’t pulled away. Draco took this as a good
sign.
“Granger,” he said. “Marry me.”
She lifted his head to study his face.
“So you won’t have to marry Astoria?”
She looked defeated and a little hurt.
He shook his head. “I don’t want to marry Astoria, that’s true. But if I don’t consummate
within thirty days, I’m guessing I’ll be matched with yet another witch. Please understand
this isn’t just about avoiding Astoria for me. I know I can avoid Astoria. But I don’t want to
be matched with anybody else. I want somebody who's not just interesting but utterly
fascinating. I want to be matched with you.”
“Really?” she said in a quiet voice.
“Really,” said Draco firmly. “And Granger, you will be married in a few weeks one way or
another. If you pick Weasley and don't consummate with him within thirty days then you will
be back in Azkaban until the next Matching Ceremony because there will be no other options
for you. They talked about that yesterday, so I know that would be the outcome for you. The
next Matching Ceremony is months away. We both know you don't want to be here. It's a
terrible place, and getting released for thirty days only to come back again is not a fate either
of us wants for you. That means you need to marry one of us and consummate it to stay
married until you can get the MLPP overturned. I know you can do it, darling, but you need
more time, and Azkaban has served its purpose. You need to leave this place."
She was silent for a long while.
"I do hate this place," she whispered. "I never want to come back here... I..." She trailed off,
seemingly unable to finish. Draco's heart leapt. The admission that she didn't want to come
back to Azkaban was the first step. Now he had to lock her down.
"I'm glad you don't want to come back to Azkaban. You have been so strong and have done
so well, but you can do more outside of these walls now that you have the world's attention.
And that means you only have two real options here: me or Weasley. I know I’m
pretentious. I know I bullied you. I know I’m asking a lot of you to face my parents and a
whole world of prejudiced arseholes. In a few weeks you could be with the man you’ve
loved as a friend since you were a child. I know all that. There’s truly not a single reason
why you should pick me over Weasley. But please darling… please choose me.”
She was quiet for a long while. Finally she said, “Well I can think of one pretty big reason
why I should choose you.”
Draco’s heart started to race. “And what’s that?” he whispered.
“If I choose you, then Kingsley and your father both lose… not to mention Ronald, that
absolute git…”
Draco felt his face split into a broad smile, and she gave him a watery smile too.
“You’re right darling. If the Golden Girl marries the scary ex-Death Eater then all of them
lose. Every last fucking one of them.”
She looked up at him, and Draco’s entire attention was captured by her eyes. They reminded
him of warm honey, almost molten and rimmed red from her tears moments ago. Something
about them made Draco raise his hand to her cheek again.
“Marry me,” he whispered, kissing her on her forehead.
“Marry me,” he said again, now kissing her on her cheek.
“Marry me,” he said as he kissed her on the nose.
“Tell me what I have to do so you’ll marry me,” he said as he kissed her ear.
Her eyes had fluttered closed, and she gave a soft sigh. “Help me blow it up,” she said.
“Done,” agreed Draco, kissing one eyelid.
“Make an unbreakable vow that says –” she started.
“Alright,” he agreed, kissing her on the other eyelid.
Her eyes opened, and she frowned a little. There was a small wrinkle just above her nose that
Draco kissed too. Now that he started he could hardly stop. He was thrilled she was
negotiating with him. Him. Not that absolute tosspot the Weasel, but him, Draco Malfoy.
And fuck, she was letting him kiss her too. Granted, they were just pecks but still… this was
unprecedented.
“You don’t know what it’s going to say.”
“Doesn’t matter,” said Draco easily. “I’ll do it.”
“But –”
“Surprise me, darling,” he said, kissing the corner of her mouth. “Call it my wedding gift.”
She smiled a little at this. “Alright.”
“Anything else?” he asked.
Her expression turned serious. “We’ll need Harry.”
Draco paused and debated this. If he said no, she might say no too. But fucking Potter…
then again, she was so close to giving him this.
“Fine. Can you tell me why?”
She looked surprised that he wasn’t fighting her, but pleased. “Because if we do this, I want
the amendment to pass first.”
“But why?”
“Because I want the world to know exactly how they are trying to manipulate us. And I want
to watch the egg fry on Kingsley’s face when it doesn’t work.”
Draco sat back to study her. “They’re going to do it at the very last minute.”
“Oh I’m sure they will,” she said knowingly. “Let me guess. It will be a closed session the
night before the three months are up. Then they’ll send Ron to me at midnight once the
deadline passes.”
Draco’s eyebrows flew up, both surprised and impressed.
“Precisely.”
Granger nodded. “It’s been done before when there is emergency legislation. Harry’s
allowed in the Wizengamot sessions because he’s a senior auror. He can get himself assigned
as security. Procedurally, they have to read the entire law out loud when it’s done that way.
He will be able to hear the whole thing and let us know if there are any last minute issues.”
Draco cocked an eyebrow at her. “Alright, I’m listening. Go on.”
She shrugged. “They have to pass it before midnight don’t they? And then they’ll wait
around until midnight to match us. Harry can send a message to let you know if it passed or
not and whether there are any complications we need to be aware of. If it passes then you’ll
come here, and we’ll get married.”
Draco frowned. “That’s cutting it a bit close.”
“Yes, but I know Kingsley. The print deadline for The Daily Prophet is eleven the night
before. It will be passed before then to make it into the papers the next morning. Then he’ll
plan to announce my marriage to Ron in The Evening Prophet later on that day.”
“Bloody hell,” he muttered. She was brilliant.
She shrugged. “I told you I did this for years. Up until recently Kingsley and I were usually
on the same side. He’s fairly predictable.”
“Alright, so we’ll have at least an hour to get married,” he said a bit nervously.
“Yes. It’s best if Harry doesn’t leave the session. Frankly, I would guess Kingsley will want
him to stay so I’m not warned.”
“Then how can he send a message to me?”
“I have a way,” she said simply. “I’ll send him to you, and he can arrange it. I suppose you
could seek him out yourself, but he’s more likely to listen to everything you say if it comes
from me first.”
“You really think Potter is going to cooperate?”
She looked at him squarely. “He will. He feels terrible about following me after the wedding
and trying to push me into an unwanted marriage with Ron. He’s actually suggested I marry
you instead because… well, I’ve spoken rather highly of you… while making it clear you
really annoy me of course.”
Draco’s eyes widened at this.
“But how will you tell him so my father doesn’t hear? He has supervised visits with you.”
She gave him an impish smile. “Surely you can trust me to convey a confidential message to
Harry?”
“But –”
“Trust me, Malfoy,” she said. “Harry and I talk in a language the Azkaban guards don’t
understand. We’ve been doing it for years around the Weasleys because they don’t
understand it either.”
“And what language is that?”
“Disney movies.”
Draco let out a surprised laugh at this, remembering that Nemo movie she suggested and
marveling at her cleverness.
“Alright, I’ll trust you. Anything else?”
“We’ll need a couple witnesses and somebody who is certified by the Ministry to marry us.”
Draco frowned as he thought about it. “Witnesses aren’t a problem, but somebody certified
to marry us could be a challenge…”
“There’s an official registry you can check. They loosened the rules a lot last year when
there were so many weddings taking place. The list is fairly extensive.”
Draco nodded. “Alright, I’ll look into it. Anything else?”
She worried her lip a little. “You aren’t going to like this, but I think you should stay away
for the rest of the month. I’ll keep meeting with Ron, and I’ll try to pretend like I don’t want
to wring his neck. But when the guards come in here, we need to be fighting. I want them to
think that you have no chance with me. I want everyone’s defenses lowered so they don’t try
to stop you when you come to me that night.”
Draco looked at her closely. “You’re certain?”
She nodded. “I’ll be here, Malfoy. Come for me on a surprise visit once the amendment is
passed, and I’ll agree to see you and anybody else you bring with you. We’ll do it then.”
He huffed an exhale. “Fine. I’ll arrange it all with Potter then. It should be the last day of
the month.”
She nodded and looked down for a moment before giving him one last, piercing look. “Just
one more thing… you’re sure you want this? That you want me?”
He gave her a soft smile. “Tell me Granger… how many times have I proposed to you?”
“Eleven times at last count,” she admitted.
He smiled a little as he tucked his hand under her chin and raised her face to look at him.
“Then allow me to make it a round dozen. Hermione Granger, will you marry me?”
She broke into a small smile and nodded. “I can’t believe I’m going to say this, but yes
Draco Malfoy. I’ll marry you.”
Draco thought his chest was going to erupt as he leaned down. He hesitated for only a
moment before he gave her a soft, tentative kiss.
When was the last time he had kissed a woman? It had been years. He knew he hadn’t done
this since Hogwarts. It was unfamiliar and yet wonderful all at the same time. Despite her
condition her lips were pliant and warm. He could feel her breath on his face, and his heart
was racing as his lips mapped hers. It was chaste, but perfect.
She sighed into him, and he was just about to deepen the kiss when the echo of footsteps
came down the hall, and she gasped and scrambled off of his lap. Draco got to his feet too,
heart still pounding from that kiss as she started to shout.
“I’VE TOLD YOU TO STAY AWAY! DON’T COME BACK! I DON’T KNOW HOW
MANY TIMES I HAVE TO SAY IT! I DON’T WANT YOU!”
“Granger –” he started, but he was cut off as the door opened.
“FUCK YOU MALFOY!” she screamed, and she reared back and slapped him so hard his
vision popped.
There was a noise as the guard strode forward and restrained her, and Draco just stared at her
in amazement as she was cuffed, rubbing his cheek absently.
She cast one last look at him as she was escorted out of the room, and Draco’s eyes tracked
her every movement. The moment she and the guard were gone Draco broke out into a wide
grin.
Fucking hell I can’t wait to marry her.
Chapter 8: The Nott Pot Plot.
15 November 2003.
Draco had kissed Granger. He had kissed her. And she kissed him back. If they hadn’t been
interrupted she might have let him open her mouth and explore it with his tongue and then
maybe her neck and…
Fuck.
It defied all reason that such a small thing could have sent his senses scattering like this. It
had been the softest thing — so soft it could even be interpreted as friendly if he hadn’t just
locked down an engagement with her a moment before. It didn’t speak of all the things he
had begun to fantasize about. He had started seeing her in his dreams and in that hazy place
between wake and sleep when his body became hard. No, the kiss had no heat, but it was so
much more than that. It was the sealing of a promise. It was his commitment that he would
do anything and work with anyone to make sure they got married on her terms. He would
come for her. His father would not thwart him.
He had two weeks until they got married, and his father started bringing Astoria around
again. Draco made a point to mope a bit after the slap, and Lucius seemed convinced that
Draco was truly on thin ice with Granger, even if he hadn’t given her up.
“Astoria, my dear, Draco has something to say to you,” said Lucius sternly at a family dinner
soon after his last visit.
She turned a cold eye toward Draco.
“I… apologize for causing a scene at the wedding,” he said through gritted teeth.
She sniffed. “When did you decide to ignore your duty?”
Oh fuck you.
“About three seconds before I did it.”
“But you didn’t return,” she insisted.
“No, I… wasn’t sure how to salvage things.”
She pursed her lips but nodded in acknowledgment of this.
“Have you been seeking another match since you’re unbound?” he asked lightly. Part of his
plan was feigning ignorance.
He saw Astoria and Lucius exchange glances. To his surprise, his mother’s mouth tightened
just a little bit.
Now that was interesting.
Narcissa was speaking to him again, but she refused to talk about Granger, Astoria, the
wedding, or even the Ministry. It was as though she didn’t want to think about any of it.
Draco had no idea how to interpret her expression.
“I’m certain Mother is considering several options. I have every hope to secure a marriage
before the Matching Ceremony next year,” said Astoria primly.
“That’s excellent news,” he said cordially.
“And yourself? I understand Miss Granger is still in Azkaban.”
“She is,” said Draco simply. “She’s determined to make her point.”
“It’s rather common of her, is it not? She clearly has no appreciation for authority or duty,”
said Astoria.
Draco felt his anger building, and he leveled a fierce look at her.
“She’s extraordinary. The Malfoys would be fortunate indeed if a witch like her agreed to
imbue our line with her brilliance and determination. We could only be so lucky.”
There was a resounding silence at this, and Lucius looked furious while Narcissa appeared
perturbed. Astoria’s facade started to crack.
“Well,” Astoria hissed, “unfortunately for you, she doesn’t want you does she? You keep
trying to get her attention like a lost puppy, and yet you find yourself rejected by that nasty
little mudblood over and over again.”
That’s what you think, you bitch.
Lucius and Narcissa were both opening their mouths to intervene, but Draco cut them off.
“I don’t appreciate that sort of rudeness Astoria,” he snapped. “In any event, I’m patient.
I’m giving her a little space right now at her request, but I would happily spend years
working to convince her if that's what it takes. I could never seem to stay away from her at
Hogwarts either, you know. I still remember how utterly divine she looked at the Yule Ball.
Every bloke in the room wished he was Viktor Krum that night. When she finally comes to
her senses and decides to marry me, I’ll be the envy of wizarding Britain.”
This was a deep dig at Astoria, he knew. The Yule Ball had been a sensitive subject for years
because Draco asked Pansy instead of her. She got an ugly look on her face as Draco implied
there was yet another witch he would have preferred to be with.
“Draco,” said Lucius sharply.
“What?” asked Draco innocently. “I would think it’s a good thing that I’m so intrigued by
her. She’s my fiancée is she not?”
Lucius’s nostrils flared, and Draco took a perverse pleasure in his predicament. Lucius
couldn’t very well object without showing his hand.
“Astoria, how is Daphne faring?” asked his mother, providing an inelegant shift in
conversation.
Astoria raised her hand to tuck her hair behind her ear as she began to respond, and Draco
caught a glint of something unexpected.
“Astoria, why are you still wearing that?” he interrupted.
Astoria and his mother fell silent.
“Wearing what, Draco?” she asked.
“That ring.”
Again there was an awkward silence as everyone looked at her left hand as one. Astoria
raised her eyes to Draco, and she went pale.
“Force of habit.”
“Well let’s break it then, shall we?” he said, holding out his hand for it.
“Draco!” said his father, standing up.
Draco gave Lucius a stony look. “We aren’t engaged, father. And I rather think that if she
wears this ring around other suitors they will get the wrong impression.”
A vein was throbbing in Lucius’s temple, but Astoria said nothing as she slowly slid the ring
off and handed it to Draco.
“Thank you,” he said, before he raised his wand and vanished it.
“Draco!”
This time it was Narcissa who was looking at him in shock.
“That was a Black family heirloom!” she cried.
“We have others,” he said, shrugging. “I certainly have no more use for it.”
Then he rose and nodded cordially at his parents and Astoria. “I’ll bid you all good day.”
He caught Astoria’s lower lip trembling, but he felt nothing as he swept from the room. He
was internally seething that she had been wearing the ring all this time. It was large, old, a
true family heirloom with emeralds and diamonds. Draco absolutely hated it.
He also hated the fact that he hadn’t given a ring to Granger. She deserved to have one, but
she was in prison and the guards would never allow her to keep it. Besides, it would have
given away their secret. The only thing he could give her to commemorate that moment was
the kiss, and he tried to console himself with the fact that he had not kissed Astoria when she
said yes. His proposal to Granger was special. It would have to be enough.
Draco was brooding. It had been a week since he last saw her, and Merlin did he miss her.
Weasley had visited once more, no doubt to confirm that Granger still hated Draco. Potter
had finally dropped by for a visit the previous day as well, and Draco was hoping he would
reach out soon. If he didn’t, then Draco would have to work it out himself. He couldn’t
leave it up to Potter to ensure their marriage occurred.
As if his thoughts summoned him, there was a CRACK! and an old, wizened house elf was
staring at Draco with rheumy eyes. He was wearing a tea towel like a loin cloth and a locket
on his chest.
“Master Draco, it is an honor,” he croaked, bowing low.
“Who are you?” asked Draco warily.
“I am Kreacher. I serve the Noble and Most Ancient House of Black and Harry Potter.”
Draco blinked. “Erm… how…?”
“Master Sirius Black bequeathed his home and me to Master Harry when he died, Sir,” the
old elf said.
Draco’s eyes widened. He remembered Bellatrix complaining bitterly about the house that
had passed into Potter’s possession. Draco eyed the elf curiously now.
“And you can still pass the wards here?”
“I is helping Mistress Cissy and Mistress Bellatrix during the war, Sir. They is allowing me
through. They is forgetting to keep Kreacher out.”
“Bloody hell,” breathed Draco. This was brilliant and far more secure than owls.
“My master is wishing to meet with you tonight Sir. He is asking Kreacher to learn if there is
a place where Master Draco may go where he will not be followed or overheard.”
Draco sat back and contemplated this. He supposed Potter was right to be cautious. Draco
didn’t think his father was having him tailed, but if he showed up with Potter at the Ministry
or even at a pub it could make its way back to Lucius. And perhaps Potter had his own
reasons for not wanting Draco in his home.
He bit his lip as he thought about it, but there was only one sensible answer. His parents
wouldn’t think it suspicious at all. He just hoped Theo wouldn’t kill him.
“Nott Manor. I’ll let Theo Nott know that Potter should be allowed to visit. Everyone who
will be there is trustworthy. Let’s plan to meet at eight.”
Kreacher bowed low, his nose nearly touching the floor, and a moment later he disappeared
with another CRACK!
Draco sighed and pulled out some parchment to let Theo know he would be hosting guests
tonight.

At precisely eight o’clock, Draco took a deep breath and made his way to the foyer. He
pinched some floo powder in his fingers and threw it in the fire. The door to his father’s
study opened just as Draco was crying, “Nott Manor!”
He wooshed away, but managed to catch the look on Lucius’s face as he was spinning away.
To Draco’s great relief he didn’t appear suspicious at all, nor should he be. Draco went to
Nott Manor a couple times per week and had for years.
He stepped out onto the hearth on the other side and peered up to find Blaise, Pansy, and
Theo already waiting for him, giving him equally skeptical looks.
“You really think he’s going to help?” asked Theo as he moved forward to hand Draco a
drink.
Draco shrugged, trying not to look as worried as he felt. Granger seemed certain, but then
again Weasley was Potter’s best friend. It seemed unbelievable that Potter would help Draco
take Granger away from him.
The floo flashed green, and Potter stepped out of it, looking around a bit warily at the four
Slytherins.
“Malfoy, Nott, Zabini, Parkinson…” he said.
“I’m a Nott too,” said Pansy, as she unconsciously touched her stomach.
“Of course,” said Potter. “My mistake.”
There was an awkward pause and Theo stood and walked toward him. “Where are our
manners? Potter, come on in. Grab a drink. There’s much to discuss.”
Draco couldn’t help but notice that Potter opted for a butterbeer instead of something harder.
He doesn’t trust us either.
He popped the top and settled down to look at the four of them before running a hand through
his hair. Then he settled his gaze on Draco.
“Alright, Malfoy. Hermione tells me it’s time for Belle to escape from Gaston and marry the
Beast. Tell me what you know.”
Draco blinked in confusion, though he heard Theo let out a thoughtful, “Huh…”
“What the fuck are you talking about Potter?” asked Draco.
Potter rolled his eyes. “Beauty and the Beast. Haven’t you ever seen it? Belle’s father is
captured by the Beast and she trades places with him. She falls in love with the Beast while
she’s imprisoned, but Gaston is jealous and wants to kill the Beast so he can marry Belle
instead. I always said Hermione was a dead ringer for Belle. She’s brunette and bookish.
Hermione never liked the movie though until very recently.”
“Why not?” asked Theo curiously.
Potter shrugged. “I used to joke that the Beast was Ron and Gaston was Cormac McLaggen.
Hermione never seemed to like what that implied. But she seems to have come around to it
now that the Beast is somebody else.”
He gave a knowing look at Draco now, who was still having trouble following, though Theo
gave a thoughtful nod as though he understood perfectly.
“Anyway,” Potter said, waving his hand dismissively, “my point is she sent me to you. Tell
me what’s going on so I can help her.”
Draco exchanged glances with his three friends but then started to speak. He told Potter
everything: how they had been staging their conjugal visits for the press, Lucius’s
involvement with the MLPP in the first place, and the meeting Draco overheard at Malfoy
Manor.
As he spoke about the meeting, the color drained from Potter’s face, and by the end of it his
head was in his hands.
“…and I actually proposed to her the last time I saw her,” finished Draco. “She accepted, but
she wants to get married in that short window between the time the amendment passes and
the deadline.”
Potter let out a groan. “Of course she does. Merlin, this is going to be a shitshow.”
“But you’ll help,” said Pansy firmly. “Weasley is…”
“Yes, yes, obviously I’ll help,” said Potter. “Ron is just…”
He threw his hands in the air a bit exasperatedly.
“What’s their relationship then?” asked Theo, and Draco shot him a grateful look. “How
much of this is Weasley actually wanting her versus Weasley having some misplaced notion
of ‘saving’ her from Draco?”
Potter sighed. “A little of both, I’d wager. Ron’s always had stronger feelings for her than
she had for him. But then again, he’s also the only bloke who has ever gotten a second date
from her — and I mean the only one. Hermione has never had a serious romantic
relationship, not really. Ron is the closest she’s ever gotten to one. And he’s comfortable
with his life, and Hermione fits into it seamlessly. You have to understand, the Weasleys
are… a lot. They’re my family, and they’re Hermione’s family too. They even added us to
their family clock after the war. But their whole world revolves around the Burrow, and
anybody they adopt gets pulled into it as well. I think there were times Ron believed he and
Hermione were together when she didn’t think they were… but whether they were or not was
somewhat irrelevant because they would still go to Sunday lunch at the Burrow since that’s
what Weasleys do. It always made their relationship very undefined, and it led to a lot of
misunderstanding and miscommunication, especially when Ron would push for more and
Hermione would pump the brakes.”
“But she still agreed to marry him,” pressed Pansy.
“Well sure,” said Potter. “Ron was the obvious choice for her because who else would
Hermione marry? Some bloke she’s been on one date with? Me? We’ve always thought of
each other as siblings, that would have been way too weird. Besides, I was with Ginny.”
“But then she ran from her own wedding,” pointed out Blaise. “And you chased her.”
Potter slumped. “Yes, and I shouldn’t have done that. She’s just never shown a very strong
interest in anybody, and I thought Ron was a safer choice than risking the Matching
Ceremony. We all did. She loves him, she’s just not in love with him. Trust me, she’s made
it very clear that I really fucked up when I did that.”
“So you’ll help Draco then,” said Pansy. “Even though it’s not what Weasley wants.”
Draco felt so grateful for his friends in that moment. They were asking Potter all the
questions he needed answered before he trusted Potter to help with this.
Potter glanced at him and sighed again. “Yes. It’s going to be bad if Ron finds out I helped,
but he’s going behind Hermione’s back on this. It’s not the first time I’ve been caught
between them, and it won’t be the last. I have no idea how Malfoy broke through her walls,
but she’s made it clear what she wants.”
“I’m surprised you aren’t warning me off,” said Draco cautiously. He wasn’t displeased by
Potter’s support, but he was very surprised.
Potter gave a mirthless laugh. “Have you met her? Hermione’s scary, and she’s
exceptionally hard to bullshit. She doesn’t need me running off blokes for her. If she wants
you, then I may not understand it but it’s good enough for me.”
Draco’s eyebrows flew up.
“Now Ron will warn you off or worse,” he added. “You’ll want to watch your back.”
Draco snorted. “Weasley could never — ”
Potter cut him off with one look. “Ron is a lot more strategic than you think. He’s also an
owner of Wheezes and has access to plenty of experimental products that aren’t safe enough
to sell to the public. Don’t underestimate him.”
Draco clenched his jaw, but said nothing more to that. Truthfully, he was shocked that
Weasley had the sense to put aside his differences long enough to work with Lucius. Perhaps
Potter had a point, and Draco should tread carefully.
“Fine. So where does that leave us?”
Potter rubbed the bridge of his nose and then looked at Draco. “What are the odds Lucius
will leave you alone that evening?”
Draco snorted. “Nonexistent. I’d put money on a late family dinner with Astoria invited
along. She and her parents will be welcomed to spend the night. It’s happened before. I’ll
have to sneak out.”
Potter and his three friends all wrinkled their noses at this and fell silent as they thought
about it.
Then Theo spoke up. “Maybe the three of us could be there too…” he said slowly, as he
gestured toward Pansy and Blaise.
“Why, to provide some sort of distraction?” asked Draco. “I was counting on having a
couple of you come along as my witnesses.”
Theo inclined his head at this. “Yes, but there are three of us right? Two witnesses and one
of us to take your place once the evening concludes.”
Draco’s eyes widened, and he shot a look at Potter. “Could you arrange that?”
Potter nodded. “Polyjuice? It’s unauthorized of course but… yeah. I have some. Hermione
does too. We’ve always kept a stash around since the war.”
“It needs to be me,” said Theo, looking at Draco. “We can polyjuice into each other, and you
can leave with Pansy and Blaise after dinner.”
“I don’t love the idea of Pansy coming to Azkaban…” said Draco slowly, though he saw
Pansy roll her eyes at that.
“There’s no choice,” said Theo. “It has to be me.”
“Why?” asked Draco in confusion.
“Well Pansy can’t because she’s pregnant. It’s not safe for the baby.”
“Why not Blaise then?” asked Draco curiously.
“Because he’s not married,” said Theo simply. “If this all goes tits up and they try to force
polyjuiced you to marry Astoria right at midnight…”
“It won’t work because you’re already bound,” breathed Draco, as Theo nodded.
“Brilliant,” muttered Potter. “I assume Nott can impersonate you?”
“Good evening, Mother,” said Theo in his poshest voice, “and you, Father. Your hair is
looking particularly blonde today. Ah, and here is Astoria. I can’t wait to marry you and be
magically tied to your bitchiness for the rest of my natural life.”
Everyone but Draco laughed, as Theo took a little bow. Then he turned serious. “Don’t
worry about that, Potter. I’ve seen Draco around his parents and the Greengrasses for years.
I won’t fuck it up.”
Potter nodded. “Alright. And I’ll make sure I’m assigned to the Wizengamot session for
security. I probably won’t be able to go with you to Azkaban, but I can send you messages to
let you know how it’s going.”
“How?” asked Blaise curiously.
Potter shrugged. “Hermione and I have some paired galleons with protean charms on them.
She adapted them to be wandless so I can just stick my hand in my pocket and send messages
that way. I may not be able to read yours while I’m with the Wizengamot, but I can send
them to you.”
Draco’s eyes widened, as he remembered the galleons Granger and Potter used in fifth year.
He did the same thing when communicating with Madam Rosmerta under the imperius curse.
“Alright,” he said simply. “That should work.”
Potter nodded. “I’ll send Kreacher with a galleon and some polyjuice directly to you later on
tonight. I’ll send enough for twelve hours for two people.”
Draco nodded gratefully. “Then all we need is somebody who can marry us.”
They fell silent, then Potter said slowly, “There should be a registry. It’s not that hard to get
on it, but it would be best to use somebody who is already authorized.”
“I’m sure Mother has a copy of it,” said Draco.
Potter, however, shook his head. “No. Let me get it. I can request it easily enough from the
Ministry archives. On the off-chance Lucius hears about it he will assume I’m getting it to
help Ron. You should stay as removed from this as you can. The window for you to do this
the way Hermione has requested is very narrow. There can’t be a single mistake.”
Draco sighed, but nodded. He felt… grateful?
It was a very odd feeling when it came to Potter, but he realized Granger was right. He could
help in ways that even his friends couldn’t because it would raise no serious suspicions that
Draco was going to intervene. Lucius would be watching Draco carefully, but he would be
off his guard with Potter’s assistance.
“So that’s it then,” said Draco.
Potter just snorted. “No, it’s just the start. I have a feeling that bringing you around the
Burrow is going to be even harder than getting you into Azkaban.”

20 November 2003
True to his word, Potter sent Draco twenty-four small vials of polyjuice, each good for one
hour, via the old house elf that same evening. Draco locked them in his dresser with a blood
ward for protection and then examined the galleon Potter had sent along too.
Hold the edge and focus on the message you want to send, it said.
He did as he was told and thought, Testing.
The letters rearranged themselves and then several minutes later his galleon heated up and a
new message appeared.
That worked. I will have a list of officiants soon.
Potter said nothing more, and Draco waited impatiently for several more days before
Kreacher returned again with a long list of individuals who were registered to perform
Ministry weddings. Even better, Potter had already been through it and circled the names of
people who were more loyal to him or Granger than to Weasley.
Try to pick one who doesn’t hate you if possible. I can vouch for you to any of them, and they
will trust me.
The number of people who both didn’t hate Draco and also trusted Potter was, unsurprisingly,
extremely small. However, it did narrow the list considerably, and there was one name that
jumped out at Draco.
Anthony Goldstein.
Draco raised his eyebrows at this. In the aftermath of the Matching Ceremony he had
completely forgotten to owl Goldstein. Draco couldn’t be sure of Goldstein’s feelings toward
him, but he certainly hadn’t been rude that day. He also recalled Granger’s attentiveness
when his name was called. It was clear they knew each other.
Draco debated the best way to go about this. Should he reach out to Goldstein or let Potter
do it? As much as he hated to lean on Potter for anything else, he knew Potter would need to
vouch for him. Given that he hadn’t reached out to Goldstein on his own, it would suspicious
for him to do it this close to the deadline in case Lucius found out.
Sighing a little, he picked up his galleon and sent a message to Potter.
Can you contact Anthony Goldstein and see if he will officiate? I haven’t met him recently,
but we sat next to each other at the Matching Ceremony. He was cordial.
Draco waited anxiously, and within a couple hours he had a response.
I’m getting drinks with Anthony tonight. I’ll ask him then.
Draco’s stomach was in knots as he paced his room that night. His galleon was clutched in
his hand, and he reviewed every other name on the list in case Goldstein wouldn’t agree to do
it. There were a couple others he suspected would be bribable, but he really hoped it
wouldn’t come to that. This was the last piece of the puzzle, and he needed it to fall into
place. They were running out of time.
It was late when Draco’s galleon finally burned.
Anthony is in. I told him the basic plan. He will floo to Nott’s house at 9 pm on 30
November.
Draco collapsed onto his bed with relief and held the galleon over his face as he sent a
message back.
Fantastic. Please convey my thanks. I’ll let Theo know.
He tossed the galleon aside and thought through their plan. It was not exactly foolproof.
There were any number of things that could go wrong. Lucius could notice the polyjuice.
Potter could change his mind and side with Weasley. Anthony could no-show. The guards
could be uncooperative once they arrived….
The guards.
Draco grimaced as he identified an obvious hole in their plan. What if Lucius got in front of
it and bribed Lawrence to tell the guards to deny Draco entry that day? That would make all
of their effort for naught.
Draco thought quickly and then pulled out a piece of parchment and a quill. It was a risk, but
one he would have to take.
Mr. Maywood,
Can I ask if the bet is still on? If so, what’s the pot?
Draco L. Malfoy
He sent it off into the night and started to pace again. He knew he needed to sleep, but he
also knew it was pointless to try when he was this worked up. He had to marry Granger. He
just had to. She seemed agreeable to his insistence on fidelity and meeting the bare
minimums of the MLPP so neither one of them would go back to Azkaban again. That meant
that in three months he’d be able to touch her and part her legs and finally…
He groaned as he thought about it.
Fuck.
Being this distracted by his fiancée was not helping. But their last encounter had ended with
a kiss and then a slap. Draco replayed it over and over in his mind as he imagined everything
he wished he could do to her.
Soon. Soon.
But he had to marry her first.
He paced for nearly an hour, as his mind oscillated between fear that Lucius would learn of
Draco’s plan and fantasies about Granger and her lips.
Draco turned to look out the window, and his eyes widened to find his owl heading back. He
nearly ripped the message off of his leg, which was short.
Lord Malfoy,
The pot is approaching 1,000 galleons. Do you have a suggestion for me?
B. Maywood
Draco chewed on his lip and he jotted off a quick response.
Mr. Maywood,
I have a few suggestions.
First, I suggest you ensure that you are the welcome guard on duty the night of 30 November,
specifically during the time from 10 p.m. until midnight. I suggest you follow the official
rules of your job during that time, including permitting authorized visitors. I suggest you
ignore any last-minute changes or orders that arbitrarily exclude specific visitors for certain
prisoners. Finally, I suggest you put down no wager and send me a multiplier of the pot that
you would find satisfactory to take these suggestions.
Draco L. Malfoy
Within an hour Draco had his response.
Lord Malfoy,
These are excellent suggestions. I think a 10x multiplier would make them worth following.
B. Maywood
A slow smile crossed Draco’s face as he read it. He jotted off one last response.
Mr. Maywood,
Let’s make it 20x and consider ourselves friends. Send me your account information by
return owl, and I’ll make sure you get it. I hope we can see each other soon.
Draco L. Malfoy
Draco sent it off into the night, feeling like he had finally covered all of his bases. Yes, it
required another bribe, but he hoped Granger would give him a pass for this one. He wasn’t
out to ruin anybody’s life with it, he was just making sure he and the others would be able to
get in. Lucius had always been the type to bribe those in positions of authority. But Draco’s
approach was different: he would bribe the one person who could actually deny him entry
when the time came.
It would be enough. It would have to be enough.
Ten more days.
Chapter 9: A Marriage of Inconvenience.
30 November 2003.
Much like Draco’s first wedding day three months earlier, the thirtieth of November dawned
bright and clear. The air was crisp and cold, but the sky was cloudless and promised nearperfect weather for the remainder of the day.
Draco and the others had a plan. It was a good plan. And it was a plan they had started to
execute a couple days earlier.
Just as Draco predicted, Lucius and Narcissa decided to host the Greengrasses for dinner that
evening, and Draco was informed it was to be a command performance.
“It would be inadvisable to have a feud with the Greengrasses Draco. We are going to host
them to make sure that they know the Malfoys and the Greengrasses will alway be allies,
despite your deplorable behavior toward Astoria.”
Lucius had made his position clear the week before, and Draco immediately communicated
this to Potter and the others. Draco agreed to attend the dinner of course, but asked if his
friends could attend as well.
“You know how close we are, father, and Astoria has been irritating me of late. If you want
me to behave myself around her it's best if they attend.”
It took Lucius a couple days to become convinced, but Narcissa was supportive of it.
“Draco wouldn’t dare be rude in front of them, Lucius.”
So Lucius agreed, and the plan was set into motion.
The thirtieth of November fell on a Sunday, which was an unusual day for the Wizengamot to
conduct its business. It played directly into Draco’s hand, however, because Shacklebolt was
forced to arrange security with the aurors in the week leading up to it. Potter messaged
Draco the moment he heard the news.
Kingsley is going to give them the required 24 hours’ notice for the closed session on
Saturday afternoon. It is scheduled from 4:30 to 10:30 Sunday evening.
That was precisely what Granger had expected. It would be just enough time for the
announcement of the amendment to be sent to The Daily Prophet to make the papers the next
morning. The wizarding world would find out about it after the three-month deadline
expired.
Ninety minutes.
Draco was only guaranteed ninety minutes to get to Azkaban and marry Granger before the
Ministry showed up with Weasley in tow. His stomach churned every time he thought about
it, but he was determined to give her this. He was sure she was marrying him against her
better judgment, and he wanted her to believe him when he said his wife came first. Besides,
exposing the amendment for what it was would undermine Shacklebolt and hopefully
Weasley as well.
Speaking of Weasley, he had made several visits to Granger while Draco was waiting for the
end of November to approach. She accepted his visits, which made Draco exceptionally
nervous. What if he had changed her mind? What if she was listening to him? Potter had
not visited her again since she sent him to Draco, so he had no way of being certain she
would still marry him. Draco had sent her a couple of letters that mirrored the ones he sent
when she was actually not speaking to him, but of course she hadn’t responded. And Draco
had only sent them to maintain the fiction and to make sure she knew he hadn’t forgotten
her. He wasn’t able to say the things he really wanted to say.
Draco was growing paranoid and couldn’t shake the fear that she might reject him at the last
moment. He had no idea how she felt about their kiss, and as the days rolled by Draco grew
less and less confident in her commitment to marry him as she promised.
But he had to try.
And that meant he had to make arrangements as though the wedding was going to occur,
including acquiring a pair of wedding bands.
Draco knew he wouldn’t risk going to their vaults for a piece like he had for Astoria.
Granger would have access to anything she might want if Draco actually managed to pull this
off, but he refused to go anywhere near Gringotts while he was waiting for his wedding day
to roll around. He was a relatively infrequent visitor and knew his father would sense
something was off the moment he walked through those golden doors.
So instead, on the Friday before he was due to get married he apparated to London after his
father left the Manor for Ministry business and checked into the Four Seasons again, this time
using a real reservation Potter had made for him earlier in the week. The room was a backup
plan in case something went very wrong and he needed to lie low either before or after the
wedding. He was tempted to try the Ritz this time, but Draco derived some comfort in the
familiar. He wasn’t even sure if the room would be used, and he had never told his parents
where he hid after jilting Astoria.
Besides, he really liked their room service.
He took a moment to drop off some clothes for both himself and Granger, which Potter had
smuggled to him via Kreacher. Then he conjured a camp bed for himself in case he and
Granger ended up here together. Finally, he placed a ‘do not disturb’ sign on the door at
Potter’s recommendation and then returned to the lobby and asked the concierge for
recommendations for nearby jewelry stores.
“What is your budget sir?”
“I have no budget.”
That was how Draco found himself staring down the offerings of several high-end muggle
jewelers. They were surprisingly nice, much better than he was expecting having heard his
whole life that goblins did it the best. He spent a couple hours going from store to store, but
it wasn’t until he entered a shop called Cartier that he found what he was looking for:
coordinating bands with similar designs to each other, though Granger’s would be dotted in
diamonds and his would be plain gold. They were part of the “Love Collection,” and while
Draco knew that love was overly optimistic for the situation they were in, he thought the
history of the design was fitting. The salesperson explained that the design had been around
for several decades and was meant to represent free love and fidelity to a chosen partner,
regardless of social expectations. The rings were modern and wildly different from most of
the heavy, traditional pieces that comprised the Malfoy and Black collections.
They were perfect, and Draco finally made use of a muggle plastic card Theo had insisted he
acquire years before so he could easily transact business in the muggle world, with Gringotts
making an exchange for galleons behind the scenes. It was surprisingly simple: one swipe,
and the rings were his. Draco wondered how on earth wizards hadn’t developed something
similar. Sacks of galleons were not convenient.
Purchases in hand, Draco made his way back to the Manor and placed them in the same
drawer as the polyjuice.
His last task – which was a mere diversion – was to send a request for a conjugal visit the
following Monday. It would be after the deadline, and Granger would be out of prison by
then one way or another, but he was sure Lucius would get a message about it. He only
hoped it was enough to convince Lucius that Draco was ignorant about what was going on.
On the wedding day itself, Draco was careful to make sure his parents saw plenty of him. He
was there for breakfast and spent the morning flying around their garden in the brisk air in a
futile attempt to calm his nerves. By the time lunch rolled around he was pink-cheeked and
windswept.
“Draco,” said his father cordially as he entered the dining room.
“Father,” greeted Draco, as he made his way to the sideboard. “I hope it’s good. I’m
starving.”
Lucius raised an eyebrow at that, but said nothing until Draco came to have a seat.
“What are your plans this afternoon then?” asked Lucius in a too-casual voice.
Draco shrugged. “Theo, Pansy, and Blaise are coming over after lunch so I imagine the
blokes will play billiards while Pansy complains about being pregnant.”
Lucius chuckled indulgently at this. He had always had a soft spot for Pansy in particular.
“And what are your plans for the upcoming week?”
Draco shrugged as he took a bite. “I’m going to make Granger see me tomorrow afternoon.
She’s ignored me for too long. Then I’m due for a fitting at my tailor on Wednesday. I’m
probably going to visit Granger again on Thursday before heading out for a long weekend at
Theo’s hunting lodge in the Highlands.”
Lucius’s eyebrows raised at this. “You’re still determined to win her over are you?”
Draco shrugged. “Not much else I can do, and she does intrigue me. She’s terribly stubborn
though.”
Lucius made a slightly impatient noise at this but said nothing more about it, and by the time
lunch was concluding Draco felt certain that Lucius was off the scent. Draco began to
occlude ever so slightly to keep his nerves at bay, and as his friends began to arrive through
the floo he ratcheted it up as much as he could stand while still being mentally present
enough to perform. The next step was critical.
“Pansy dear, how are you?” inquired Narcissa as Pansy and Theo stepped into the foyer.
Lucius was milling about nearby, speaking to one of the elves.
“Surviving,” she muttered. “Not that I’m getting much help with it,” she added, throwing
Theo a dirty look.
Theo rolled his eyes at this.
“Narcissa, could I trouble you for a chat? No offense to Draco, but I’m not in the mood for
wizards at the moment,” she sniffed.
“Of course dear,” said Narcissa, hurrying her along and casting a slightly disapproving look
at Theo as she and Pansy disappeared into a nearby parlor. Lucius raised a knowing eyebrow
as he watched Theo give another eye-roll at Pansy’s dramatics, before grabbing Draco by the
arm and heading toward the stairs.
“Come on,” he said loudly enough for Lucius to hear. “I need to sample your best bottle
before Blaise gets here for billiards. She’s driving me bloody mad.”
Draco chuckled at this as he dutifully followed Theo up the stairs. Together they made a
beeline for Draco’s room, and he locked it and silenced it the moment they entered.
“What did she do this time?” asked Draco, as he headed toward his dresser to retrieve the
vials of polyjuice. He pulled out twelve that already had his hair and carried them over to
Theo, who was pulling out a chunk of his own hair.
“Oh we’re not fighting,” said Theo, as he quickly unbuttoned his shirt and stripped it off.
“We just thought it would be easier for you to act annoyed with her than in love with her.
Besides, it should give you an excuse to leave at a reasonable time tonight. She will make
sure you aren’t good company, and once you two leave Blaise will be able to make his
excuses as well.”
“Brilliant,” muttered Draco as he also stripped down and threw his clothes toward Theo. He
dropped Theo’s hair into each of the remaining vials and watched as they bubbled and
frothed. They turned pale periwinkle blue.
“Huh,” said Theo in mild surprise. “Reminds me of Granger’s dress at the Yule Ball.”
Theo frowned at the color of his own polyjuice. Draco’s hair made it the precise color of
firewhiskey. Then he shrugged as he looked at Draco questioningly.
Draco gave a mirthless laugh. “Let’s just hope that’s a good sign,” he said as he tipped a vial
back and drank. Immediately he felt his features start to bubble and melt, and he watched as
Theo did the same thing. Within a few seconds he was staring back at himself, and Theo
began to dress quickly in Draco’s clothes, while Draco did the same in Theo’s.
“Well at least they should be easy to slip into a drink,” said Theo. “I know you favor
firewhiskey. I just have to make sure I don’t get pissed while I do it. Now then, time
check?”
Draco unstrapped his watch and passed it over to Theo, looking at the face as he did so.
“Precisely two o’clock,” muttered Draco. “Remember, you need a dose every hour on the
hour.”
“Got it,” said Theo as he shoved the extra vials into Draco’s coat pocket. “This will get me
past midnight, and at that point the game is up, right?”
“Right,” agreed Draco, "but don’t remind me, please.”
Theo snorted, and Draco thought it was a rather inelegant sound coming from him. “You’ll
be fine. I assume they’ll be seeing you after it’s done?”
Draco shrugged. “Possibly. Or possibly not. I have a room at a hotel booked through
tonight. I’m going to play it by ear after I see how she is. I suggest slipping out no later than
eleven if you can manage it. Earlier would be better though, in case everything runs ahead of
schedule.”
Theo nodded. “I took a leaf out of your book and brought a fever fudge with me. I’ll fall ill
soon after you lot leave, and then I’ll make my escape once the elves tuck me in bed. It’s
been years since I’ve climbed that tree outside your window, but if you don’t mind some
ripped trousers, I should be able to manage it. Once I’m on the grounds they’ll never find
me. I’ve brushed up on my disillusionment charms.”
Draco frowned in confusion. "Wouldn't a broom be easier?"
"Much easier, but much less fun," replied Theo. "I'll be fleeing on foot."
Draco chuckled a little and then reached out and clapped Theo on the shoulder.
“Don’t fret the trousers, then. And seriously, thank you for this.”
Theo brushed him off. “Of course, mate. This is the most exciting thing I’ve done since
impregnating Pans.”
“Merlin, spare me,” muttered Draco as he straightened up and handed Theo a small measure
of firewhiskey while picking up a small gin and tonic for himself. Now that they had
successfully transformed, Draco felt sure they could impersonate each other for as long as
required. They were practically brothers and knew everything about each other. Draco
would choke down some broccoli at dinner tonight since it was Theo’s favorite, and Theo
would have a second helping of roast chicken because Draco always did. They would play
their parts perfectly.
By the time they descended the stairs and made their way to the billiard room, Blaise had
already arrived. He took one look at them as they entered and raised an eyebrow, but said
nothing. Draco could tell he was wondering if they had already made the switch. Draco just
gave a slight nod, and Blaise exhaled but seemed to shake himself out of it. He would treat
them no differently than he usually would. Even though it was just the three of them, they
had already decided to stay in character as much as possible. They could be interrupted at
any time.
An hour into it Narcissa and Pansy arrived, and Pansy lowered herself onto a delicate sofa
while she glared at Draco.
“Oh excellent shot Draco,” she said to Theo.
Draco threw her an irritated look. “You could cheer for your husband you know.”
She put her nose in the air. “When my husband decides to be a supportive pregnancy partner
instead of a git, then I’ll consider it. Until then… brava Draco.”
Draco huffed in mock irritation as he watched his mother for her reaction out of the corner of
his eye. She glared at Draco, clearly taking Pansy’s side. She appeared unaware of the
switch, and Draco breathed a sigh of relief.
They played until the late afternoon, with Lucius dropping by a couple of times as well.
Billiards was an activity they did together often, and it was also something that didn’t
demand much conversation. That was ideal given their deception. The only thing they
hadn’t considered was how challenging it would be to play the game in somebody else’s
body. Theo was several inches shorter than Draco, and it caused both of them to play poorly.
Thankfully, Blaise seemed to realize this after winning his second game in a row, and Draco
was certain Blaise threw the games immediately after so the others could win instead. Lucius
and Narcissa were not paying close attention, but they knew that all three wizards were fairly
evenly matched.
During the course of the afternoon Draco and Theo managed to excuse themselves for
follow-up doses of polyjuice or else spike their own drinks with it, and Lucius seemed none
the wiser about what they were doing. By the time billiards was ending, Draco was feeling
more comfortable and was allowing his shields to lower. But then the Greengrasses arrived,
and Draco tensed again as he watched Theo’s face transform.
Theo in Draco’s body looked cold, disinterested, and standoffish as Astoria approached.
Bloody hell is that what I've always looked like?
He glanced at his parents and saw that his father appeared annoyed and his mother a bit
strained, but neither of them seemed at all suspicious by Theo’s acting. Draco was a bit taken
aback by just how angry he felt as he realized that his parents must have always known about
his deep dislike for Astoria. And yet, they pushed the match anyway all for the sake of blood
purity. Draco vented his feelings by snipping at Pansy who huffed and turned her back on
him. Only then did Draco tune in to listen.
“...luck with your next match,” said Theo in a detached voice.
“Yes, I have every hope something will materialize soon,” said Astoria, as her parents looked
on.
“And Daphne? Where is she tonight?” asked Theo in a slightly brighter voice.
Astoria scowled. “She’s feeling unwell. She will try to join us later.”
“Oh she shouldn’t bother,” chimed in Pansy. “Merlin knows I won’t be staying late. Theo
promised me a foot massage earlier, and then he reneged. I fully intend to make him go twice
as long tonight to make up for it.”
Draco made a show of rolling his eyes as Astoria looked faintly uncomfortable with this
personal anecdote. She gave a tight smile and then abruptly shifted the conversation to small
talk, as Lucius bid the group farewell.
“I’m afraid I have urgent business tonight,” he said blithely. “It's very last minute, and I do
apologize. But I hope you all will stay the night, and we can have a proper visit in the
morning.”
The Greengrasses gave him gracious smiles, and Draco and the others tried to look confused
about Lucius’s sudden need to leave the Manor. Draco couldn't decide if he was relieved or
more nervous by this turn of events. He hadn’t been certain if his father would go to the
Ministry and be part of tonight’s vote, but evidently he felt he was needed. On the one hand,
that should make Draco’s escape – not to mention Theo’s – easier. On the other, he was sure
to hear about Draco's deception as soon as possible. There would be no putting it off.
They chatted for another hour or so until something in Draco’s pocket burned. He forced
himself to wait until the group began to head into the dining room for dinner, and then he
slowed to fall back.
“Loo,” he muttered as he waved Pansy on in. She looked at him curiously but said nothing as
Draco stepped away and then pulled the galleon out of his pocket.
Amendment is being read. No major surprises. It gives them 24 hours to rematch and marry
you, not that they will need it.
Draco breathed a sigh of relief that there were no major complications. He loitered for
another five minutes to dose up on his polyjuice. As he approached the dining room, he saw
Theo exiting to do the same thing.
“News?” whispered Theo.
“So far so good,” replied Draco, as he headed to the dining room.
He seated himself next to Pansy and assumed an irritated expression, which was not difficult
to fake. He was eager to get out of here and back into his own body. Now that Potter had
sent him an update, he was sure more would be coming throughout the evening, and it would
drive him mad if he couldn’t read them in real time.
Still, he had no choice except to sit through course after tortuous course. Narcissa had pulled
out all the stops this evening, and it was approaching nine by the time they all rose for after
dinner drinks in one of the parlors.
“Narcissa, I must beg off,” said Pansy promptly. “I’m afraid it’s growing rather late, and
Theo does owe me.”
Narcissa gave her a knowing look. “Of course dear, think nothing of it. I’m pleased you
were able to join us.”
Draco exchanged a look with Theo who gave him an imperceptible nod, and then to Draco’s
great relief he was approaching the floo and… he was gone.
He stepped out onto the threshold at Nott Manor and collapsed on the nearest sofa with a
groan.
“Merlin that took forever.”
“Any news?” asked Pansy eagerly.
Draco’s galleon had burned several minutes earlier, and he pulled it out of his pocket and
read it.
Still in a Q&A, but should wrap up soon. They have the list of recorded marriages and the
list of the unconsummated marriages in the chambers. Lists are magical and are being
updated in real time.
“Ugh,” said Pansy. “They’ll know as soon as it’s done then.”
Draco swallowed with nerves. That meant his father would learn about it the minute it
happened. There wasn’t anything they could do about it, but Draco had been hoping for a
little time to relish the experience of being married before the Ministry was after them to
demand explanations.
He sighed.
“We’ll make it work,” said Draco, trying to sound more confident than he was feeling.
Draco felt another burn, and he glanced down.
Anthony just consummated his marriage. Lucky bastard.
Draco chuckled in amusement and read it out loud to Pansy who had an unholy glint in her
eye. “Well that should break the ice when he arrives, shouldn’t it?”
A moment later the floo turned green, and Blaise was stepping through.
“Theo was looking peaky when I left,” he said without further preamble.
“Fever fudge,” supplied Draco.
“Ah, that’ll do it,” agreed Blaise.
Just then Draco felt the polyjuice begin to wear off.
“Pans, where –”
“The yellow guest bedroom. Your clothes are on the bed,” she said.
Draco nodded his thanks and hurried off. Theo’s frame was smaller than Draco’s, and he
could feel the stitching straining as he grew.
He hastened into the bright bedroom and quickly changed, relieved to be back in his own
body and with his wand. It was the one thing he and Theo had not switched, and they had
managed to make it through the entire evening without having to reveal that they were each
carrying the wrong wand.
By the time he rejoined Pansy and Blaise, Anthony Goldstein was just arriving, and Pansy
was closing the floo behind him to cut off any other visitors.
“Goldstein,” said Draco, striding forward to shake his hand. “I can’t thank you enough for
this.”
Goldstein just gave him a bemused smile.
“Anything for Harry and Hermione of course. We were in the D.A. together, and they’ve
helped me out a time or two professionally. Harry explained everything, and it’s utter bullshit
what they’re trying to do to both of you. Then Harry told me you actually proposed, and she
accepted. I’ll admit it surprised me at first, but after thinking about it a little I realized it
made sense.”
Draco raised his eyebrow in question.
Goldstein shrugged. “Oh just that you tormented her in the same way I tormented Leanne.
Teenage wizards never know what the fuck they’re doing with witches do they?”
“I –” said Draco, before he cut himself off, now considering this angle.
Pansy and Blaise both laughed at his expression as Pansy strode forward to shake Goldstein’s
hand too. “We never spoke much at Hogwarts of course, but I must say I agree with your
point about teenage wizards. Bloody imbeciles, the lot of them.”
“Hey!” said Draco and Blaise in unison. She just smirked at them.
“Also,” she added, “I hear congratulations are in order. Your name was just removed from
the list of unconsummated marriages.”
“Merlin,” muttered Goldstein as he turned bright red. “How did you know?”
“According to Potter, they have the list in the chambers. I assume they’re making sure
Weasley stays on it.”
Goldstein snorted. “I ran into Ron on Friday. He mentioned he was taking the weekend
away. More like hiding somewhere until midnight so his wife doesn’t climb him herself.
Then again, Leanne was prepared to pull a Hermione and go to Azkaban instead of shagging
me so maybe Ron’s wife is complicit in this mess.”
“What changed her mind?” asked Draco curiously.
Goldstein gave a small smile. “I told her about the amendment and what I was doing to help
you tonight. It finally won her over. I was going to say that you owe me for this, but seeing
as how you got my wife to proposition me I’m fairly sure I now owe you.”
They all chuckled at this, but then the galleon burned again.
The voting is starting. Every damn member has to cast a vote live. Should be over within the
hour. The press has just been admitted and given a copy of the amendment.
Draco read this out loud to the group, feeling a bit more upbeat. They were slightly ahead of
schedule.
Pansy made small talk, which Draco mostly tuned out until she asked, “So why did you get
registered to perform weddings?”
Goldstein shrugged. “A favor for Michael Corner. He got married the last Saturday before
the Matching Ceremony, and there were so many weddings scheduled that day he couldn’t
find an officiant he liked. I got certified and served as both best man and officiant. This will
be the second wedding I’ve officiated.”
Draco grinned. “It’s going to be a bit unusual.”
“No doubt,” said Goldstein. “And once it’s done we shouldn’t linger.”
Draco nodded in agreement, his stomach starting to churn for the next step. Would it pass?
Would they be able to get through the doors at Azkaban? What would Granger look like after
more than three weeks apart?
Finally, at long last, the galleon burned.
Amendment passed. The press is questioning Shacklebolt now.
Draco sent his first message back to Potter all night.
On it. We are assembled and ready to leave.
Draco checked his watch. It was nearly ten.
“Let’s do it then,” he said. “The journey isn’t that far, but between the antiapparition wards
at Nott Manor and the damn rowboat we have to take to get to the prison it’s going to be at
least half an hour before we are there.”
The other three nodded, all looking a little pale. Draco confirmed he had the rings, the
galleon, and his wand, and Pansy led them toward the front door.
“Theo tightened the wards a lot in preparation for this,” she said simply. “You’ll all have to
touch me when we get to the perimeter to pass through them.”
Draco was relieved to hear it. He was certain his parents would try to check Nott Manor as
soon as they discovered Draco’s marriage or Theo’s use of polyjuice. They wouldn’t be able
to get in unless Theo or Pansy let them in.
They walked for nearly fifteen minutes through the large house and to the outer boundaries of
the property.
“Let’s cross here,” said Pansy simply. “It’s more remote than the front gate.”
She held out both arms and all three wizards gripped her as she led them through. Draco felt
the wards shudder a bit as they passed.
“Alright,” said Draco. “It’s probably best for me to side-along you all to Azkaban. There’s a
place that’s fairly discrete nearby. We should be able to see if anybody is waiting for us.”
They all nodded and now Draco held out his arms and felt all three of them grab him. He
concentrated with all his might and turned into the darkness to arrive a moment later behind a
small maintenance hut set apart from the dock where the boats were kept.
He cautiously peered around the edge of the hut and saw nobody on the docks.
“The boats are magical,” he whispered. “They’re captainless. We’ll probably need two.”
The others said nothing, but stuck close to Draco as they approached, the rickety boats
illuminated by a single dim lamp on the dock. Blaise and Pansy got into one boat while
Goldstein and Draco got into another, and then they were off, heading toward the island that
Draco knew was about twenty minutes away.
It was different at night. It was so dark on the water that Draco could see nothing without his
wand, which he immediately lit. Behind him Goldstein did the same thing, and he could see
two other pinpricks of light from Pansy and Blaise nearby. Even the stars were dull here,
shrouded in the persistent fog and gloominess that perpetually surrounded the island.
The twenty minute journey seemed to crawl, and as their boat bumped the dock on the other
side Draco felt his galleon burn. He pulled it out and aimed his wandlight at it.
Most of the press has left the building to make the morning paper. Rita Skeeter is hanging
back until midnight to see what comes next. Tell Hermione I wish I could be there.
Draco sent a message back.
Will do. We just arrived at Azkaban. Wish us luck with the guards.
Draco shoved the galleon back in his pocket.
“It’s time,” he said. “The press will be printing an article about the amendment tomorrow.”
“Then let’s get you married,” said Pansy with a false cheerfulness. Draco could hear the
slight fear in her voice, and he couldn’t blame her. Azkaban at night felt positively
dangerous.
“Let’s just hope my friendly guard is here tonight as promised,” muttered Draco as he lifted
the old knocker and rapped on the front door three times.
A small window at the top opened a moment later.
“State your name and business,” said the familiar voice of Maywood.
Draco felt nearly faint with relief.
“Draco Malfoy, Pansy Nott, Blaise Zabini, and Anthony Goldstein are here to visit Hermione
Granger.”
The window slid closed and then the door opened. All four of them walked inside, shivering
a little.
“It’s rather creepy,” muttered Blaise under his breath.
Draco knew it was creepy. But he also remembered it with the dementors in residence, which
was infinitely worse than this. He forced his occlumency walls down as much as he dared.
Maywood led them over to the waiting area, which was lit with a couple of torches.
“You don’t have a conjugal visit on the books tonight,” said Maywood conversationally.
“No, Sir,” said Draco. “I am requesting a spontaneous visit. All four of us at the same time.”
Maywood eyed them. “The visitor policy…” he started.
“Allows up to five visitors at once,” said Draco. “At any time of the day. It was part of the
Azkaban Reform Act of 2001.”
A ghost of a smile crossed Maywood’s face. “Right you are. So silly of me. I’ll go see if
Miss Granger is willing to see you.”
Draco nodded and started to pace as he waited for Maywood to return.
“Merlin, Draco, sit down,” said Pansy.
“Can’t,” he muttered. “What if she says no? What if she declines? What if –”
“She won’t,” insisted Pansy. “Just breathe.”
“Unless you need to do another runner?” asked Blaise.
“Don’t even suggest that,” snapped Draco.
Blaise held up his hands in mock surrender. “Just checking mate.”
Draco threw him a glare. He was so worried that she had changed her mind, and his stomach
was churning. His head shot up when he heard footsteps and realized Maywood was
returning.
“She’ll see you all,” he said. “She’s already in the visitor room. Please leave your wands
here.”
“Sir,” chimed in Goldstein, “I’m officiating their marriage. I will need my wand to perform
the binding.”
Maywood considered this, and then nodded slowly. “Very well. Please give your wand to
me, and I will hand it to you for the binding if this is indeed a wedding.”
Goldstein handed Maywood his wand, while the others placed theirs on the counter at the
guard’s station.
“Mr. Maywood,” said Draco as he led them through the corridors to a visitation room Draco
had never seen before.
“Yes?”
“When Granger is married, her sentence will be complete.”
“That’s correct,” said Maywood blithely. “We will no longer have any authority to hold her.”
“Excellent,” said Draco. “I was wondering… her clothes and wand from when she
entered…?”
“Ah, I think you’ll find that they are behind the desk at the guard’s station. As is the
paperwork processing her release. They should take only a moment.”
“Brilliant,” said Draco.
Maywood smiled a little. "We'd best hurry. I'm only on duty until eleven. Lawrence gave
himself the shift that starts at that time. There wasn't anything I could do about it."
Draco's stomach plummeted, but he nodded and increased the pace. The moment they were
married it wouldn't matter who was on duty.
They said nothing more to each other as Maywood opened the door to the visitation room and
led the group inside. Draco’s heart was beating out of his chest as he saw Hermione sitting
behind a table, still shackled. She was thinner than ever, with dark circles under her eyes.
Her hair was unwashed and lank, though Draco noted she was wearing undergarments this
time. Pansy actually gasped when she saw her.
“Merlin Granger, what happened to you?”
Granger arched one eyebrow. “Azkaban,” she said as Maywood stepped forward to release
her bindings. She was rubbing her wrists again, which looked raw. Draco’s winced a little.
“Erm, right,” muttered Pansy. She looked uncharacteristically ashamed of herself.
“Granger,” said Draco. “Will you still marry me tonight? The amendment we discussed has
passed, and most of the press has left the premises to make the morning paper. I have to
warn you that once it’s done we shouldn’t linger. The magical record of marriages is in the
chambers with the Wizengamot, so they will know the moment it happens.”
A broad smile lit her face, and it transformed her.
“In that case, perhaps our unbreakable vow first?”
Draco faltered for a moment. In light of all the preparations he made he had completely
forgotten about the vow. But then he shook himself out of it and looked at the guard.
“Sir, I did promise her an unbreakable vow as part of this. Could either you or Goldstein
serve as our binder?”
Maywood looked surprised by this, but he nodded slowly. “Mr. Goldstein may do it. I will
need to keep my wand on you all while magic is being performed.”
“Of course,” said Goldstein cordially as he took his wand from Maywood. In return,
Maywood trained his wand on Goldstein as Draco reached out to clasp Granger’s thin hand in
his.
What am I about to promise?
“Ready?” asked Goldstein.
“Ready,” said Granger. “Do you, Draco Malfoy, promise to remain faithful to me for the
duration of our marriage?”
“I do,” said Draco firmly. That was an easy promise to make. He would always be faithful
to his wife. A small band of gold wrapped their hands.
“Good. Then I, Hermione Granger, do promise to remain faithful to you for the duration of
our marriage as well.” A second gold thread emerged.
Draco blinked in surprise. What was this? He wasn’t expecting her to promise anything in
exchange. He knew the Malfoy magic would keep her faithful until they had a child together,
but she was promising to extend it until their marriage dissolved.
Then she continued to speak.
“And I, Hermione Granger, do promise to meet the minimum consummation and coupling
requirements that have been set by the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan, until such time as
the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan has been repealed in full.”
Draco could feel himself gaping as yet another gold thread wrapped their hands.
“So may it be,” she finished, and the threads seemed to dissolve into their skin.
“Now then, shall we get married?” she asked brightly.
Draco was struggling to find words.
“Why?” he finally asked.
“Why what?” she responded.
“Why make a vow about… that?”
She rolled her eyes. “Because the Malfoy magic is sexist. I have to be faithful for some
period of time to ensure the paternity of the heir, but it’s not permanent. And you don’t have
to be faithful at all. I’m just evening the score.”
Draco felt his mouth twitch, and he looked around to find his two friends staring at Granger
as though they had never seen her properly before.
“Well then,” interjected Goldstein, "are you ready to be wed?”
Granger turned a little pink, but nodded, and Draco reached up to grasp her other hand in his.
“We’re doing a very short version in the interest of time,” said Goldstein.
They both nodded.
“Draco Malfoy,” continued Goldstein, as he looked at Draco. “Do you consent to this
marriage?”
“I do,” said Draco firmly.
“And Hermione Granger, do you consent to this marriage?” asked Goldstein.
Involuntarily Draco’s stomach clenched. This was where it had all gone wrong three months
ago.
“I do,” she said, with a small smile on her face.
Draco couldn’t help but smile broadly at that. Goldstein placed his wand on their joined
hands.
“Let it be known that this marriage is witnessed by Mr. Blaise Zabini and Mrs. Pansy Nott.
The bride and groom have consented. Therefore, I hereby bind you, in matrimony and
magic, on this, the thirtieth day of November, 2003. Take each other in honesty and integrity
to grow your lives together from this day forward.”
They were nearly the same words spoken at the Matching Ceremony, and Draco knew in an
instant it had worked. There was a small flash of light, and he was immediately flooded by
warmth and…
Fuck.
If Draco hadn’t already had his eyes on Granger, the Malfoy magic would have ensured it.
As it was, it gave him a nudge to slowly look her up and down. Objectively, he knew she
looked terrible like this. But something about her was still the most compelling thing Draco
had ever seen.
Draco shuddered and forced the feeling aside. There was no time for it.
Instead, he slipped a hand into his pocket and pulled out the rings. She gasped in surprise as
he slid hers onto her finger, and then he allowed her to slide his on as well.
“My wife,” he said, tugging her to her feet. His magic gloried in that word. “Shall we?”
He crooked an elbow toward her, and she let out a light laugh as she took his arm, and he
escorted her out of the waiting room, led by Maywood, with his friends and Goldstein
following behind.
Just then Draco’s galleon burned, and he pulled it out to read.
Congratulations. The marriage records were just updated. They’re all shitting themselves.
Draco laughed as he handed the galleon to Granger to read. She looked positively gleeful as
she winked and clutched it in her hand. Draco didn’t ask for it back. It had served its
purpose.
It took no time at all to make their way back to the security desk, where Maywood started
handing back wands before pulling out a large bag.
“As you know, I took the liberty of cleaning out your cell when my shift started,” he said to
Granger. “Everything is shrunk down and in the bag already. You can take the time to
change into your old clothes, or you can wear your prison-issued clothing home, and we will
bill you.”
“Bill me,” said Draco quickly. “We shouldn’t linger.”
“Very well,” said Maywood. “Then here you go. Congratulations on your marriage.”
Granger smiled gratefully as she took her bag, and Draco made a mental note to send
Maywood a bonus. He had truly made this as seamless as possible. Finally, Maywood
handed her discharge papers that were marked ‘complete,’ magically time-stamped for what
must have been the moment they were bound together.
10:52 PM. A perfect time if I do say so myself.
And then she was free, walking out of Azkaban. The door was closing behind them just as
Draco heard a voice that sounded much like Lawrence Boles say, "Maywood? What's going
on?"
Draco gripped Granger's arm and led her deeper into the dreary night that now felt much
brighter because she was in it. Their two boats were still moored at the small dock.
“Goldstein and I took one together,” he said in her ear. “You’re tiny. Come squeeze in with
me.”
She dipped her head so Draco couldn’t gauge her expression, but she didn’t object. She
handed her bag of personal items to Pansy and Blaise to take, but kept her wand with her as
she gingerly stepped into the boat. Draco could see was shivering in the thin cotton prisoner
garb, and he tucked her into his chest both to keep her warm and to make room for Goldstein
behind them. He wrapped his cloak around them both as they sat down. She shuddered a
little, but she sank into his chest and warmth, and Draco’s magic hummed to have her there.
“You’ll want to light your wand for the boat ride,” he whispered in her ear.
The tip of her wand emerged from Draco’s cloak. “Lumos!” she said quietly before gasping.
“What is it?” he asked curiously.
“Magic,” she said simply. “I haven’t done any since I arrived.”
Draco gave her a little squeeze before lighting his own wand. He remembered that sensation
all too well when he had emerged from Azkaban after the war.
The moment Goldstein was settled in behind them, the boat was off, and Granger’s hair was
whipping him in the face as the salty water misted them and the boat bounced across the
waves. Granger seemed to shrink away from it, and Draco instinctively held her tighter than
ever as the small point of light that was the dock on the other side started to grow larger and
larger.
When the boat finally bumped against the dock, Draco reluctantly released Granger to help
her out, before gathering her bag from Pansy and Blaise who had just arrived as well.
“Thank you all,” he said to his friends and Goldstein.
“Yes, thank you,” agreed Granger.
“Of course,” said Pansy.
“Always,” said Blaise.
“That was the most interesting wedding I’ll ever officiate,” said Goldstein.
They were all chuckling at this and just turning to apparate, when a series of CRACKS! broke
through the night air.
Draco’s heart sank a little as he stared at the wizards in front of him.
The Ministry of Magic had arrived.
Chapter 10: Beauty and the Beast.
One second later.
FLASH!
It was pure instinct as Draco raised his wand and tried to shove Granger behind him. He was
foiled, of course, by her attempt to do the same thing to him.
One breathless second later another FLASH! clued Draco into what was going on.
The press was here. And Rita fucking Skeeter was having her photographer take pictures of
his wife while she was still in her prison clothes.
Draco grabbed Granger and made her move behind him the moment he realized it.
Protect her from this.
His magic thrummed happily at the brief moment of contact as he hauled her behind him.
“What is the meaning of this?” he demanded in his best Malfoyesque voice.
“Hermione!” came a shout from the back, and a tall wizard emerged from the small crowd.
Fucking Weasley.
Draco’s face split into a snarl. “Stay the fuck back Weasley.”
“Mr. Malfoy,” came Shacklebolt’s voice now, as he moved forward. He, at least, appeared to
be wary of Draco and his temper. Out of the corner of his eye he saw Pansy and Blaise
slowly drawing their wands. He shook his head ever so slightly to tell them to stand down,
but he wasn’t sure if they got the message. His focus was on Shacklebolt and Weasley before
him.
FLASH!
“Rita, would you mind?” asked Shacklebolt. “I told you the press is not invited for –”
“But this is news Minister!” came her sickly sweet voice. “The Golden Girl and the Death
Eater? My my, what will the public think about that?”
“She didn’t marry him, it’s just some mistake,” said Weasley in an irritated voice.
Draco felt a form dart around him, and he internally groaned. Great. Just great. He was
certain Weasley had just triggered Granger’s compulsive need for Grangering in situations
like this.
“It’s no mistake, Ronald Weasley!” she said shrilly. “The Ministry of Magic passed a lastminute amendment to force me to marry you! I know you’ve been working with them on it,
don’t deny it! You were going to be the last unconsummated marriage of the lot weren’t
you? It was all designed to manipulate me! You absolute git!”
She pointed her wand directly at him, and he gulped and backed away. Draco snorted. He
glanced at Skeeter, who was watching the fight with wide eyes, and even in the darkness
Draco could see her quill writing on some parchment in the air at warp speed.
“Hermione,” said Kingsley, as though talking to a cornered animal. “We were just –”
“Manipulating me!” she seethed. “This was all some elaborate ploy to make me and Malfoy
fall in line and improve the public’s perception of the MLPP! You never wanted me to find
out about it until the deadline had already expired, and that’s why you passed that amendment
in a closed session! But I did find out, and that left me with two options: choose to marry an
ex-Death Eater or my ex-Best Friend who worked with you behind my back! Well
congratulations Kingsley, I’ve made my choice. Death Eater it is!”
Draco’s jaw clenched at the reminder of his past transgressions, but he didn’t stop her
ranting. Kingsley’s reputation would surely be in shreds by the next day, as the photographer
turned to him.
FLASH!
“Hermione we can fix this,” he said a bit desperately. “I’m sure we can –”
“It’s done,” she snarled. “It’s all fucking done because of you. If you want to fix it, then you
know what you need to do: repeal this ridiculous law and let people choose when they want
to marry and reproduce!”
“We can do that Hermione,” said Weasley quickly. “We can get you away from –”
“Do not dare speak to me!” she cried. “I’ll admit I was holding on to some hope that Draco
was lying when he told me you were working with them. But he was right. Here you are,
betraying over a decade of friendship with me for what? A guaranteed shag? I’ve never slept
with you Ronald, and after years of turning you down whenever you tried I thought you
would take a bloody hint!”
FLASH!
This time the cameraman was aiming at Weasley’s face. He was gaping at Granger.
“Ms. Skeeter!” cried Shacklebolt.
“Ah ah ah Minister,” she tutted. “No closed sessions here. This is public property and very
newsworthy.”
Shacklebolt looked around a bit desperately. There were a couple of aurors behind him,
along with the small wizard Draco recognized from the Matching Ceremony. The aurors
were watching warily, and for a moment Draco thought they might converge on Granger. But
they didn’t: they appeared to be stunned by the exchange taking place on the small dock like
everyone else.
“Hermione,” he said urgently. “Surely this can be undone. You don’t have to be bound to
Draco Malfoy. You can just –”
“At least he was honest!” she screeched, and Draco winced a bit at the pitch of her voice.
“An honest Death Eater! How fucking rich is that? And do you know what? He was the
only one who told me the truth about what was going on out there! He was the only one who
visited me without any false pretenses! He told me on his very first visit that he wanted to
marry me, and he’s been coming back for months to persuade me! I’m not saying this is
ideal, and I would never be in this position if it weren’t for you, but at least I’m married to
somebody who isn’t going to stab me in the back! At least he would have the balls to look
me in the eye while sliding the knife between my ribs, unlike you,” she spat. “I can’t say
much else about him, but I can say that.”
She finally lowered her wand and then turned her nose up at them both.
“Hermione, I have to see your discharge paperwork,” said Kingsley, now grasping at straws.
“You can’t leave here until we confirm that –”
“Oh for heaven’s sake!” she snarled as she pulled the paper out and shoved it under
Shacklebolt’s nose. “There! Proof that we’re married! Not that you need it, because you had
the Ministry’s official marriage record in the closed session with you, and that’s why you’re
all here! It’s valid, and I’m released.”
Shacklebolt stared down at it, and swallowed hard, before nodding once.
“Very well, but we can still –”
“Save it,” she snarled. “Unless you’re planning a complete repeal of the MLPP, I don’t want
to hear it. What you’ve done tonight is corrupt Minister. You and I both know it. The public
will know it too. I have chosen to marry Malfoy for the simple reason that he didn’t lie to me
like you and Ronald both did. If you had gotten your way, I would have been forced into a
marriage with a man who has been lying to me for months at the stroke of midnight!”
Shacklebolt’s face fell, and then he turned to Draco. “Mr. Malfoy, you should know –”
But Draco interrupted him.
“The next time you plot with my father, you should do it someplace the Dark Lord did not
use as his headquarters. Weasley would do well to remember that too. There are eyes and
ears all over Malfoy Manor. Not all of them are loyal to Lucius.”
Even in the torchlight Draco could see Shacklebolt turn pale, and Skeeter’s eyes bugged.
FLASH!
Draco smirked as he felt Granger’s hand slip into his. His magic hummed happily at the
touch.
“Malfoy, I’m sure we have other places to be,” she said imperiously.
Draco raised an eyebrow at this, but nodded as he squeezed her hand. Her ring glittered in
the torchlight.
“Lady Malfoy, may I ask about your ring before you go?” called Skeeter.
“I am Lady Malfoy now it is true, but my surname name will remain Granger,” she said
curtly. “And the ring is muggle. It’s a rather famous design from a prominent muggle
jeweler called Cartier.”
Draco’s eyebrows flew up at this, but he supposed he shouldn’t be surprised she recognized
it. He looked around to find his friends and even Weasley gaping at him.
“Come along my darling,” he said. “We do have places to be.”
“Hermione, no!” cried Weasley as he rushed forward and tried to grab her arm. The moment
he made contact, there was a CRACK and Weasley was thrown back several feet. He groaned
as he tried to sit up, and Draco’s magic trilled.
Protect her. Make sure her children are yours. Claim her.
The aurors drew their wands as one, but Draco held up a hand to stop them.
“It’s just the Malfoy magic,” he said calmly. “She is my wife, and she can’t be touched.”
Then he looked down at Weasley. “The next time you lay a hand on another wizard’s wife,
you’d do well to remember that not all family magic functions like yours. She has made it
very clear that she doesn’t want you touching her, and thanks to you I’m now the only man
who gets that exquisite privilege. Stay the fuck away from her if you know what’s good for
you.”
He turned to look at Granger, and she had an odd expression on her face. But then she
looked down at Weasley and turned her nose up once again.
“Shall we?” she asked.
Draco turned to look at Pansy, Blaise, and Goldstein, all of whom had been silent through this
entire exchange. He nodded to them slightly, and they all turned and apparated on the spot.
Then he squeezed Granger’s hand again.
“Allow me,” he said, as he turned and apparated them directly into the hotel room Draco had
reserved for them.
“Here?” she asked, looking around. He saw her eyes sweeping over the small bag Potter had
put together for her and the camp bed on one side of the room, as far away from the real bed
as Draco could position it.
Draco shrugged. “I reserved it. Not for… you know. We still have three months to
consummate. It's just to rest. I figure after all that we deserve a short break before facing
anybody else.”
“You mean your parents,” she said, nodding knowingly as Draco released her hand. His
magic protested the loss of contact.
“Sure,” he said, in a casual voice.
She bit her lip, and Draco nearly groaned.
“Well I’ll admit a night here would be welcome. I know it’s late, but can we order something
to eat while I get cleaned up? I would happily commit murder in the first degree for a steak.”
Draco felt himself relax into a grin at this. “Absolutely,” he said as he moved to the bed and
picked up her bag and handed it to her. “Potter’s elf gave this to me. He said it had
everything you needed. Take your time getting cleaned up, and I’ll call in an order right
now.”
She smiled gratefully and moved to the large loo. The door behind her clicked shut, and a
moment later Draco heard the water start.
Go to her. Take her.
Draco’s family magic was taunting him, drawing his attention to the fact that his wife was
naked just on the other side of that door.
Fuck off, he told himself. She’s just been released from months in prison you horny bastard.
It was odd, this family magic of his. He discovered with some relief that he could distinguish
it from his real feelings about her. He wasn’t being compelled to be in love with her or even
infatuated with her. But it seemed to reward him whenever he touched her – it made him feel
effervescent like crisp bubbles from the finest champagne. And when he wasn’t touching her,
it seemed to take note of it and point out that she was just right there.
He could control it though. He could clearly delineate his own thoughts and feelings from
the magic that kept dangling her in front of him like a ripe piece of fruit waiting to be
plucked. He wondered how this would have manifested itself if it had been Astoria who was
the object of his magic’s attraction. He supposed he would have leaned on the urges to get
through their consummation, but it would not have built a true fondness for her because he
still knew his own mind. That was consistent with what the journals had written about it, of
course: it simply eased the duty.
His father had been lying or simply incorrect when he implied that the family magic could
build feelings for Astoria. It would take a love potion for something like that, and even then
the feelings wouldn’t be real.
Draco sighed and put it aside as he called room service for some dinner. He had eaten hours
ago but had been so nervous that he barely choked his food down, and now he was famished
too. He ordered two of everything, along with some wine, tea, fruit, and soup. Despite
Granger’s insistence upon steak Draco was concerned it would be too rich for her after
months of practically starving herself.
As he waited he settled a bit awkwardly on the camp bed and tried not to listen to the
splashes from the other side of the door.
She’s in there naked. She’s ready for you. Take her.
Draco groaned and in a fit of desperation grabbed the black stick and pointed it to the TV,
pushing the same buttons Granger had taught him. He flipped through various channels, until
he landed on something he couldn’t help but watch.
Beauty and the Beast.
He selected it and watched in slight disbelief as a French brunette named Belle began to sing
a song about wanting to escape her boring life. Evidently the villagers considered her odd
because she liked to read. And before long, a tall, dark and strapping man was trying to
garner her attention.
He’s supposed to represent Weasley? Ha!
Not only was the hair color entirely wrong, but this Gaston fellow seemed far more confident
than Weasley had ever been. Draco scowled as he tried to woo Belle, who – much to Draco’s
chagrin – was rather like Granger, except less angry and with fewer curls.
He was utterly captivated and barely even noticed as the door to the adjoining loo opened and
Granger herself stepped out. It was only when she said, “Really?” in an amused voice that
Draco looked up.
He immediately wished he hadn’t.
Her hair was washed and damp, her cheeks pink from the heat, and though she was far too
thin she was wearing a loose shirt and muggle athletic shorts as she made her way toward
him. His eyes roved over her on their own accord.
“Beauty and the Beast?” she prompted.
Draco shrugged uncomfortably. “Potter might have mentioned it. I don’t see the parallels to
Weasley though, and surely I’m not that bad,” he said as he pointed to the Beast on the screen
who was having an absolute tantrum.
Granger laughed lightly. “See where it goes and then tell me what you think.”
Just then there was a knock on the door, and Granger moved toward it and opened it to find
an entire cart of food. Her eyes widened as a staff member rolled it in, arranged a couple of
things, and then gave a small bow before backing out and shutting the door.
“Merlin,” she breathed as she stared at it.
“Help yourself,” said Draco in amusement.
Granger pulled out her wand and conjured a couple of chairs for them, and she and Draco
settled around the cart to eat, while continuing to watch the movie. A magical candlestick
and clock were just beginning to sing a truly baffling song about French food as Granger took
her first bite.
The sound she made as the food hit her lips drew every ounce of Draco’s attention to her.
“What?” she asked when she realized he was staring.
He cast around desperately for something to say, so he just gestured at the TV.
“Muggles are mad. Dancing forks?”
“Did we or did we not make egg cups do cartwheels for our Charms O.W.L.?” she countered.
“True,” said Draco. “But they didn’t sing.”
She rolled her eyes, but said nothing more to that as she ate another bite. Draco watched out
of the corner of his eye.
“You’ll want to slow down,” he cautioned her.
“Can’t,” she said. “I’m so hungry. I’m…”
But then she trailed off as the food seemed to hit her all at once.
“Oh God,” she muttered, and then she was up and sprinting to the toilet. A moment later
Draco heard sounds of retching.
He sighed as the toilet flushed, some water ran, and then she emerged again, shaking just a
little.
“It was delicious but –”
“Too rich,” he finished for her. “I thought it might be. Try the soup and bread instead. And
for Merlin’s sake, take smaller bites, Granger. You need to work back up to heavy things.”
She gave him a disappointed look, but then sighed and sank back down. “Fine,” she
grumbled. “I suppose that’s another thing you learned from experience?”
He inclined his head. “It took me a couple weeks to eat red meat again. Yours might take
longer. You’re a lot thinner than I was.”
She wrinkled her nose at this, but finally slowed down as she sipped on the soup and nibbled
on the bread. She slowly made her way to the bottom of the bowl without further incident.
“Can you take more?” asked Draco.
She sighed and shook her head. “No. Shame about the steak though. I hate that it's gone to
waste.”
“Who said it’s gone to waste?” he asked as he speared it with his fork and put it on his own
plate.
“Excuse me!” she demanded.
He just grinned and sliced off a piece before popping it in his mouth. “I’m merely asserting
my husbandly privileges, Granger,” he said.
She scowled at him, and he couldn’t help but chuckle at how irritated she looked. She was
lovely like this with her cheeks flushed.
Imagine her pink cheeks if you can make her come.
Draco roughly shoved the errant thought aside, as he turned back to the movie. The Beast
was just showing Belle his library. Belle exclaimed in happiness. Granger sighed wistfully.
Draco scoffed.
“What’s your problem?” she asked.
He gestured toward the library on the screen.
“That. The Beast’s library isn’t that bad, I’ll grant you, but it’s not that amazing. She’s
falling all over herself.”
Granger’s jaw dropped. “Are you saying that she shouldn’t be awed by it?”
He arched an eyebrow. “I’m saying that some libraries in real life are better than that one.
And since this is all made up you would think the creators could have come up with
something more impressive.”
“More impress… Malfoy. Are you telling me your library is better than the Beast’s?”
“Obviously,” he said, as he rolled his eyes.
It might have been the first time Draco had ever rendered Granger speechless.
Take her to your library. Push her against a bookshelf. Suck her neck, then her tits, then
her…
FUCK. OFF.
Draco really needed to get this family magic under control. The suggestions and stray
thoughts were not helping matters.
They continued to watch for a few more minutes, and soon the Beast and Belle were dancing
together in the ballroom.
“His ballroom is adequate,” commented Draco. “Better than the library at any rate.”
Granger snorted next to him. “Don’t tell me you took dance lessons as a child.”
“Of course I did.”
“Ponce.”
“Swot.”
They fell silent again, until the Beast released Belle because he loved her.
“He’s a fucking idiot,” declared Draco.
“What? Why?” said Granger with consternation.
“Because he didn’t fight for her! Why did he just let her go? He’s a beast isn’t he? He
should have kept her in the damn castle where she was safe and then gone to free her father
himself. ”
“You don’t like this movie either then,” she pointed out.
“I don’t appreciate the suggestion that my library is substandard or that I would ever be
stupid enough to let the woman I love go like that. It’s asinine.”
There was a slightly awkward silence as Draco realized what he just said.
“Maybe she wants to be free,” whispered Granger.
“No she doesn’t,” insisted Draco. “Look at her. She’s obviously miserable without him.”
And sure enough, Draco’s theories were proven true when Gaston led the villagers to take
over the castle, and Belle came from behind to save the day. Draco frowned as he watched
Belle try to get to the Beast before Gaston did.
“You see?” he said. “They need each other. He was an idiot to let her go, especially with the
wolves in the forest and that Gaston fellow lying in wait for her.”
“He didn’t know about Gaston,” pointed out Granger.
Draco rolled his eyes. “She’s pretty isn’t she? Of course there’s some imbecile who’s
fantasizing about getting into her knickers.”
They both fell silent as Draco watched the end: with true love’s kiss, the spell was broken and
the Beast transformed into a handsome prince.
“Hmmm,” he said. “At least his hair isn’t too bad.”
“It looks like Lucius’s,” she pointed out.
“Circe, you’re right. I take it back.”
She laughed, and Draco found himself grinning too as a couple of owls pecked on the glass.
Draco sighed and rose as he let them in. He saw one letter from his father, which he ripped
up without reading. Granger raised her eyebrow curiously at this. Then he saw a short
missive from Theo, which he opened to read.
“Excellent. Theo managed to escape without putting my trousers beyond magical repair.
He’s at Nott Manor, currently declining to see my father. It sounds like my mother and
Astoria went to bed just as Theo fell mysteriously ill, though I suppose they’re aware of
everything by now.”
“Theo?” she asked.
Draco nodded. “We had a big family dinner tonight with the Greengrasses. Theo and I
polyjuiced into each other so I could escape, and he could stay behind. After Pansy and I
left, he took a fever fudge and then climbed the tree outside my bedroom window to make his
escape. It sounds like he got out before we got married.”
Granger’s eyes widened. “And you don’t want to hear what your father has to say?”
“I know what he has to say. ‘Dereliction of duty, a stain upon the Malfoy name, perhaps we
can find a way to fix it, blah, blah, blah.' I’m not interested.”
She studied him for a moment before pushing the cart of food back into the hallway. When
he returned she looked at him squarely.
“You really don’t mind being married to me?”
“I wouldn’t have asked you if I did,” he said.
She turned a light pink, but said nothing more as she made her way back to the loo to finish
her nighttime routine.
“It’s late,” she said after she emerged.
“Let’s sleep,” said Draco as he started to walk toward the cot.
“What are you doing?” she inquired.
He gestured toward the cot. “Sleeping. You can have the bed.”
She bit her lip and seemed to debate something before she huffed out a breath. “Oh bloody
hell, just share it with me. We don’t have to touch.”
Draco’s heart skipped.
Take her to bed. Strip her naked. Make her yours.
“Why would you want to do that?”
“I assume we’ll be doing it soon anyway, won’t we? Like… tomorrow? When I move to the
Manor?”
“You’re moving to the Manor?”
Draco was nonplussed. He certainly didn’t mind it. No, he didn’t mind it at all. But it had
never occurred to him that she would.
She looked at him like he was dense. “We’re married aren’t we? And besides, the Manor is
the safest place for me.”
“What makes you say that?”
“No Malfoy can seriously harm me directly, right? And none of the elves can either because
it would be against their bond. I’m sure Lucius never freed them. I still think it’s best if we
share a room until your father gets used to it just to have an extra layer of security at night,
but if I’m alone at my flat he could send somebody to break my wards and dispose of me
while I’m sleeping. My flat’s muggle, and I can’t ward it like the Manor.”
Draco stared at her.
“You want to… share a room?”
Share your bed with her. Share your body with her. Share your seed with her.
She looked a little uncomfortable. “I mean, I suppose we can sleep apart, but I thought –”
“No,” said Draco quickly. “No, of course not. You’re absolutely right. You’re safest at the
Manor, and it’s best to be in my room at night. Nobody could get in without waking me too.”
“Then maybe we should just accept the inevitable and…” she trailed off as she gestured
toward the bed.
“Alright,” said Draco carefully as he moved toward the bed, scarcely believing that his wife
was Hermione Granger, and she was inviting him to sleep with her.
Sleep. Not fuck, but sleep. Bloody hell.
He slipped under the covers on one side of the bed and watched carefully as his wife did the
same thing on the other side. She started to raise her hand to turn off the light on her side of
bed, when she stopped. She was staring at the ring that she was still wearing on her left
hand. It glittered in the lamplight.
“How did you know?” she whispered.
“Know what?”
“About these rings.”
“I didn’t,” he said. “I spent a couple hours shopping in London and stumbled across them.”
She was silent for a long moment. “Do you happen to know what they represent?”
Draco’s stomach twisted a bit uncomfortably. “They represent the freedom to love
whomever you wish.”
She nodded a little and put her hand down.
“How did you know about them?” he asked. “I wasn’t aware they were that popular.”
“Oh they aren’t, I suppose. But the design has been around for a long time.”
“You must have seen it before then.”
“Mmmm,” she said in agreement. But she didn’t elaborate, so Draco didn’t ask.
She shut off the light and settled into her side of the bed. Draco had a brief moment of panic
when he realized there was a ‘her side of the bed,’ but it quickly subsided as his magic flared
at the thought.
Her side of the bed. Roll over and pin her to it. Kiss her lips, her neck, her tits, her stomach,
her cunt. She’s your wife, and you should worship her body. She will accept your seed and
grow your heirs. Take her. Claim her. Make her yours. Keep her body for yourself. Let no
other man touch her.
Draco allowed the thoughts from the marital magic to linger in his mind, as he heard her
breathing slow and the scent from her shampoo drift over to his side.
He was jolted out of it by a whisper. “Malfoy.”
“What is it Granger?”
“Thanks for getting me out of that place.”
Protect her. Claim her.
“I’ll never let you go back there,” he said.
They were silent again.
Give her pleasure. Make her scream. Cherish her womb. Spill your seed inside of her.
Complete your marriage bond with her.
“Granger,” he whispered.
“Hmmm?”
“Do you think Belle knew that the Beast was nothing more than a flawed man before she
kissed him? Did she realize he was trapped in a nightmare of his own making?”
There was a long silence.
Kiss her, hold her, adore her, devote yourself to her.
“I’m pretty sure she figured it out, yes.”
“When did she figure it out?”
“Isn’t it obvious? It was the moment he decided to save her from the wolves.”
Chapter 11: Inlaws and Not in Love (Yet).
1 December 2003.
Draco woke up slowly. Something was different this morning, but he was in that hazy place
between wake and sleep and couldn’t quite put his finger on it. He allowed his mind to drift
a little as he confronted the sensations one by one.
There was softness under his hand.
There was also something a bit hard and pointed.
He smelled a pleasant floral scent in his nose.
Something on his finger was hard and cold.
His magic felt like it was purring.
Touch her, wake her, fuck her.
Draco’s eyes flew open as the events from the previous night slammed into his memory. He
had done it. He was married to Hermione Granger. Now he was in bed with her — at her
suggestion no less — and evidently she planned to do this at night going forward.
He stayed completely still as he took stock. She was asleep with her back toward him.
Somehow they had both migrated to the middle of the bed. Draco supposed that wasn’t
terribly surprising, at least on his part. He had never once slept in the same bed as another
person, and he was accustomed to sleeping in the middle. With Granger though, this had
somehow translated to Draco’s arm draped across her, and his hand under the hem of her top.
That softness he was feeling was her skin, and the hard thing her ribs.
He inhaled and cataloged the scent of her shampoo with that familiar scent that was all hers
before turning to himself. He was a little sore, having been in the same position for too long,
but his magic was so happy that he was touching her. His hand was splayed across her
stomach and itched to move higher to explore his wife more thoroughly.
And he was hard. Merlin, but he was hard. When was the last time he had woken up like
this? He could scarcely remember.
He was debating about what to do next. He wanted to touch her, kiss her, try… things with
her. But he also didn’t want to scare her off. He wanted to get into bed with her again
tonight, this time his actual bed at the Manor. If he moved then she might wake up and have
second thoughts.
But fuck he was hard. And he wanted to see her.
Never in his life had he considered the intricacies of being the first person to wake up with a
complicated bedmate. The fact that it was his wife and she had just left prison and they had
shared nothing more than a chaste kiss made the issue infinitely more puzzling.
He felt her move, and he squeezed his eyes close.
Pretend to be asleep.
He forced his breathing to slow and prayed that she couldn’t feel his pulse thudding through
his hand. He knew the moment she realized what was going on because she stiffened and
then relaxed again.
She’s about to pull away.
He waited for it, disappointment already filling him at the anticipated loss, but then she…
didn’t.
Instead, he felt the lightest, barest whisper of one finger reach up to touch his hand that was
covering her abdomen. It was as though she was tracing something, and it took him several
harrowing seconds to realize what it was: his wedding ring. She was touching his ring
curiously, innocently, and then he felt a small clank of metal as her ring brushed his.
Another moment, and then she stretched a little, and Draco’s eyes flew open as he felt her
bum brush his erection before pulling away quickly. His heart was racing, but he didn’t
move. He couldn’t move, not if there was even the slightest chance she might do it again.
He waited, the seconds ticking by, and then…
Another prod, softer this time, almost experimental. Draco had to bite back a groan. No
witch had ever… and now he was thinking…. and his magic was….
“Fuck,” he said in the faintest whisper.
She froze, and he almost swore again, but if he stayed very still then maybe she would think
she had been imagining it.
But it was too late. He felt her slip away, and he was mourning the loss of her body heat and
soft skin. He made a show of ‘waking up,’ stretching himself as he rolled onto his back and
finally allowed himself to look at her.
“Morning,” he said roughly.
Her cheeks were a little pink, and her curls were tousled. She looked freshly fucked like this,
and Draco’s cock twitched so hard he was certain she would see it under the covers. It was as
different from the perfectly coiffed Astoria as he could possibly imagine. Every time he had
pictured Astoria emerging from his bed, she never had a single hair out of place. But
Granger… she was all wild curls and wrinkled clothes and smooth legs.
Smooth legs.
Draco realized he was looking her up and down, and yes her legs were smooth. They were
magically smooth, in fact. He gulped as he realized she must have done this last night.
Surely she hadn’t been allowed hair removal charms in Azkaban or even a muggle razor.
That meant she had come to this hotel and the first thing she had done was showered and…
prepared? Perhaps for him?
The thought made his magic spark.
He snapped out of his reverie as she raised an eyebrow.
“Good morning to you too. What’s the agenda for today?”
“Agenda?” asked Draco in confusion.
She nodded. “Yes. Now that we are here and rested… do you have a plan for what comes
next?”
Draco opened his mouth to respond and immediately shut it. He just shook his head.
To his relief she seemed more amused by this than annoyed. “Let me guess: your entire
focus was getting me out of Azkaban, and you didn’t think of anything past that.”
Not true. I did think about the consummation part quite a bit.
“Erm, right,” he said instead.
“In that case, I propose breakfast here and then we face the music with your parents. Part of
me is dreading it but another part can’t wait to see Lucius’s expression.”
Draco cracked a grin at this. “Fair enough. Whatever it is, we'll face it together. He’s going
to be far angrier with me than you. Why don’t you get dressed, and I’ll order some
breakfast.”
She nodded agreeably to this, and he called up room service again for a little of everything:
he ordered a full English along with porridge, several pastries, and even a bagel with cream
cheese and smoked salmon. It arrived surprisingly fast, and Granger just stared at it in slight
disbelief.
“Hungry are you?”
Draco shrugged. “You should eat whatever you can eat. I’ll eat the rest.”
She eyed it, and then she surprised him by saying, “What do you think I should eat then?”
“The porridge should be fine. If you can stand the bagel with salmon that would be very
good too. You need some fats, and it won’t be as hard on your stomach as the filet from last
night. Maybe nibble on a sausage too and see what it does for you, but small bites please.”
She hesitated, but nodded, and Draco watched as she tucked in to the suggested items. She
ate half of the porridge, the entire bagel, and then choked down a couple bites of sausage
before shaking her head.
“Good, you did really well,” he said encouragingly.
“I like smoked salmon,” she admitted.
“I’ll make sure the elves know. We need to get some weight on you.”
She cast a slightly annoyed look at him.
“It’s not that bad being thin.”
“Granger, there’s thin and then there’s skeletal. You’re currently the latter.”
She turned pink. “Usually I’m ‘curvy.’”
She said this a bit bitterly, and Draco stared at her in bewilderment.
“Why is that a problem?” he finally asked.
“It’s not,” she said quickly. Too quickly.
“Granger,” he insisted. “Tell me.”
She pursed her lips and then sighed. “It shouldn’t be a problem. I know that. But… there
have been comments over the years. That’s all.”
“Your wedding diet,” Draco suddenly remembered.
She said nothing to this and just looked away.
“Granger,” said Draco, and he reached for her wrist. His magic hummed as he touched her.
She turned to look at him in confusion.
“What?”
“Fuck them.”
“Pardon?”
“I said, fuck them. Fuck the people who put you on that wedding diet. Why should they care
what you look like?”
She was silent for a long while.
“Ron prefers thin,” she finally said. “Obviously not as thin as I am now, but thinner than I
was. We got together briefly after the war, when I had lost a lot of weight while on the run.
He made it clear he liked me on the smaller side. I didn’t really keep up with it once the war
was over because I could actually eat again without rationing. I was back to my normal size
soon after eighth year started. When I was getting ready to marry him, I… tried to get back
to where I was that summer after the war. The wedding diet wasn’t Fleur’s or Molly’s idea. I
just asked them for help with it. He and I had never done certain things together, and there
were a lot of reasons for it but part of it was the fact that I felt self-conscious after I went
back to normal. I thought maybe if I finally looked right I could actually bring myself to…”
Draco didn’t know that he could hate Weasley more than he already did. He was nearly
quivering with anger as he listened to her tell him this, but he forced it down because she
didn’t deserve to deal with his own feelings about it. He chose his next words very carefully.
“Well you aren’t married to him, you’re married to me. Personally, I don’t care how thin or
how curvy you are — just as long as you’re healthy, which currently you are not because
you’ve lost so much weight your body has literally shut down normal functions. And for the
record, I don’t mind curves. Not at all.”
“But Astoria is —”
“A frigid bitch,” he finished. “She was selected for me, against my will. You should never
consider her to be any sort of standard. I’ve never felt an ounce of attraction toward her. In
fact, the thought of having to bed her was the thing that finally broke me and convinced me
to jilt her in the first place.”
She considered this.
“You don’t mind curves,” she finally said.
“No, I…” he trailed off, a bit worried he might say too much.
“You what?”
“I like curves, Granger. I like them a lot.”
She was staring at him seriously. “Do you… happen to remember what I looked like? In
eighth year I mean?”
Draco nodded slowly. He couldn’t tear his eyes away from her face. His memories of her
body in those too-short skirts with her shirt buttons straining from the size of her tits had
fueled any number of fantasies for him over the previous months.
“And?” she whispered.
“You were really attractive,” he said. “You came back from the war looking like a fucking
woman, and I tried not to look at you because I was sure I’d never get within ten feet of you.
It was unbearable at times, and the fact that Weasley didn’t even appreciate it… he’s a
damned idiot. I am truly struggling to understand how he could have looked at you and
wanted anything different.”
She started to smile a little, and Draco exhaled in relief.
“I know that what I think about it shouldn’t matter to you,” he added. “But since we will be
doing… certain things eventually… then please know I won’t mind at all if you go back to
your normal size. You certainly shouldn’t maintain any sort of diet on my account.”
“So you’re saying I should eat the steak,” she said.
“Granger, the minute you can keep it down I’ll feed you filet basted in butter for dinner every
single night if you want it. I’ll even add a poached lobster tail on top. I would love nothing
more than if you were back to normal.”
She grinned broadly at this. “I may take you up on that, Malfoy. And… thanks. It’s
comforting to know you won’t be totally disappointed when we finally fulfill the Ministry’s
edicts.”
Put your cock in her now and show her just how much you want her.
Draco shoved his magic down.
“I will be the opposite of disappointed. I already told you that the minute you want to
consummate, just say the word.”
She chuckled a little and then stood to shrink their bags. Then she held out a hand for him to
take.
“Before we do that, there are a few other milestones we should cross.”
Draco sighed dramatically, feeling quite pleased with himself for pulling her out of her mood
about her body.
“But talking to Lucius isn’t nearly as fun as staying here and... you know…”
He wiggled his eyebrows at her suggestively, and she just laughed again and smacked him on
the arm.
“Ouch, bloody hell Granger, why must you keep hitting me?”
“Shut up, you know you like it.”
Draco couldn’t stop the smile from crossing his face at that. “Yes ma’am.”
“Shall we then?”
“We shall,” he said, as he gripped her hand and pulled her through the darkness.

Hermione Granger was a brave witch, Draco had never doubted that. But it wasn’t until they
were staring at the long drive from the gate of Malfoy Manor to the front door that he fully
appreciated just how brave. He waited for a moment for her to get her bearings while she
swallowed hard.
“The Snatchers brought us through here,” she said quietly.
Fuck.
It wasn’t that Draco hadn’t considered this – he had. And it was the entire reason he was sure
she would want to continue living at her flat. He was so sure about it that he never gave the
alternative a great deal of thought. Then the previous night he was so distracted by getting
into bed with her that he hadn’t fully considered what this would be like today. But before he
could say anything about it, she just squared her shoulders and nodded to herself.
“Right then. You said you’ll back me up when it comes to your parents?”
“Always,” he said.
“Then let’s go.”
She strode forward like she owned the place, and Draco followed a step behind, marveling at
the determination that was rolling off of her in waves. They approached the front edifice, and
he could see her tilting her chin up ever so slightly. As she made her way up the steps to the
portico the doors automatically opened for her.
Of course they did. She was a Malfoy now, in magic if not in name.
Draco hurried to stay close behind her, their footsteps echoing in the marble-covered foyer.
A tiny elf then appeared with a CRACK!
“Master Draco!” cried Patsy. “You is returning!”
“Patsy, this is my wife, Hermione Granger,” he said.
Granger sank to her knees and held her hand out to the elf.
“Patsy, it’s a pleasure to meet you,” she said.
Patsy’s eyes were huge as she tentatively shook Granger’s hand.
“You is my Mistress now?” she said in confusion. “Patsy is thinking her new Mistress is
Miss Astoria. She is still sleeping upstairs. They is planning a wedding this morning with a
wedding breakfast to follow.”
Shit.
This was worse than Draco was expecting. He assumed they would force a marriage at
midnight like Weasley and Granger, but obviously he was incorrect about that. Potter did tell
him they had twenty-four hours to do it. And of course his mother and Beatrice would insist
on a sodding wedding breakfast if they were waiting until daylight hours.
Draco scowled at this, but glanced down at Granger and saw she was actually smirking.
“Yes, well, I’m afraid Malfoy here had other plans about that.”
Draco smiled at this a little before turning to the elf.
“Patsy, Granger is my wife, and she wishes to move into the Manor. She will be in my
room. Could you please arrange for her things to come over from her flat? She can provide
any details about it you may need.”
Patsy looked at him in confusion. “You is calling my new Mistress ‘Granger’ Sir? Where is
your manners?”
Draco flushed, and Granger smirked again. “Old habits,” he said. “We generally refer to
each other by surname.”
“But Mistress must be a Malfoy then.”
“No, I’m the Lady Malfoy now, but I’ve kept my maiden name,” said Granger gently. “I’m
rather… well known. It just seemed sensible.”
Patsy looked a little confused by this, but gave a small curtsy.
“Then if Mistress is telling Patsy her address she is arranging for Mistress’s things to be
moved.”
Granger smiled and gave Patsy some instructions about her flat. After Patsy disappeared
Draco looked at her curiously.
“I’m surprised you aren’t trying to free her already,” said Draco.
“Perhaps I’m just biding my time.”
Draco snorted. “That’s not like you.”
She shrugged. “I’ve been forced to confront some hard truths about house elves over the
years. I wish they were all free, but I know that’s not realistic. I got the law requiring
payment passed, and that was a huge win. I’ve learned not to force freedom on those who
don’t want it. That being said, if I discover that Patsy or any others are mistreated here, you
should prepare yourself for a personalized S.P.E.W. campaign.”
He smiled a little at this. “I consider myself forewarned.”
“Draco!” came the sharp tones of his father. Draco tried not to groan as he looked over
Granger’s shoulder to find Lucius striding toward them, with Narcissa following close
behind. Based on his father’s expression and his mother’s concern he was sure they knew
everything by now. It was just the Greengrasses who were still in the dark.
You knew this was coming. Breathe.
“Father,” he said, as he stepped next to Granger. “May I present my wife? Hermione
Granger, my Lady Malfoy. She says you two know each other professionally.”
He heard a faint bubble of laughter come from Granger to his right.
“Lord Wiltshire,” she said with excruciating politeness. “It’s a pleasure. And Lady Wiltshire
of course – I don’t believe we’ve seen each other since the war.”
Lucius went pale and seemed to be at a loss for words. Narcissa was holding a copy of The
Daily Prophet, and Draco saw her hands were trembling.
“I demand an explanation,” said his father in a dangerous voice.
“An explanation about what?” asked Draco carelessly. “Shall we discuss how you convinced
the Wizengamot to pass a truly horrendous law in some mad effort to get me to marry a
woman I have no interest in? Or should we talk about the meetings you had with Shacklebolt
and Weasley to amend the law to force the issue a second time? Tell me – have you heard
whether Weasley went to prison for failure to consummate his marriage on time? Because
when we left him last night he had less than thirty minutes to do it.”
“You have no respect for–”
“I’ve made myself very clear,” said Draco coldly. “I don’t want Astoria. I’ve never wanted
Astoria. But in a surprising twist of fate, the law you helped create matched me with a
woman whom I do quite like and have enjoyed getting to know over the last few months. We
got married last night, and it’s done.”
At that moment Astoria appeared at the top of the stairs, along with her mother. Based on
their expressions he could tell they heard every word.
“Lucius!” hissed Beatrice, who was looking down at them with wild eyes.
“We can fix this,” said his father a bit desperately.
“Beatrice, Astoria, allow me to present my wife, Lady Malfoy,” said Draco cordially.
Astoria looked to be nearly in tears, while Beatrice’s rage was clearly building. Draco
decided to get out in front of it.
“Astoria, I do hope you have some other matches lined up because this plot with my father
has clearly failed for you. And Beatrice, you should know that Blaise Zabini will not be
cooperative. I’ve already warned him that he’s your backup plan. You might as well save
yourself the time and consider the next wizard in line.”
Now Lucius spun around to look at a spluttering Beatrice.
“Back-up plan?!” he demanded.
Beatrice pulled herself together and glared at Lucius, as she gestured toward Draco and
Granger.
“Clearly I needed one!”
“Well Blaise isn’t going to do it,” said Draco shortly. “You’ll be wasting your time with
him. And since Granger is now my wife, you’re wasting your time with me as well. I
suggest you scurry on. The clock is ticking, is it not?”
“You ungrateful—” she started, but Draco gave a bored yawn which cut her off, as he looked
down at Granger instead.
“Tell me my dear, do you wish to make use of the wedding breakfast my mother and Beatrice
have planned for this morning? Or was our meal sufficient?”
“Oh, our breakfast together was quite sufficient, thank you,” she said cheerfully. “There’s no
need to belabor the point is there? We're married, and there’s nothing more to say about it.”
Astoria was sniffling now, though Draco couldn’t help but notice she still hadn’t said
anything at all. This drove the point home for him: she was so fucking placid there was
barely any life in her.
“Nothing more to say!” exclaimed Lucius.
“Nothing more to say,” agreed Draco, now turning back to his father. “She’s a Malfoy by
magic, if not name. That means you can’t touch her. Nor can you harm her or me for going
against your wishes. I do hope you’ll come to your senses at some point and recognize that
this scheme of yours has resulted in a daughter-in-law who is vastly superior to the one you
originally chose for me. But you’ve always been so blinded by your so-called blood loyalties
that I’m sure you will remain woefully ignorant about the extraordinary witch before you.”
Astoria and Beatrice both looked deeply offended by this, but Draco ignored them.
“I could have it annulled!” cried Lucius.
“No you can’t,” chimed in Granger, now stepping forward to face his parents and the
Greengrasses. “Not without changing the law again. And we both know that the public is
not going to stand for another closed session amendment. You had your chance and lost. It’s
done.”
“You can’t possibly believe I will allow this,” he hissed.
Granger gave a disinterested shrug. “For the time being you don’t really have any choice.
Get the MLPP repealed, and then we can talk about moving me out of the Manor. But until
then, Draco?”
Draco’s heart skipped to hear his first name on her lips.
“Yes my darling?” he said, looking down at her fondly.
He saw his parents and the Greengrasses gaping at him out of the corner of his eye.
“Why don’t you give me a tour? Feel free to skip the drawing room though, I feel as though I
know it rather intimately.”
She started to walk forward, and Draco took a moment to admire the sight of her walking
away from him. But then she turned and actually crooked her finger at him.
“Come, Draco,” she said.
Merlin but that made him hard.
Come Draco. Come inside of her. Make her come for you. Please her, adore her, worship
her.
“Yes ma’am,” he muttered and hurried after her. His father looked appalled, his mother
gobsmacked. Astoria finally came to life as jealousy flashed across her face, and Beatrice
was staring at Lucius with poison in her gaze.
“Mother you aren’t using this are you?” he asked as he passed her. He plucked The Daily
Prophet out of her fingers. “I’m sure my wife would like to read it. At her leisure of
course.”
“Draco, come along,” called Granger from up ahead.
“Right away darling,” he cried as he hurried toward her.
When he reached her she slipped one hand into his and gently patted his cheek with the
other. His magic thrummed, and he sighed contentedly.
“You’re so obedient. Now give me that tour, please.”
He thought he heard his father choke at this, but Draco ignored it. Warmth unfurled inside of
him at her praise. It was intoxicating.
Obey her. Show her how good you can be. Touch her, kiss her, fuck her until she tells you
that you’re the best she’s ever had.
“This way,” he said, tugging her hand and leading her up the stairs. “Let’s start with the
bedroom, shall we?” he added in a voice that carried down to his parents and the
Greengrasses.
He heard a light giggle next to him, and he couldn’t help but grin broadly. Granger was here,
and nobody could do a damn thing about it.

The “tour” started and ended with Draco’s bedroom, where Granger snatched the paper from
him and began to devour it after taking a moment to admire the space.
“This will be lovely,” she said simply, as she looked around and then seated herself near the
small fireplace and curled up to read.
Draco let her have at it, relishing the novelty of having her in his room. He flipped idly
through a quidditch magazine while she hummed to herself and dropped the occasional
nugget of information.
“Well the amendment made the front page of course,” she said. “Nothing about us yet, but I
suppose that will come with the evening issue. We did get married after the print deadline.
The editors don’t seem thrilled that it was passed behind closed doors.”
He hummed in agreement.
“Oh goodness, they published the list of unconsummateds as of the moment the amendment
passed. There is plenty of speculation about which one will end up with me.”
He chuckled at this.
“Oh and here’s a section about which one will end up with you. Ha! They interviewed
Astoria for it.”
“Pardon?” asked Draco.
“Yes,” said Granger. “She said, and I quote, ‘I have always cared about Lord Malfoy a great
deal, and I hope the Wizengamot will take our history and compatibility into account when
they make their selection for him.’”
“What a load of bullshit,” he said.
“Not compatible then?” she inquired.
“Seeing as how I occluded years of my life away to avoid thinking about her, I’d say not. I
truly don’t know if the Malfoy magic would have been strong enough to help me get it up for
her.”
She lowered the paper and quirked an eyebrow at this. “There’s a lot to unpack there.”
“Hmmm, perhaps. But we can unpack it later. You’ll need to actually unpack any moment.”
Sure enough, a few minutes later Patsy appeared, carrying the first round of things from
Granger’s flat. Granger flung the paper aside and began to supervise, while Draco picked up
the paper and scanned it. He saw Granger was right: nearly the entire paper was devoted to
the amendment to the MLPP and speculation about how it would affect him and Granger.
Their marriage, however, had taken place after most of the press left for the evening. He was
sure it would be on the front page of The Evening Prophet.
Granger and the elves continued to work on moving into Draco’s room, and after a few hours
he called for lunch. After their discussion at breakfast, he requested some high calorie things
with healthy fats – nothing so heavy her stomach would reject it, but things her body would
need to bring her curves back.
Merlin, but he wanted her curves back. When he first encountered her in Hogsmeade he
thought she had simply grown and her curves diminished naturally. He told her the truth that
he had barely allowed himself to look at her during eighth year because she was the very
epitome of every soft, voluptuous fantasy he wasn’t allowed to have. And he hadn’t seen her
closely in the years that followed so he had no real notion of what she looked like these days.
But now that he knew the body he barely permitted himself to look at would return if she just
ate normally… he was more than eager to encourage it.
Astoria had always been tall and slender. There was barely a curve on her. Granger,
however, would have flesh a man could sink himself into once she was back to her normal
weight.
Knowing that she had tried to change the natural shape of her body for Weasley made him so
angry he could scarcely breathe when he thought about it. But she had run, and now she was
paired with a man who would appreciate it, adore it, fucking bury himself into it if given half
a chance. Draco was very aware that his virginity had an official expiration date now, and he
wondered if she would let him touch her before then. Would he be able to touch her tits?
Fuck, would he be able to see her tits? He’d never seen any before, not in real life. He’d
only seen tits in Blaise’s naughty magazines, but seeing them on a glossy page versus on his
wife were two completely different things. All of his experiences with tits in the past had
been teenaged fumblings under a witch’s shirt. He’d never gotten a witch fully topless
before.
Or maybe he could touch her down there. Maybe she’d even let him taste her down there.
He knew some blokes didn’t like it, but Draco was more than willing to shove his face
between her lush thighs and find out what that was like. He was sure she would be pillowy
soft, and he’d be able to grip her arse, and he wouldn’t fucking break her while he did it.
He buttered some bread for her as he thought about this. Then he considered his work and
added an extra swipe of butter on top for good measure.
Draco wanted Hermione Granger back.
The afternoon wore on, and by the end of it Granger was fully moved in. On the very last
trip the elves brought what could only be described as an orange beast.
“Crooks baby! I’ve missed you!” she cried as she nestled herself into his fur.
This animal – Crooks – glowered at Draco while he was draped inelegantly in Granger’s
arms. He was enormous, nearly half the size of Granger herself. He had a squished face that
very clearly told Draco to fuck right off.
“This is Crookshanks,” she said simply. “He’s my world.”
Well that told Draco everything he needed to know about it. He walked forward cautiously
and tried to shake the beast’s paw in greeting. The beast recoiled and swiped at him.
“Charmed,” said Draco, as Granger smiled.
“Crooks buddy, Malfoy and I are married. I’m afraid you can’t smother him or I’ll be rather
cross.”
The animal gave her a skeptical look as he hopped out of Granger’s arms and then padded out
of the room, evidently already aware that he was now the master of Malfoy Manor. He did
not seem to be terribly impressed by this news.
“What now?” asked Granger, as she watched her familiar slink out.
“It’s nearly time for tea,” replied Draco. “Shall we?”
He put out his arm, and she gripped it as he escorted her back downstairs and into the parlor
they typically used for tea. Draco was slightly surprised to find both of his parents there.
He pulled out a chair for Granger, who sank down into it before he settled himself.
“Tea? Do you take milk or lemon?”
“Lemon please,” she said, as Draco poured for her. He eyed the tiered tray of sandwiches
and skipped the cucumber in favor of egg salad as he placed two on her plate. Then he
plucked a scone and added a generous layer of clotted cream as well. She just gave him an
amused look.
“You are rather determined, aren’t you?”
He smirked. “I’m considering it a Project.”
“Hmmm, yes. Like my Project to deprogram you. Speaking of which, could I borrow your
owl this evening? I need to write to Minerva McGonagall.”
Draco’s parents were silent as they listened to this exchange, but Draco just nodded. “Yes of
course. What for?”
“Oh nothing,” said Granger. “I just need to inform her that I can return to work whenever it’s
most convenient.”
There was a clatter of a fork on the other side of the table.
“Work?” demanded Lucius.
Granger looked him in the eye. “Of course I work.”
“You left the think tank this past summer,” he said sharply. “You gave the impression it was
because you were about to get married.”
She gave a small smile. “Did I give that impression? Or did you just make assumptions
because your own world view is so narrow?”
Lucius glowered.
“What is it you plan to do then?” he demanded.
“Oh, I’m the new Muggle Studies professor at Hogwarts,” she said brightly.
Lucius looked horrified, while Draco started to laugh. He tried to cover it up with a cough.
“Draco, your manners!” chastised his mother. Granger thumped him on the back.
“It was a shame I had to miss most of my first term,” she said, “but Minerva assured me she
would find a substitute while I was gone.”
“Is that why you were in Hogsmeade that day?” asked Draco, now looking at her. “I never
did ask what you were doing there.”
“Yes,” said Granger. “I had to let Minerva know that there was a slight timing conflict. She
let me borrow a school owl to write to you.”
Lucius’s eye twitched.
“Do you plan to move there then?” asked Narcissa. Draco couldn’t gauge her tone of voice.
“No, not at all,” said Granger. “Only the heads of house have to live there. I plan to floo in
each day. I imagine Minerva will ask me to wait until next term to come back since there are
only a few weeks until Christmas, but it will be up to her.”
“And why, may I ask, are you teaching Muggle Studies?” said Lucius with a look as though
something had died right under his nose.
Granger raised an eyebrow. “Why, it’s all because of people like Draco of course. And you,
I suppose.”
Lucius gaped. “Excuse me?”
“Yes of course,” said Granger blithely. “Muggle Studies has been mandatory for the older
students since the end of the war, you know, but the curriculum has never been very good. It
occurred to me that if I could improve it, then I could help reverse biases when wizards are
children. Their grandparents may be hopeless, but quite a few witches and wizards in my
generation are more tolerant – Draco is an excellent example of that – and my students will
surely want to introduce their parents to muggle innovations. Some of them are quite
incredible. My hope is that once the grandparents are dead, we will end up with a population
of voters who aren’t bigoted pricks.”
Draco spit out his tea, and his mother chastised him again.
“Aren’t bigoted…” echoed Lucius, “you cannot be serious! We care about tradition and duty
and…”
“The definition of a bigot is one who will not listen to the beliefs or ideas that are different
from their own and perpetuate biases against other populations of people who do not include
them. You, sir, are a bigot. So are many of your friends and colleagues. I’ve decided to fight
it at its source, rather than do it law by law.”
She calmly ate a sandwich while Lucius spluttered.
“You have no respect! No manners! No hope of achieving any sort of place in our world!”
“Well I did marry a Malfoy, didn’t I?” she asked. “That seems like a good place to start.”
And then to Draco’s delight she held Lucius’s gaze as she slowly placed both elbows on the
table, picked up her cup of tea, and slurped.
Lucius’s eyes bugged out, and he stood abruptly. “You are going to regret this!” he hissed to
Draco. “Marrying this… this…”
“I think the word you’re looking for is ‘mudblood,’” supplied Granger calmly, and Lucius
just gritted his teeth and stormed off. The moment he was through the doors, Granger
removed her elbows from the table and began to drink her tea with perfect etiquette.
She caught Draco’s eye with a twinkle, and he was sure he was looking back at her like she
was the most beautiful thing he had ever seen. He didn’t care though, she was. He couldn’t
believe he had been lucky enough to be matched with her and now actually married to her.
“Granger,” he said suddenly, as he reached across the table to take her hand.
“Hmmm?”
“You’re extraordinary.”
She turned a little pink at this, but seemed pleased. Draco caught his mother’s eye, who was
watching him intently. He gave her a slightly challenging look.
“What is it, Mother? You’ve been very quiet.”
Narcissa narrowed her eyes. “I’m adjusting, Draco.”
“Hmmm,” he said. “Surely this didn’t surprise you.”
“That you wished for Ms. Granger to be your wife? Of course that doesn’t surprise me. You
made that very clear over the last few months. That you outsmarted your father though?
Yes, I’m very surprised.”
“Well I suggest you adjust quickly.”
She inclined her head, before studying Granger.
“I have always been more practical and less idealistic than my husband. I can see that you
are both very determined to get what you want, and I’m not inclined to stand in your way
now that you’re here. However, you will need lessons,” she said shortly.
Granger raised an eyebrow.
“Family history, etiquette, dancing, that sort of thing.”
“Pureblood finishing school?” asked Granger wryly.
“In a manner of speaking,” said Narcissa. “If you wish to change anyone’s opinions about
mud — muggleborns or muggles, you must know how to exist in a world without them first.
If not, you will be immediately dismissed as a witch who is ignorant of our ways and who
only found herself in this position out of pure happenstance. Even your efforts at Hogwarts
will be unsuccessful if the children of the pureblood Houses don’t take you seriously.
Softening views or not, I can assure you they have all been raised to identify those who fit
into their world from the cradle. There are not many who would break from it even if they
are intrigued by muggle innovation.”
Granger narrowed her eyes. “So I need lessons in order to fit in. I see.”
“I can arrange a tutor,” offered Narcissa.
Draco knew his mother wasn’t thrilled about this, but she was also right that she was more
practical than Lucius. She always had been, and she was extending a hand to Granger
because of it. He hoped Granger recognized the olive branch for what it was. To his relief
her voice softened a little.
“I can see that you may be right, and I appreciate the offer for a tutor. However, I think I
know somebody who is very well-equipped to help.”
“And who is that?” asked Narcissa with ill-disguised curiosity.
“You’ll see,” Granger said.
Chapter 12: Caught With His Pants Down.
1 December 2003.
The Evening Prophet did not disappoint.
It arrived just as tea was wrapping up, along with at least a dozen owls, all of which fought
for attention to get to Granger or Draco first.
Draco hastily collected the mail and set it aside while he leaned over Granger’s shoulder and
watched her unfurl the paper.
Granger and Malfoy Wed in Last-Minute Ceremony to Subvert MLPP Amendment!
by Rita Skeeter
Readers of this paper have already learned of the MLPP amendment, which was passed in a
hush-hush closed door session yesterday evening by the Wizengamot. Due to short delays in
print times, The Daily Prophet reported on the amendment this morning, with much
speculation about the fates of Hermione Granger and Draco Malfoy, the couple to whom the
amendment would immediately apply. It was thought that Lady Malfoy – née Granger – was
most likely to end up married to Ronald Weasley and Lord Malfoy married to Astoria
Greengrass. After all, the Wizengamot was given license to consider options such as prior
romantic history, and in the case of Lady Malfoy, Mr. Weasley may have been the only
possibility left before the deadline.
However, the couple surprised the Minister of Magic when they wed late at night in a visiting
room in Azkaban. The marriage was properly performed by Mr. Anthony Goldstein and
witnessed by Lady Pansy Nott and Mr. Blaise Zabini. According to the marriage records,
they were wed with just an hour to spare before the deadline expired.
When Lord and Lady Malfoy appeared on the dock after Lady Malfoy was officially released
from Azkaban, they encountered the Minister of Magic himself, along with Ronald Weasley,
several aurors, and an officiant who was, no doubt, summoned to perform a wedding between
Lady Malfoy and Mr. Weasley at the stroke of midnight. This reporter was also present to
observe the encounter. The presence of Mr. Weasley lent credence to Lady Malfoy’s claims
that the entire amendment was passed as a way of manipulating her – and to a lesser extent
Lord Malfoy – so that they would fall in line with the Minister’s plan, and the public’s
perception of the MLPP would improve.
Lady Malfoy has not been shy about her feelings toward Lord Malfoy in her opinion pieces
over the last few months. She has described him as possessive, domineering, and selfish.
Indeed, this reporter witnessed these tendencies herself when Mr. Weasley attempted to touch
Lady Malfoy, and he was thrown backwards by Lord Malfoy’s own marital magic. Lord
Malfoy’s words left no debate about his position on the matter.
“...She has made it very clear that she doesn’t want you touching her, and thanks to you I’m
now the only man who gets that exquisite privilege. Stay the f*** away from her if you know
what’s good for you.”
It is true Lady Malfoy has aligned herself with a harsh man, but she claims he was the only
one who was honest with her.
“He was the only one who told me the truth about what was going on out there! He was the
only one who visited me without any false pretenses!… I’m not saying this is ideal… but at
least I’m married to somebody who isn’t going to stab me in the back!”
Lady Malfoy also made it abundantly clear that her feelings toward Mr. Weasley have always
been more platonic than his own. In fact, she cleared up a great many rumors about their
relationship over the years with a single sentence.
“I’ve never slept with you Ronald, and after years of turning you down whenever you tried I
thought you would take a bloody hint!”
It is obvious to this reporter that Lady Malfoy – who has been beloved by the wizarding
community since the end of the war – was backed into a corner by the Minister of Magic and
the Wizengamot. Her Gryffindor sensibilities were no doubt severely hurt when Mr. Weasley
was complicit in the act. She chose to wed Lord Malfoy instead of her lifelong friend based
solely on the fact that he hadn’t lied to her about the amendment.
What kind of marriage will it be between the muggleborn Golden Girl and a former Death
Eater, when the only thing they have in common is the lack of a lie? It is obvious Lady
Malfoy has been sacrificed upon the altar of the MLPP, and the only question that remains is
what comes next. Will she be forced to bear the child of a Death Eater before Minister
Shacklebolt comes to his senses and repeals the MLPP?
Draco exhaled as he read it and glanced at Granger. She was staring at a picture of herself,
looking gaunt and wild-eyed as she stepped onto the dock. He watched as a smile slowly
emerged, and he nudged her a little bit.
“Well, darling?” he asked, “is that what you were hoping for?”
“Yes,” she said simply. “I really don’t like disparaging you, Malfoy, but I also don’t want our
marriage to come across as some sort of star-crossed lovers thing.”
“No, of course not,” he said quickly.
He glanced at his mother, who rose to read it too, and she narrowed her eyes a bit as she
considered it.
“So that’s your plan then? Get the law repealed? And then what?”
Granger hesitated a moment. “Then I’m free to choose, as is everyone else.”
“And what will you choose?” she insisted.
“I’m still figuring that out.” said Granger in a soft voice.
Draco’s stomach lurched at this. He already knew what he would choose – he would wish to
stay married to her. She was already firmly entrenched in his head and had swept away any
fears about matrimony. But he couldn’t be certain she felt the same way. He had been the
one to push the marriage, not her. He only hoped that she would come around to the idea,
and if she was ever given a real choice that she would choose him anyway.
“And you?” asked Narcissa, now looking at Draco.
“If our marriage is annulled, I plan to ask Granger out on a date and see if I can talk her into
marrying me again,” he said simply.
The shocked look on Granger’s face was almost worth the heartache Draco felt as he
considered this possibility.
“So Astoria…” started his mother.
Draco looked at her sternly. “Astoria is never going to happen. Not that it’s any of your
business, but I would have struggled to consummate a marriage with her, even with the
family magic. I’m not sure it’s strong enough to overcome my distaste for her.”
His mother’s jaw clenched at this, but then she sighed and nodded. “Very well. I will…
communicate that to your father.”
“If you must,” said Draco carelessly. “It’s time you both understand that I’m an adult and can
make my own choices in these matters. I think I’ve been very clear about what and who I
choose.”
Granger’s cheeks were aflame as he said this, but Narcissa just pursed her lips.
“Fine. I will leave you both now. Your father needs tending.”
She swept out of the dining room, and Draco chanced a glance at Granger.
“You’re serious?” she asked quietly. “You would try to marry me again?”
Draco snorted. “Granger, I know our union has been unconventional, but I didn’t have to
visit you as often as I did in Azkaban. I didn’t have to alert you to the amendment. I didn’t
have to take fucking polyjuice to turn into Theo last night so I could escape the Manor to
marry you. I don’t agree with the MLPP – I think it’s a shitty law. But it also resulted in you
being here with me, and I’m pretty happy about that. So yes, I would try to marry you again
if our marriage was annulled. I don’t think I could stay away from you now.”
“Because of the marital magic,” she insisted, almost desperately.
Draco rolled his eyes. “No, I can distinguish between the magical urges and the real thoughts
in my head. The magic isn’t that strong.”
He was watching her carefully, but she was not meeting his eye. She fiddled with her napkin
as she thought about it, and Draco’s stomach sank.
“Look,” he said shortly. “I don’t expect you to feel the same way. You’ve made it very clear
that there are a lot of things about me you don’t like, and much of it is deserved. I’m just
being honest with you. The MLPP aside, you intrigue me. You always have in a way, I just
wasn’t allowed to want it. But I’ve grown up, and now I’m getting a taste and… I want
more. But if you don’t, that’s the answer I suppose. I’ve earned your revulsion, and there’s
nothing I can do about it.”
He said this last part a little bitterly. She still said nothing, and Draco sighed. He started to
rise, but she stopped him with her hand.
“Wait,” she said. “I just…”
He said nothing as he stared down at her.
“Just give me some time,” she whispered. “I’m just so angry about the law, and especially
this amendment because it was so personal. I haven’t been able to sort my own feelings
outside of it yet. I didn’t have room for them in Azkaban because I was just trying to
survive.”
Draco felt himself softening a bit at this. “Of course. I can understand that.”
“Will you stay?” she asked hesitantly.
Draco nodded slowly and sank back down into the chair.
They were quiet for a long while as Granger continued to survey the paper. Draco reached
over to the stack of mail and began to open it.
“The wizarding public seems to be on your side,” he said carefully. “They are worried about
you, being here with me.”
She grimaced a bit. “Please know that I don’t enjoy giving them that impression.”
“But it’s necessary,” he said. “I’m not thrilled about it either, but if I’m not a big bad Death
Eater anymore then it becomes that star-crossed lovers narrative we’re trying to avoid.”
She looked at him guiltily. “Still, I may have overdone it.”
He shrugged. “Doesn’t matter. I consider it a long-overdue penance. I got off fairly light
after the war. Besides, there are no reporters here at the Manor. I can handle being feared in
public as long as you aren’t afraid of me in private.”
“I’m not,” she said quickly. “Not at all.”
“Then don’t worry about it,” he said firmly. “We can change the public perception of our
relationship at any time, you know that. For now, let’s leave it. I suspect it’s really eroding
trust in Shacklebolt.”
“It is,” she said quietly, as she pointed to a different article. “And Rita’s really leaning into
the scandal of the Minister meeting with Lucius. That’s going to make it worse for him.”
Draco snorted. “Half the Wizengamot meets with Father.”
“But still,” she insisted, "this time it was corrupt.”
Draco nodded in acknowledgment. “And Weasley? Any more mention of him?”
Granger flipped open the paper and scanned for a moment as she sipped on the dregs of her
tea before spitting it out all over the paper.
“What?” asked Draco in surprise. Her face had transformed into a look of pure glee, as she
looked down at the article and summarized quickly.
“Ron went to Azkaban because he failed to consummate his marriage on time. Rita stuck
around long enough to hear Shacklebolt remind him that he had to consummate his marriage
before midnight now that the amendment no longer applied - it was only for us of course, and
once we married it became ineffective - so he rushed back to the Burrow to find Prudence.
Rita followed. Knowing her she probably turned into a beetle to listen to the whole thing and
hid her photographer in the bushes. Evidently there was a brief shouting match between Ron
and Prudence in the front yard because he did not let her know about his plans to trap me
with the amendment. But eventually she pulled him into a broom shed for privacy, and Ron
didn’t finish in time. It’s unclear if she refused or if he was just too slow.”
Draco stared at her in disbelief. “Rita wasn’t warded out?”
Granger shrugged. “The house is warded, but the last time I was there the wards had been
loosened around the grounds for the press due to the wedding. Maybe they forgot to put
them back in place.”
“Bloody hell, that’s incredible,” said Draco, leaning back to relish the thought.
“Even better,” added Granger, now with a distinct sparkle in her eye, “Ron was arrested with
his pants down, though Prudence was completely dressed.”
She flipped the paper around to show him, and sure enough there was a photo of a clearly
nude Ronald Weasley who was handcuffed, with his manly bits blurred out. Prudence was
glaring at him in the photo, but she didn’t have a single button out of place. Draco gaped at
it.
“I thought our wedding was the best moment of my adult life thus far darling,” he said
reverently as he stared at it, “but I’ll admit this might have it beat.”
She laughed at that and flipped the paper back around, her brow now furrowing as she
continued to read. “It says they arrested Prudence too. Rita reports that Ron tried to argue
that they just needed a few more minutes, but they were both arrested anyway. The aurors
said the law was clear that they had to go to Azkaban for at least a brief stay if they didn’t
complete consummation by the deadline.”
“I wonder how long they’ll be there?” wondered Draco.
Granger shrugged. “Probably be less than a day if one of them requests a conjugal visit with
the other. They’ll have to shag it out in Azkaban though before they’re released. Similar to
getting married there.”
Draco frowned at this. “Granger, you should have had a real wedding with a dress and
everything.”
“I did have a real wedding with a dress and everything. You even saw me in it.”
“But still…” he said.
She shrugged. “Weddings have never really been my thing. I’ve gotten to have the
experience of planning one, and I have no strong desire to do that again. Ours was quite
memorable. I suppose Ron’s first time with his wife will be similarly memorable.”
Draco decided to let it go. It was stupid to feel guilty about not marrying her with a real
wedding, because there wasn’t anything to be done about it. Thankfully she didn’t seem as
bothered by it as Draco was.
“Well it’s unbelievable,” muttered Draco. “You couldn’t have planned it better if you had
tried.”
“It’s true,” she acknowledged. “It’s a shitshow.”
“A shitshow of Weasley’s own making though,” pointed out Draco.
Hermione inclined her head in acknowledgment just as Patsy popped in.
“Mistress,” she said, addressing Hermione, “there is a mediwitch at the gate requesting your
presence.”
Draco watched in confusion as a shuttered look crossed Granger’s face, but she just nodded
and rose. Draco automatically stood as well.
“Should I come?” he asked.
She shrugged. “Up to you. It won’t take long.”
That wasn’t a no, so Draco followed behind her. Patsy led them into a different parlor they
often used for guests, and Draco saw a healer in the traditional lime green robes waiting for
them, with a satchel in her hand. Narcissa was there as well.
“Mrs. Malfoy,” she said as Granger approached.
“Granger,” she corrected.
“Pardon?” asked the healer.
“You should address me as either Lady Malfoy or Ms. Granger. I have a title now, but my
surname has not changed.”
The healer sniffed in apparent disapproval of this, but she motioned for Granger to come
toward her.
“We will need to run the standard health checks under the MLPP.”
Granger said nothing to this, but just rolled up her sleeve and held her arm out to the healer in
a bored manner.
Draco watched as the healer drew some blood and placed it on a small card, which
shimmered for a moment and then turned green.
“There you go,” said Granger, rolling her eyes. “No contraceptives here.”
Draco’s eyes widened as he realized what this was: one of the random health checks.
“Very well,” said the healer, as she pulled out a portable scale. “I will need to check both of
your wands too.”
Granger held out her wand, and the healer performed priori incantatum to show the last
several spells that were used. Then she did the same thing to Draco.
She seemed faintly disappointed when no contraceptive charms were cast.
“I’m not sure what you were expecting,” said Granger. “We haven’t consummated yet, so we
would have no need to cast any of those spells. The Ministry must be aware of that.”
The healer’s nostrils flared a little. “Yes, well, one can never be so sure. Now then, we’ll
need to weigh you too and –”
“No,” said Granger shortly.
“Excuse me?” asked the healer.
“I said no. The MLPP permits random blood draws of the witch, examination of the wands
of both the witch and wizard, and pelvic exams for the witch after the consummation period
has ended if there have been no confirmed pregnancies within three months of that date. You
are not permitted to do anything else to me. You are not my healer.”
The mediwitch straightened up. “Ms. Granger, I must insist …”
“I said no,” she said coldly.
“But you are clearly violating the law,” countered the mediwitch. “One need only look at
you to see that you are too thin to sustain a pregnancy! Contraceptive methods are not –”
“The MLPP prohibits all hormonal and magical contraceptive methods. There isn’t a single
thing in the law about losing weight because a witch has been imprisoned for several months
and opted not to eat food that was spoiled when her guards ejaculated onto it. Or haven’t you
read my op-eds?”
Narcissa and the healer both went pale.
“I’m afraid I’ve been told…” said the witch.
“Tell Kingsley I said that he can sod right off,” said Granger. “And if you do a single thing to
me that is not expressly permitted by the law, I’ll turn your name in to the St. Mungo’s ethics
board for medical malpractice.”
“And we will also sue you for assault,” added Draco.
Granger turned to look at him, and he smiled to see the approval on her face.
“Yes, that too. And I will be writing about it in The Daily Prophet,” she added.
The mediwitch swallowed, but finally nodded and rose. “Very well. I will… communicate
this… to my superiors.”
Granger snorted. “You do that. I assume I’ll be seeing you next week then?”
Draco looked at her incredulously.
“It’s possible,” acknowledged the mediwitch.
“Then you might also want to communicate to Kingsley that I have made notes of every
‘random’ medical exam I have been subject to since the Matching Ceremony. I’m sure you
have my file, and you will see that they are all negative. I am much too smart to be tripped
up by something as common as a muggle morning after pill. You might also want to let him
know that if the random checks continue as often as I had them in Azkaban, I’ll be writing
about that too. Somehow I doubt most witches are being subjected to weekly blood draws.”
“Weekly!” exclaimed Draco, now looking at her in disbelief.
“Weekly,” confirmed Granger calmly. “They arranged one every time I had the standard
weekly health check in Azkaban, which is why you weren’t informed. I didn’t write about it
in Azkaban because I had other lower-hanging fruit. But if it continues now that we’re
married, I might find myself less inclined to hide that truth from the public.”
“That’s bullshit,” snarled Draco, now turning to the healer. “Tell Shacklebolt to go fuck
himself and leave my wife alone. She’s part of my household now. I will not tolerate it.”
Draco was feeling positively dangerous now that he knew Granger had done this every single
week for the last three months. He didn’t bother to hide his anger from the healer, and she
quickly stood and nodded. “Yes, I will… let him know. Thank you.”
She practically fled the parlor, and then Draco took a deep breath to compose himself and
looked at Granger again.
“I wish you had told me.”
She shrugged dispassionately. “As I said, their tests will never trip me up. I was saving it to
use later if I needed more ammunition.”
“Did the guards really do that to you Ms. Granger?” asked Narcissa, looking a bit shaken.
“Yes,” she said simply. “A few times.”
Narcissa’s eyes narrowed. “But not all the time.”
“Of course not,” said Granger.
“So you really did…”
Granger just smirked. “There are ways around certain physical aspects of the MLPP. I know
all of them.”
Narcissa cocked her head to study her for a moment. “I don’t doubt that. But don’t you want
children?”
Draco felt his heart stop. They hadn’t talked about this. He assumed she wouldn’t have
children with him, and he had told himself he was fine with that. He really was. But now
that his mother raised it, he was desperate to hear her answer.
“I want to choose my children. And I can’t imagine the Malfoys would welcome a halfblooded grandchild.”
Draco’s stomach soured at this. He would welcome one, certainly. But he knew she was
right about his parents.
Narcissa, however, was quiet for a long while.
“If my alternatives are half-blood or none at all, then I would take the half-blood,” she finally
said.
Draco’s jaw dropped at this, and even Granger looked startled.
“Lucius –” started Granger, but Narcissa just rolled her eyes.
“He’s a lot of hot air, my Lucius. He will tell you he doesn’t want it until the moment the
child is in his arms. Then he will melt. You would do best to ignore everything he says.”
Granger narrowed her eyes now. “Well seeing as how I was just married yesterday, I’m not
quite ready for babies yet, MLPP or not.”
“No of course not,” said Narcissa smoothly. “But please – don’t avoid them on the Malfoys’
account. Draco really must have a legitimate heir at some point.”
“Mother…” muttered Draco.
She just shot him a knowing look, but waved him off. “I’m sure Ms. Granger is intelligent
enough to know the truth of that Draco. Now then, why don’t you run along and seduce your
wife? It’s not likely to result in a child at this point anyway.”
Narcissa cast one last meaningful look at Granger’s figure as she rose and swept out of the
room. Draco knew his face was burning when Granger turned to look at him, her cheeks
pink too.
“Well?” she said in an attempt at bravery.
“Well what?” he muttered.
“Are you planning on seducing me?”
“My mother is meddlesome,” he muttered.
“I’ll take that as a no, then,” she said. “In that case, I have some correspondence I need to
attend to.”
He couldn’t quite identify the tone of her voice, but he said nothing more as she left the
room.
Draco had no idea what to do next.

Several Hours Later
Draco’s first full day of marriage had been an odd one, constantly vacillating between the
intrusive thoughts from the Malfoy magic, an urge to present a united front for his parents
and the mediwitch, and bouts of awkwardness. He was willing to admit to himself that he
wanted her. He just didn’t know how to go about getting her, especially in light of her
confession that she hadn’t sorted her own feelings yet. Draco knew he shouldn’t be
discouraged or disappointed by it – he had been to Azkaban too and knew how much effort it
took to stay mentally present and save face there. Teasing apart real feelings of affection
from the anger caused by the MLPP was surely low on her list of priorities, and he couldn’t
blame her for needing some time. But it left him in an odd place, suspended somewhere
between hope and despair. He caught moments when he was certain she liked him, but she
was also so principled that Draco was sure she would view it as a violation of her
commitment to the cause if she let herself truly enjoy the time with Draco.
That, more than anything, was the reason he was willing to proceed with the reputational
harm he was enduring in public. Some part of him hoped that if Granger castigated him
enough in the press, she would allow herself to ease into a real relationship with him in
private. It would be worth it if it meant she wanted him for more than the physical
minimums imposed by the MLPP.
Still, their first full day together had ended awkwardly once Narcissa told Draco to go seduce
her. Draco wished he could do it, but he didn’t know how. He had no real practice or
experience, and Granger was an anomaly at times. She could be hot then cold, confident then
cautious. Her persona and moods could change in an instant, and Draco struggled to keep
up. They didn’t talk very much for the rest of the day as Granger retreated to her
correspondence before joining Draco and his parents for a late dinner. The meal was stilted,
and Granger appeared to be lost in thought as she studied her food though she ate little. Soon
after that they retired to bed, and Draco slipped into one side while Granger slipped into the
other.
“Night,” she whispered.
“Goodnight,” he said.
And that was all. Draco stared at the ceiling for a long while, contemplating the witch next to
him while he felt the magic.
Talk to her, touch her, coax her. She liked your obedience so show her you can do even
better. Tease her clothes off and give her whatever she asks for. Fill her up and make her
yours.
Draco eventually drifted off to the feeling of the magic nudging him, until he woke with a
start in the middle of the night.
He hadn’t moved to the middle of the bed yet, nor had Granger. But she was thrashing
around, whimpering in her sleep, and Draco sat straight up to stare down at her.
Her jaw was clenched and her eyes squeezed tight, and though she wasn’t saying much, he
could tell she was in the middle of a nightmare. As he watched, a tear emerged and tracked
her cheek.
“Granger!” he hissed.
She didn’t respond, so he gripped her arm gently, his magic jumping as he did it. “Granger!”
he said a bit more loudly.
Still nothing, so he started to shake her. “Granger. Granger! GRANGER!”
She gasped as she sat straight up, looking around wildly. For a split second she shrank when
he saw him, fear flooding her eyes. Draco thought his heart was breaking, but then her eyes
cleared, and she slumped forward, gripping his arms too. She was shaking like a leaf.
Comfort her. Cherish her.
Draco had no idea what he was doing, but his magic was prompting him to do something, and
for once it made sense.
“Hey,” he said softly as he pulled her closer. “You’re alright. It was just a nightmare.”
She took a shuddering breath and then exhaled. She breathed in and out, several times, as her
forehead was bent toward his.
“Sorry,” she croaked.
“Don’t apologize,” he insisted. “I’ve had my fair share. I’m sure coming to the Manor
triggered it… or seeing Father today.”
She shrugged. “Maybe. I dreamed about Nagini.”
Draco’s eyebrows flew up. He wasn’t expecting that.
“Oh?”
“I don’t know,” she said. “I had nightmares quite a bit in Azkaban. It was just a lot today.
Sorry again, I can go, I –”
She started to swing her legs over the edge of the bed, and Draco gripped her wrist.
“Stay,” he said.
She hesitated and looked back at him. “I might have more.”
“Then I’ll wake you up.”
“Seriously Malfoy, neither of us will sleep and –”
“Granger, do you know what I do all day long?”
She blinked at this apparent non sequitur.
“Erm, no, actually. You’ve never told me.”
“Not a fucking thing. I have no job, no responsibilities. Most of my schedule revolves
around meal times and a few close friends who also have no jobs or responsibilities.
Occasionally I have meetings with my solicitors or join Father in meetings at the Ministry,
but that’s it. If I don’t sleep well at night, I can nap as much as I want during the day.”
He thought he saw a shadow of a smile cross her face. “I married a wastrel then?”
“A very rich wastrel, yes,” he agreed.
Now she really did smile as she eased back into bed.
“I suppose I can’t argue with that.”
She looked at him like she was waiting for something, and she bit her lip. Draco’s heart
started to race, but he just decided to do it. This sort of thing was easier in the dark when he
couldn’t see every microexpression on her face.
“Come to the middle with me,” he said, tugging on her wrist.
She looked a little surprised by this, but nodded slowly and moved toward him. He pulled
her down with her back against him, just like they had woken up this morning. His hand was
around her waist but on the outside of her shirt this time.
“Is this alright?” he asked hesitantly.
She just nodded, and he felt her idly tracing his ring again with her hand. Draco let her do it
for several long moments before catching her hand in his and lacing their fingers together.
“Are you planning on seducing me now?” she whispered.
His stomach lurched, and the words just slipped out. “You’re probably going to have to start
it.”
She twisted around to look at him in confusion. “Really?”
He shrugged a bit nervously. “I have no idea what I’m doing.”
She narrowed her eyes. “I heard rumors for years about your Slytherin sexual prowess at
Hogwarts.”
He frowned. “So… what? You’ve been waiting for me to…”
“To do something, yes. I’ll be honest, I’m surprised you haven’t, and it’s really throwing me
off. You had a reputation there.”
“Ah. Yes. Well, as to that reputation…”
He trailed off, not really wanting to tell her the truth about his very limited experiences.
“I’m listening,” she prompted.
He sighed. “The truth is, my reputation at Hogwarts was a load of bullshit. Pansy fabricated
most of it and spread all sorts of rumors about me. We thought it might make Astoria look
elsewhere if the school believed I was some sort of manwhore, and it had the side benefit of
making Theo jealous enough that he finally made a move on her. But you should forget
whatever you’ve heard about me. Most of it wasn’t true.”
Her eyes were wide. “Oh! Well… alright then.”
She turned back around, but Draco felt her nestle in a bit closer, and he sighed deeply as he
inhaled her scent.
This was progress.
He had gone from waking up like this and pretending it didn’t happen to asking her if he
could hold her like this, and she allowed it. He wondered if he had the balls to kiss her again,
but his heart stuttered as he thought about it and decided not to push his luck. He had made a
start tonight. She didn’t know her own feelings yet. A chaste kiss in a prison to celebrate an
engagement was one thing. A hot snog in his bed was entirely different.
My virginity has an expiry date.
He reminded himself of this firmly as he squeezed her hand one more time and closed his
eyes behind her. He could do this step by step, little by little. He would focus on the wins:
marrying her, sleeping in the same bed as her, now holding her.
Draco Malfoy was determined to win this. He just had to be patient.
Chapter 13: Special Powers.
6 December 2003.
How does one kiss a wife?
This had become one of the Most Important Questions in Draco Malfoy’s life during his first
full week of marriage. He had seized his moment in Azkaban, but he hadn’t found it again,
despite the fact that the wife in question seemed to enjoy burrowing herself into his arms at
night. Draco, ever the opportunist, continued to invite her to do it without saying much about
it. But all the burrowing in the world didn’t translate to lips and tongues and hands and…
things.
Draco thought he might be going mad, as the urges continued to urge him and the thoughts
continued to think for him.
Kiss her, lick her, strip her.
Over and over again, on repeat, his magic sought more from her. Draco thought he deserved
a trophy for resisting the thing he wanted so badly.
His friends were no help, either. He escaped to Nott Manor one afternoon after the third
night with Granger in his arms, and he clutched at his drink as his friends eyed him
cautiously.
“So how is it going?” asked Theo carefully.
“Wonderfully. Dreadfully. I don’t fucking know.”
“Ah,” said Blaise. “That clears it up.”
“No, I mean… I kissed her in Azkaban, yeah? Right after I proposed. And she sleeps with
me at night. But ever since…”
“Don’t tell us you haven’t kissed her again?” asked Pansy.
Draco’s face gave them the answer.
“Why not?” asked Theo in confusion.
“I don’t know how,” exclaimed Draco.
“It’s pretty straightforward, really, you approach the witch, lips first, and then –” started
Blaise as Pansy and Theo laughed. Draco just glared at him.
“I mean I don’t know the right moment. She said she’s still working out her feelings about
our marriage, and she hasn’t said anything else. I’m supposed to wait, right? Until she
decides she likes me?”
“I thought you said she likes you,” said Pansy in confusion. “Before we went through that
mad plan of yours to marry her.”
“No, I said she wants to marry me. I also said she doesn’t hate me. I have never said she
likes me.”
“That is so fucked up Draco,” said Pansy.
“I know!” he groaned.
He left that time with his friends with one piece of clear advice: Just Fucking Do It. But
Draco still wasn’t sure the best way to go about it, though Pansy’s suggestion to start with the
neck seemed to have some merit.
So for the next couple of nights Draco held his sleeping wife in his arms as he stared down at
her neck, watching the pulse point thud in time to her heartbeat. He wanted to kiss her there.
He wanted to see if she liked it as much as he liked the idea of it. But the moment was never
quite right. What if she said no? What if she decided she only wanted some friendly comfort
at night and the bare minimum physical relationship to satisfy the Ministry? What if she
transformed into Angry Granger again and hexed his balls off? He was sure there would be a
spell for something like that and Granger would know what it was. The word “anger,”
afterall, comprised two-thirds of her last name.
Or – worst case scenario – what if she sicced her orange beast on him?
Draco’s relationship with the beast was tenuous, at best. Much of his first week of marriage
had been spent in a staring contest with it, trying to assert his dominance, and losing. He got
the idea from his mother who quickly reached some sort of agreement with it, though he
wasn’t certain how she achieved such a feat. But however she had done it, the beast seemed
to largely ignore Narcissa, while it kept Draco under surveillance. With Lucius he was
viciously underhanded, and when Draco caught the animal pissing on his father’s favorite
loafers, Draco knew he was right to be wary of it.
So no, Draco hadn’t kissed Granger yet. Any number of things could go terribly wrong if he
did, and he was reluctant to shatter their fragile union.
Granger herself seemed to keep busy during her first week engaging in something she called
“lesson planning.” As predicted, McGonagall had asked Granger to return to Hogwarts in the
new year to not disrupt the students at the very end of term. Granger had floo’d to Hogwarts
several times to observe the classes being taught in her stead, and she inevitably returned
each afternoon huffing in annoyance about the standards being set by her substitute.
Other than her lesson planning, Granger mostly kept to herself, except at mealtimes when she
seemed to take great delight in antagonizing Lucius. Draco was torn between humor and
dismay after every meal. He really did want his parents and his wife to get along eventually,
but he also had to acknowledge his father was a giant arse and Granger was delightful
whenever she baited him. The most surprising discovery – and something Draco was still
processing – was the realization that his wife and his father were actually very much alike.
They were both interested in politics, they were both magically powerful, they could verbally
spar with the best of them, and they were not afraid to do almost anything to get what they
wanted. If they hadn’t been on opposite sides of virtually every issue that had ever come
between them, Draco thought they would be a formidable team. But as it was, neither of
them were willing to bend on their principles for the other, and Draco thought it unwise to
point out their similarities to either one of them.
By the time Saturday rolled around, Granger had exhausted her list of insults for her
substitute teacher, Lucius was prowling around the Manor randomly hexing things in
annoyance, Narcissa was cooly unruffled, and Draco was very sexually frustrated. In the
outside world some intriguing things were happening too: namely, Weasley and Prudence
were still in Azkaban. Evidently Prudence hadn’t forgiven him long enough to shag him and
decided to pull a Granger and stay, complete with op-eds to The Daily Prophet and
everything.
It was causing an endless number of headaches for Kingsley Shacklebolt because it was now
drawing the ire of the purebloods who had previously written off Granger.
Minister Being Taken to Task for Failure to Safeguard the Sacred 28!
MLPP Amendment Did Not Go Far Enough to Halt Unreasonable Azkaban Stays!
Prison Conditions in Azkaban Worse than Ever!
Will Shacklebolt Face a Vote of No Confidence?
Draco really didn’t know how things could get any more interesting — short of finally
kissing his wife, that is — until said wife announced at breakfast that her mysterious etiquette
tutor would be arriving at the Manor that morning.
“You still haven’t said who it is,” chided Narcissa.
“Consider it a surprise,” said Granger sweetly, as Lucius harrumphed.
It wasn’t long after that when Patsy arrived, announcing Mistress Hermione’s visitors, and
Draco found himself following his wife out of sheer curiosity to discover who it could be.
He couldn’t help but notice that his mother and father were trailing behind as well.
The group entered the foyer, when a childlike shout echoed through the hall.
“AUNT MINNIE!”
His wife was nearly bowled over by a small boy, who came careening down the hall and
attached himself firmly to her midriff.
“Teddy bear!” she laughed as she dropped to her knees and gave him a firm hug. For a split
second Draco was wondering why the magic permitted it, but then he remembered it only
prevented Granger from being touched by wizards who were of age. This little boy clearly
was not.
“Aunt Minnie! Aunt Minnie! Gran said you were on a trip!”
“That’s one word for it,” muttered Granger, as she ruffled the little boy’s hair. Draco peered
down at him curiously and saw a familiar nose and chin and wild curls that were softer than
Granger’s but just as unkempt. He had sparkling hazel eyes and a large smudge of dirt on his
cheek.
Then Draco looked up and thought his heart might be failing him.
For a split second he was sure he was looking at Bellatrix. But then he blinked and realized
the woman he was staring at had softer features. Her hair was lighter. Her eyes were not
quite as hooded, and her cheeks were more rounded. But she still had the sharp nose and
haughty features that all of the Black women possessed.
He spun around to look at his mother, and saw that she appeared to be at a loss for words. It
was such an odd expression that he did a double take. Narcissa was hardly ever truly ruffled.
Then he glanced at his father, who looked faintly ill.
“Andy,” said Granger, and she stood and then hugged the woman Draco now knew must be
his Aunt Andromeda.
“Hermione,” said the woman in a voice that again sounded so similar to Bellatrix’s, except
that it was warm. “It’s been too long my dear.”
“Well you know me. Stubborn until the end.”
Andromeda laughed, and Draco couldn’t tear his eyes from her. She sounded like his mother
when she laughed. She was such an odd blend of both of her sisters.
“Andy, have you met my husband? This is Draco Malfoy.”
“My nephew, of course,” she said with a sly grin, as she approached Draco to hold out her
hand. Draco’s manners instinctively took over as he bowed over her hand. “Charmed,
Draco. It’s been far too long since I’ve seen you.”
Draco furrowed his brow in confusion and shot his mother a look. He couldn’t recall ever
meeting his Aunt Andromeda. He was shocked to see Narcissa turning a bit red, as though
embarrassed by something, and Lucius was narrowing his eyes as he studied her.
“Aunt Minnie!” demanded the small boy, who evidently felt he had been ignored long
enough.
Granger dropped back to her knees to be on the same level as him.
“Yes, buddy?”
“Did you really get married?”
He said the word as though it was a swear word, and Draco found himself chuckling a little at
this. Andromeda and Granger both were too, and even his mother cracked a small smile.
“Yes, I really did get married.”
“You didn’t kiss him did you?”
Well fuck.
Granger glanced up at Draco, looking inordinately amused. “Hmmm, not at our wedding,
no.”
Then the boy frowned, as though Granger had just said something puzzling, but then his
expression cleared, and he mercifully changed the subject.
“Aunt Minnie, show me your special powers!”
Granger chuckled and then to Draco’s surprise she held out her hand, palm up. She
whispered something low under her breath and then bubbles emerged from her palm, which
caused the small boy to whoop with glee as he tried to catch them.
Holy fuck, wandless magic?
Draco blinked at his wife in amazement, but she didn’t seem to think anything was unusual.
He glanced at his parents and saw they both appeared to be gobsmacked as well. Then she
whispered something else and the bubbles stopped.
“No fair! I want more!” he whined.
“Not now, Teddy. Maybe somebody else wants to show you their special powers.”
The little boy now turned expectantly to Draco and his parents.
“Well?” he demanded, looking at Narcissa. “What’s your special power? Aunt Minnie’s is
bubbles and fire and Gran’s is storytelling.”
Draco made a mental note to explore whatever fire powers his wife evidently possessed at a
later date. He couldn’t decide if the notion was terrifying or arousing.
By now Narcissa seemed to have collected herself, because she stared down at him
imperiously before raising one eyebrow. “Ballroom dancing,” she said.
“I can dance!” cried the boy, and then he started doing what could only be described as an
inelegant sort of wiggle. “Aunt Minnie does dance breaks with me!”
“It’s true,” agreed Granger, very seriously. “We’ve recently discovered boy bands.”
Draco had no idea what she was talking about, but he was saved from having to ask when the
little boy turned to Lucius. “What’s your special power?”
Lucius snorted, and the boy frowned. “Aunt Minnie says everybody has a special power!”
“His special power is finding bad guys,” supplied Granger.
Draco started to laugh and tried to camouflage it with a cough. He glanced at his Aunt
Andromeda, who was wearing a truly Slytherin-worthy smirk at this comment, while Lucius
glowered. Teddy, of course, was deeply impressed.
“Whoa…” he breathed, his eyes huge. “You can find bad guys?”
“He has found so many bad guys,” confirmed Granger seriously. “More than I can count.”
Teddy was staring at Lucius like he was some kind of hero, and Lucius shifted
uncomfortably.
Then Granger nudged Teddy, and nodded toward Draco. “Why don’t you ask him? He’s
your cousin, you know.”
My cousin.
Draco blinked, realizing Granger was mostly correct. He knew he had a cousin he had only
met a handful of times during fifth year who had died in the war. This was her son.
“First cousin once removed,” clarified Draco automatically.
“No need to be pedantic,” said Granger, rolling her eyes. “Teddy has always wanted a
cousin.”
“Yeah, only Victoire has cousins!”
“Teddy, all of Victoire’s cousins also have cousins,” said Granger.
“No they don’t, it’s only Victoire!”
Even Lucius almost cracked a smile at that.
“Well Draco is your cousin. And look at that, you have a big cousin, and all of Victoire’s
cousins are little. Go on, ask him about his special power.”
Draco thought frantically while the boy’s large eyes were turned to him. Then the answer
slipped out.
“I can read minds.”
The boy’s eyes widened. “Wicked…” he breathed. “Can you read mine?”
He glanced at Andromeda, whose eyes were narrowed a little and Granger who was watching
him cautiously.
Draco knelt down and placed a hand on Teddy’s shoulder. “Look me in the eye and don’t
blink,” he said.
Teddy’s eyes were boring into Draco’s as he reached out with some very surface-level
legilimency. Almost immediately a couple of Teddy’s secrets swam to the surface before he
blinked and Draco dropped the connection.
Then he reached into Teddy’s pocket and pulled out a rather squished chocolate frog. “I
believe you took this from your gran’s handbag.”
Teddy gulped and ducked his head as he bashfully handed the chocolate frog back to
Andromeda. Then he turned back to Draco with his eyes wide.
“Flying is also one of my special powers,” added Draco.
Teddy furrowed his brow. “Flying is Uncle Harry’s special power!”
Draco scoffed at this. “Please. I am a far better flyer than your Uncle Harry.”
He saw Granger rolling her eyes at this and giving him a look that clearly said, drop it.
“Teddy, why don’t you show cousin Draco your special power then?” she said instead.
Draco stared down at the little boy curiously, and then to his utter shock he screwed up his
face and turned his hair the precise shade of blonde as Draco’s. In fact, he appeared to be a
Draco in miniature.
He spun around to look at his parents, who were both gaping.
“He’s… he’s…” said Narcissa faintly.
“I’m a mettymogas!” announced Teddy proudly.
“A metamorphmagus, yes,” corrected Granger gently. “You sure are.”
Andromeda gave Narcissa a slightly challenging look. “Surely you recall that Nymphadora
was a metamormphagus too. She also mimicked Draco when they met as young children,
don’t you remember?”
Draco turned and stared at his mother again, who was turning red.
“It’s been a long time, Andy,” said Narcissa stiffly.
Andromeda rolled her eyes. “Yes, and it seems some things never change. You have always
been very good at making use of selective amnesia when it suits you. Very well. We shall
pretend for the sake of your domestic bliss that you never sought me out after Mother and
Father disowned me and our children have never known each other. It is no great matter to
me if that is how you wish to behave. I may have few blood relatives left, but I have an
extended adopted family that fills my time very well.”
Narcissa was pale, but said nothing as Andromeda turned to Granger. “Now then,
Hermione. Why don’t you explain this etiquette nonsense to me. Am I to understand you
really feel like you need lessons?”
“It has been implied that they would be helpful,” said Granger demurely.
Andromeda snorted and then turned to the Malfoys as a group. “You should know that she’s
aware of the histories of the Black and Malfoy families in intimate detail. I’d wager she
could name the birth and death dates of each ancestor going back seven hundred years
without making an error. In fact, she can do it for every family in the Sacred Twenty-Eight.
She made a point to learn it while working at the think tank. Furthermore, her manners and
etiquette are sublime when she wishes to use them.”
She gave a knowing look at Granger. “Let me guess, you’ve been pretending to be common
just to get under their skin.”
Granger smirked. “I do like to fulfill expectations.”
Andromeda rolled her eyes and looked back at her sister. “Hermione’s paternal grandmother
was from a noble muggle family, Cissy. Had she been a boy, her father would be titled. I can
assure you, Hermione knows how to take tea.”
Narcissa’s eyes widened, and then turned to give Granger a scandalized look. “What
happened then?”
Granger shrugged negligently. “Oh you know how it goes. Granny Granger married
somebody she shouldn’t have, and she rather lost touch with that branch of the family. She
decided to give up things like titles for love.”
She exchanged a fond look with Andromeda as she said this, and Draco was struck by the
parallels. It was no wonder Andromeda was aware of this story.
“Anyway,” continued Granger, “it’s true I’ve been a bit naughty…”
Oh fuck, be naughty.
Draco shoved the intrusive thought away.
“...but I promise I’ll start using the correct utensils, provided I can continue to visit Teddy
here on the weekends. It’s easier than going to his home.”
“Of course,” said Draco instantly, before his father could disagree.
Granger gave him a genuine smile before she led the small boy and Andromeda into a nearby
parlor. They arranged themselves on a sofa, and, not knowing what else to do, the Malfoys
settled on a different sofa on the other side of the room. Then Granger reached for a tiny
backpack the boy was wearing.
“Alright Teddy, let’s spend twenty minutes practicing your reading, and then you can pick a
story for me to read to you.”
The little boy nodded agreeably and climbed onto Granger’s lap as he started to sound out the
words in a simple book. He still looked just like Draco, and Draco felt his magic react to it.
She should be holding your son. She should be filled with your seed. She should be the
mother of your children.
Fuck, but the image was a powerful one, and Draco turned to find his parents watching too.
A whole host of emotions flashed across his mother’s face as she watched. Narcissa seemed
to realize that regardless of her blood status, Granger would make an exceptional mother.
She had no trouble at all connecting to the little boy. Her patience was endless as she
explained the concept of the silent ‘e’ in an age-appropriate way at least six times. She gave
encouragement and high-fives, and after ten minutes of practice they took a ‘wiggle break’
where she flicked her wand toward the wireless and danced it out with Teddy for one song
before settling down for more practice.
She was so much softer like this and so different from the snarky, Angry Granger that had
been floating around the Manor since they got married. Draco couldn’t find a single fault
with her like this, and he suspected his mother couldn’t either.
After watching for about fifteen minutes, Narcissa suddenly stood and threw a look toward
Lucius that clearly said he was expected to follow too. Granger glanced at them briefly as
they moved out of the room but then refocused on Teddy. Draco hesitated, but eventually
stood as well and followed his parents. He came to a halt when he heard their voices arguing
in Lucius’s office.
“I’m going to see my sister, Lucius,” said Narcissa firmly. “You’ve stopped me for years, but
I’m done.”
“Narcissa, she’s –”
“I know what she is, Lucius! But this is ridiculous! Our son is married to a muggleborn for
Merlin’s sake, and we haven’t disowned him! There is no reason in the world why I can’t see
my sister who did exactly the same thing!”
“It will be tacit approval of Draco’s match if you do that, Cissy,” said Lucius sternly. “You
cannot! I am putting together a plan and–”
But Narcissa interrupted him, and Draco’s eyebrows flew up in surprise. His mother rarely
lost her temper.
“This whole plan of yours has been ridiculous from the start! Draco is obviously infatuated
with the Granger girl, and fighting it is just going to drive them both away from us!”
“He will move on!” insisted Lucius. “We can get the marriage annulled and–”
“Enough!” she cried. “Give it up, Lucius! The world is changing! I want grandchildren, and
Merlin help me but that young woman in there would mother them far better than Astoria
ever would! I’m not saying that I’m thrilled about her blood! And I don’t expect you to
change your mind about that either! But I do expect you to take a hard look at your only
son’s very obvious feelings and behave! And you will not keep me from my family any
longer! Andy’s husband has been dead for years, and that darling little boy in there may be
my only chance to be involved in a child’s life again if Ms. Granger decides that she doesn’t
wish to bear your grandchildren. Frankly, after the appalling way you treat her I wouldn’t
blame her if she decides to avoid it!”
Draco’s stomach lurched at this.
“She can’t avoid it,” scoffed Lucius. “Not unless she’s willing to go to Azkaban again!”
“You’re being foolish,” said Narcissa harshly. “First of all, she’s perfectly capable of
avoiding a pregnancy in natural ways. That law of yours did not capture every possible
method of prevention, and I know for a fact that Ms. Granger has identified its weak points.
Furthermore, don’t you think she will be willing to return to Azkaban if she decides she
doesn’t wish to have marital relations with our son? And this time she will take Draco with
her. I’m telling you right now Lucius, you need to straighten up and start treating her with
minimum cordiality if you can’t manage affection. Because grandchildren aside, I will never
forgive you if you are the reason our son goes to Azkaban for a second time, and perverse
inlaws do not inspire positive marital relationships!”
Draco was very still as he listened to his parents argue. He wondered if he should assuage his
mother’s fears about Azkaban. He knew Granger would consummate with him, but he hadn’t
told his parents about their unbreakable vow. Then again, if it would persuade his father to
accept the marriage, Draco knew he would never breathe a word about it.
Draco heard his mother striding out of the room, and he ducked into an alcove so he wouldn’t
be seen. His father didn’t follow, and Draco slowly made his way back to the parlor where
Narcissa was now conversing cautiously with Andromeda. Granger was reading Teddy a
story with plenty of dramatic voices and hand gestures.
As he watched the small boy giggle in her arms, Draco could only think of one thing.
I really want to kiss my wife.

Granger’s good mood lasted for about an hour after Andromeda and Teddy finally departed
with the promise of a visit the following Saturday. And then she got quiet and became
practically morose by dinner. She was dwelling on something, Draco was sure of it, and
dinner was a remarkably silent affair as Granger and his father both brooded separately.
Draco and Narcissa tried to carry the conversation, but it was futile, and eventually they just
hurried to finish and make their separate ways upstairs.
It wasn’t until bedtime that Draco finally decided he had enough, and when he pulled
Granger to him in their usual arrangement of arms and legs, he pressed the issue.
“What’s gotten into you this afternoon?”
“Hmmm?”
“You’ve been acting like Crookshanks died, but I know for a fact he deposited a hairball on
my father’s desk not even twenty minutes ago. So tell me what’s wrong.”
She huffed a mirthless laugh at this before quieting. “Tomorrow’s Sunday.”
“And?” asked Draco in confusion.
“It’s my first Sunday out of prison.”
“That’s a good thing, yes?”
She just shrugged.
“Granger, I’m not as smart as you, and while it’s true I’m a rather proficient legilimens I
usually make a point not to do it unless I’m asked. So please, tell me what’s bothering you so
I don’t have to read your mind to find out.”
She sighed. “I go to the Weasleys’ home on Sundays for lunch.”
Ah.
Draco thought about how he should react to this. “And have you heard from any of them?”
She shrugged. “I turned down most of their visits in Azkaban. I did see Ginny a few times
and George and Ron of course. But I never saw any of the others. I just couldn’t bring
myself to face them with the way the wedding ended, and they only tried a couple times.”
Draco knew this of course. He had gotten her reports.
“Were Ginny and George cross with you?”
She shrugged. “George didn’t seem to care at all. Ginny was a little annoyed that the whole
Matching Ceremony and Azkaban thing overshadowed her wedding to Harry and delayed
their honeymoon, but I can’t really blame her for that. Besides, she got over it fairly quickly
once I explained I just didn’t have those feelings for Ron and really didn’t mean for it to be
so last minute. But now Ron has gone to Azkaban, and I don’t know where I stand with any
of them.”
“You think they’ll resent you.”
“I’m certain Molly will, at least a little bit. Ginny’s fairly blunt and told me I was smart to
avoid her mum when she tried to visit Azkaban. Molly was a lot angrier with me than Ginny
was. But eventually Molly got used to Prudence, and Ginny said she would probably scold
me the next time she saw me, but she was starting to come around. Of course, that was
before Ron went to Azkaban too. I’m sure she will blame me for sending her precious son to
prison.”
“It’s not your fault though,” insisted Draco. “It was Weasley’s fault he went in the first
place. And now I suppose it’s Prudence’s fault that he’s still there.”
Granger shook her head. “I’m certain that’s not how she’ll see it.”
“Well you don’t have to go tomorrow,” said Draco reasonably. “You can wait until Weasley
is out. It’s not going to last forever. Either Prudence will cave or Shacklebolt will. The press
she’s generating is almost as bad as yours was.”
Even though they were lying down, she seemed to slump a little. “It’s just… they’re
practically my parents. With the exception of Azkaban and a few vacations I haven’t missed
Sunday lunch at the Burrow since the war ended.”
Draco was still for a moment. “Your actual parents though…” he started.
“We don’t really speak,” she said shortly. “I… obliviated them to remove myself from their
memories during the war and sent them to live in Australia for their safety. I was able to
reverse it and they eventually moved back to England, but what I did to them was truly
unforgivable. They are angry at me, Harry, Ron, the Weasleys, everybody. They blame
everyone else for pushing me to do it, even though that wasn’t the case – I obliviated them all
on my own without telling anybody else about it first. I’ve never been able to make them see
reason though, and it’s easier not to try. These days we exchange holiday cards, but
otherwise we don’t really keep in touch. Molly and Arthur Weasley are my parents now.”
Draco’s heart broke, as he realized just how much she had given up because of him and
others like him. She lost her real parents to keep them safe during the war. And now she
might have lost the Weasleys too because she picked Draco.
“Listen,” he said. “None of this is easy. But if you want to go see the Weasleys tomorrow
you should. I’ll even come with you if you want some moral support.”
She turned around to look at him in surprise. “Really?” she said.
“Sure,” he said, shrugging. “They’ll probably be so pissed off to see me they’ll forget all
about you.”
Her face softened at this as she turned to face him fully. Draco’s heart started to pound. She
was so, so close like this.
She studied him for a long while as she reached up and traced the lines on his face. Draco
was holding his breath, not daring to move at all lest the spell be broken.
“Where did you come from, Draco Malfoy?” she whispered.
“Wiltshire,” he said, and he was pleased to see a small smile cross her face at this.
“That’s not what I mean. I’m wondering how. Your father can be an arse. Your mother’s not
so bad, but she’s still rather cold. Then there’s you…”
Draco said nothing as her finger trailed down his nose and then touched his lips hesitantly.
“You are just surprise after surprise,” she acknowledged.
Draco felt her pulling her hand away, and on instinct he reached up and clasped it to his face
for a moment before turning to kiss her palm.
Yes, keep doing that.
His magic hummed contentedly as he moved to kiss her pulsepoint on her wrist and then
turned it over to kiss the back of it. It was like that day in Azkaban when he kissed her face.
Once he started, he couldn’t seem to stop. He kissed each knuckle and then the pad of each
finger, and then her palm one last time before opening his eyes and staring down to find her
watching him with huge eyes.
“I hope I’m interesting, at the very least,” he whispered.
She said nothing but just nodded slowly as she laced his fingers in hers and then moved their
hands to her face.
Draco looked down at her and gathered every bit of courage he had. This was it. This was a
moment he could catch.
He leaned down slowly, cautiously, and she didn’t pull away. And then her breath was on his
face as his nose nudged hers to the side, and his lips finally connected with hers again after
weeks of being apart.
Her lips were so soft, and Draco felt his head swim as his magic practically sighed in relief to
have his lips on hers. Like the first time they kissed it was slow and chaste at first. But
unlike their kiss in Azkaban, they weren’t on any borrowed time here. Nobody would be
disturbing them.
The realization made Draco’s heart race as he disentangled his hand from Granger’s and
cupped her face all on his own. He felt her hand move forward to grip his shirt, as though
trying to pull him closer.
And then, as though they had the same idea at precisely the same time their mouths opened,
and Draco’s tongue flicked out to taste her.
Years of coldness fell away as their kiss deepened, and tongues explored each other. He
hadn’t snogged a witch since his final year of Hogwarts, but he was certain it had never been
quite like this. She was both soft and strong, supple and firm. It made his head swim as he
lost himself in this kiss.
She started to pull back ever so slightly, and he chased her, demanding more, his own
feelings and his magic inexorably entwined for the first time so that he didn’t know where
one stopped and the other began. She allowed it for a moment before she moved her head,
and now Draco’s lips were grazing the corner of her mouth and heading toward her neck.
Draco must have kissed other necks before, but he could scarcely remember doing it.
Granger’s neck, however, was calling to him like a siren, that pulse point he had stared at all
week fluttering. He kissed lightly at first and then harder, and then instinct took over and he
licked her there too. His brain was being flooded with pheromones and marital magic that
begged him to suck.
Mark her. Claim her.
For once he couldn’t resist the prompts from the magic, and he did precisely that.
The sound she made when he started to suction her neck was somewhere between a gasp and
a groan, and it went straight to Draco’s cock. He was clutching at her, his hand moving down
her side, desperate for more as she arched toward him. But the moment he released her neck
to move to a different part of her she pulled back, breathing hard as she stared at him in
shock.
Her eyes were dark, her hair mussed, and her lips were swollen. Her tongue darted out to lick
her lower lip, and Draco’s eyes automatically tracked it. He wondered if he looked as
desperate as he felt. He was hard, his magic was demanding more, and she had never looked
this shaggable, not even when he remembered her with all of her curves intact. But
something on her face made him pause, and then she leaned forward and gave him one more,
very chaste kiss. It was lovely, but effectively halted his progress.
Draco forced his face to stay passive as she turned her back to him and nestled against him
like normal. Draco tried to adjust his hips away so she wouldn’t feel just how eager he was
for her. She was pressing pause, and Draco would accept it. It certainly wasn’t ideal, when
all he wanted at this moment was to be buried into her body, but he forced himself to look at
it rationally. They had been married not even a week, and he finally kissed her – no, snogged
her – and she enjoyed it. He was sure of it. Perhaps she was still working out her feelings
about their marriage. Maybe she was just the type who needed several rounds to build up to
more. Whatever the explanation, Draco wouldn’t push her, not yet.
Still, as she settled against him, Draco couldn’t resist dropping a kiss on the top of her head
and then another light one against her ear as he whispered, “We’ll go together tomorrow.”
She nodded and didn’t pull away as Draco gave her several more light kisses on her hair and
cheek before closing his eyes.
He had done it. He had finally kissed his wife.
Chapter 14: A Prudent Visit.
7 December 2003.
Draco was clutching Granger’s hand as she apparated them to a slightly unkempt front yard
with a tall, but narrow house that appeared to be leaning precariously to one side. She was
clearly nervous, anxiety rolling off of her in waves. She had put on a brave face when they
woke up that morning, even lingering in bed a bit as Draco brushed the bare skin of her
stomach where her top had ridden up at night. She didn’t kiss him again, but she didn’t
appear to mind his wandering touch either, as he traced circles on her abdomen.
At breakfast she had been determinedly chatty with his mother, in stark contrast to the night
before. But then she grew increasingly quiet and lines developed around her mouth as the
morning wore on and the time for lunch approached.
Now she was here, clinging to him like a lifeline. Draco gave her an encouraging little
squeeze, as they stepped forward and crossed the wards.
Immediately a caterwauling charm went off, and Granger stiffened in surprise.
The front door to the home flew open, and a round, squat witch with red flyaway hair
streaked with gray came marching out, her wand in the pocket of an enormous apron. Behind
her trailed an older man whom Draco vaguely recognized as Arthur Weasley, George
Weasley with his distinctive gold ear, an older Weasley with a scarred face Draco didn’t
immediately recognize, and both Potters. He heard the shout of small children spilling from
the house before the door slammed and cut it off.
Molly Weasley was leading the charge, and she was glowering while she did it.
This was the witch who had killed Bellatrix Lestrange, and for a split second Draco thought
she might want to do the same thing to Granger. Instinctively he stepped in front of her.
“Mrs. Weasley,” he said smoothly, relying on manners to get them through this. “Granger
tells me that Sunday lunch at the Burrow is a weekly tradition.”
The witch’s eyes flashed, and she drew her wand on Draco, which caused both Potters to
scramble forward.
“Mum!” cried Ginny, while Harry drew his too.
“Don’t ‘mum’ me!” said the witch. “These two… THESE TWO!”
“Molly, we were just –” came Granger’s voice from behind Draco, and he was alarmed by
how small she sounded.
“You were just what! Leaving my Ronnie to rot in Azkaban like a common criminal? After
you led him on for years and then jilted him at his own wedding? At my only daughter’s
wedding?”
“Mum, I told you it’s fine,” said Ginny in a long-suffering voice.
“It is not fine!” screeched Molly. “Your brother is in Azkaban because –”
“His wife refuses to consummate their marriage,” interrupted Draco.
There was a deadly silence as the witch glared at him. “You have no idea what –”
“I do,” said Draco calmly. “I know precisely what happened. Ronald played a game with my
father and Minister Shacklebolt and lost. While he did it he failed to communicate his plans
to his wife, and now she’s decided she is more comfortable in prison than the marriage bed.
Granger has nothing to do with it.”
The witch snorted in disbelief. “Oh please. None of this would have happened if she hadn’t
run!”
“Molly,” said Granger, now stepping aside. “I’m sorry I didn’t work out my feelings about
Ron until the last moment. Truly, I know I should have backed out before jilting him, but I
wasn’t certain until I was about to walk down the aisle. I swear I never meant to ruin the
wedding day. But I realized I don’t have those feelings for him, and I would rather be in
Azkaban than married to somebody chosen for me – regardless of who does the choosing.”
“But you’re not in Azkaban any longer are you?” she said nastily. “My Ronnie is there
instead!”
“Because he forced the issue!” cried Granger. “I would still be there if the Ministry hadn’t
passed the amendment!”
“And yet you chose a Death Eater instead of my son!” cried Molly. “You chose him – some
man you barely know who did nothing but torment you for years instead of the young man
who has loved you since you were children! The young man whose family practically raised
you!”
Granger was clutching his hand so hard he wondered how his fingers weren’t breaking. He
could feel her shaking, whether with embarrassment or rage he couldn’t be certain. The
others around them were looking deeply uncomfortable, clearly in private agreement with
Molly Weasley but not willing to verbalize it in quite the same way.
“I chose Draco because he asked me to,” said Granger in a quivering voice. “Ron has…
never really asked when he’s wanted something from me. Over and over again he’s assumed
I would be there, and he just took things from me without checking to see if I was
comfortable first. At least Draco asked me to marry him! Ron has never proposed – not
even when we were engaged! You were the one who just told us we would marry each
other!”
Draco blinked and stared down at his wife in slight disbelief that it had happened that way.
At least Draco had put forth the minimum effort to propose to Astoria. And her words hinted
at something else: constant pressure for a physical relationship that she didn’t really want.
Draco doubted Weasley ever gotten to the point of actually assaulting her – Granger would
surely have cut him out of her life if he had done that – but had Weasley ever started slow
and gauged her reactions while he built up to more? Had he ever checked in with her while
they were together to see if he was crossing any lines? Had he ever felt her pull away and
then not let her do it?
Thinking back to their brief encounters, Draco was realizing he hadn’t behaved perfectly
either. He had started slow and checked in with her once or twice. But the previous night he
chased her a little when she started to pull away. He marked her without asking her first.
And listening to her now, he was ashamed of it. He wouldn’t be somebody who took. She
didn’t owe him a damn thing, and marriage or not he knew he had no right to her body.
“HE EARNED IT!” screeched Molly. “YOU MADE HIM BELIEVE FOR YEARS THAT
YOU WERE HIS! HE NEVER LOOKED AT ANOTHER WOMAN BECAUSE OF YOU!”
Granger was shaking harder than ever, and Draco’s mood was quickly turning dark.
She took a shuddering breath. “I can see we aren’t welcome. I’ll leave you in peace then.”
“GOOD!” shouted Molly. “GO! GO LIVE YOUR LIFE WITH A DEATH EATER THEN!
YOU SELFISH, SELFISH GIRL! FIRST YOUR PARENTS AND NOW –”
“MOLLY!” shouted Potter and Arthur at the same time.
Draco felt his own rage building, but his full attention was pulled to Granger, who gave a
small sob and then released his hand to apparate away on the spot. Draco was left standing
there alone, and the moment she was gone he rounded on Molly Weasley.
“Now you listen here,” he snarled. “Whatever claim you think your son has on my wife is
utter shite. She is a living, breathing marvel, and she was given an impossible choice in large
part thanks to him. I want to be very clear about something: he is not entitled to her. She
does not owe him a fucking thing, especially not after he betrayed her like this. He met with
my father and Shacklebolt behind her back and never informed her he was doing it. And if
he had been successful he would only have thirty days to consummate with her. Please, take
a moment and think about what he would have had to do to her to get her to cooperate given
that she would rather go to Azkaban than consummate a marriage with him in the first
place!”
The entire group was shocked into silence, and Molly’s mouth started to open and close as
though she couldn’t find words.
Draco stepped back, breathing hard.
“You all can hate me all you want, I truly don’t give a shit. But believe it or not, this Death
Eater actually cares about his wife. I will not allow you to hurt her any longer. Stay away
from her until you’re ready to be reasonable and recognize that the person who has been
wronged in all of this is her. Your son is in Azkaban because he fucked around with a shitty
law in an effort to trap Granger into an unwanted marriage with him. It didn’t work, and
surprise surprise! His actual wife isn’t too happy about it either. He only has himself to
blame. If he had just stayed out of it and shagged Prudence when he had the chance we’d all
be eating lunch together at this very moment.”
He cast one last, disgusted look at them all, though the look he gave to Potter wasn’t quite as
hostile. Potter stepped forward.
“Malfoy, let me go see her.”
“Not yet,” said Draco shortly. “Not until she’s calmed down. It’s not like you can touch her
anyway – the Malfoy marital magic won’t allow it. I’m the only one who can do that. I’ll
tell her to owl you when she’s ready to talk.”
“Me too please,” said Ginny softly.
Molly was looking mutinous, but also disturbed. Draco just gave a curt nod to Ginny and
turned to leave. As he was about to apparate away, he heard Ginny say, “Mum you crossed a
huge line.”
An imperfect defense, but better than nothing, he thought. He would tell Granger the Potters
seemed to be on her side as soon as he could find her. It was time to fulfill his husbandly
duties and comfort his distraught wife.

It took Draco nearly twenty minutes to locate Granger in a spare bedroom, door locked and
sobbing. He tried to get in, but the bloody witch had warded him out, and she refused to
answer when he knocked or called for her.
Not knowing what else to do, he called for Patsy and told her to keep Granger company and
to make sure she had anything she needed. He had never encountered so much heartbreak,
and he didn’t know what else to do. Maybe she was the type who needed to be alone for a
couple hours before accepting comfort. He decided to give her some time to herself and try
again before dinner.
When he knocked a few hours later, she still wouldn’t answer, and Patsy reported that
Mistress had cried herself to sleep. Draco sighed, but just nodded. He couldn’t blame her for
needing some rest after that encounter, and he wouldn’t disturb her. But he instructed Patsy
to bring dinner to her the moment she woke and to ensure Granger ate every bite. He would
give her space if she needed it, but he wouldn’t let her go off of food. The week of real meals
had already been transformative, and she no longer looked emaciated. But she was still far
too thin.
He didn’t see her at all that evening, and when bedtime rolled around he was starting to get
worried.
“Patsy!” he called.
Patsy appeared with a CRACK!
“Yes Master?”
“Is Granger alright? I would have thought she would let me see her by now. She prefers to
sleep with me.”
Patsy twisted her tea towel a bit uncomfortably. “Mistress is asking Patsy to bring her some
things so she can sleep in the other room, Sir. I think she is wanting to be alone.”
Draco’s heart stuttered, not at all prepared to give up sleeping with Granger now that they had
been doing it for a week. But he just swallowed and nodded once, knowing that he had no
choice but to accept it. After that disaster at the Burrow he told himself he wouldn’t be like
Weasley. He wouldn’t just take. He wouldn’t act entitled to anything when it came to
Granger. He was damned lucky she had married him at all, and if she wanted to sleep alone
he would let her. As much as Lucius might dislike her, Draco had never believed she was in
any real danger by sleeping alone. Perhaps she had come to the same conclusion after living
there for a week.
He sighed and prepared for bed, feeling her absence more keenly than he thought possible.
Just one week and already she was under his skin and habits had formed. It was like a
phantom limb missing her at night, and his magic protested vehemently. It wanted his wife in
bed with him. Draco wanted his wife in bed with him. But it was no use, and Draco
eventually fell into a light, fitful sleep.

16 December 2003
Granger was avoiding him.
For the past week and a half she had reverted to a version of herself that could only be
described as cooly professional. She joined Draco and his parents for breakfast the day after
the Weasley fiasco with her mask in place. She no longer seemed to be upset. She didn’t
seem to be feeling much of anything. Draco idly wondered if she was occluding.
Her voice never wavered, as she generally ignored his father and made small talk with his
mother, her manners for once exceptional. Draco was certain now that Andromeda had been
telling the truth, and Granger had simply been fucking with his parents at the beginning when
she pretended like she didn’t know how to behave. The Granger he saw now was flawless.
She always ate quickly and left without telling any of them where she was going. She only
reappeared in the evening just in time for dinner, where she adeptly steered the conversation
away from anything about herself. Then she disappeared into the same room she had slept in
ever since the fight at the Weasleys, barely sparing Draco a glance.
It was excruciating, and Draco felt his magic wilt at her obvious intent to stay away from
him.
This she had done for an entire week, her newfound veneer only cracking when Andromeda
and Teddy showed up for another visit. Granger appeared to be genuinely fond of Teddy, and
Draco made a point to sit in on their lessons, as he listened to her regale the small boy with
stories of his parents and, to Draco’s slight surprise, “Uncle Harry’s” parents too. Who knew
that James Potter and Sirius Black had been best friends with each other along with a
werewolf? His mother had never spoken of her cousins very much, but it did explain any
number of things – for instance, why Harry Potter had inherited the ancestral Black family
home and why Teddy Lupin was his godson.
After Teddy and Andromeda left, however, Granger reverted to her new, detached self. She
was practically morose on Sunday, though again Draco only caught glimpses of her around
the Manor, and then she was back to disappearing again on Monday. Draco had assumed she
was going to Hogwarts and perhaps that was partially true – but when she returned Monday
evening he happened to be in the foyer when she arrived and discovered her coming through
the front door and not the floo. She was utterly bedraggled, as though she had been caught in
the sleet that was coming down in sheets outside.
“What on earth happened to you?” he demanded.
“I was outside,” she supplied unhelpfully.
“Why?”
She gave him an annoyed look. “Because I was coming back from Azkaban.”
“Azkaban!” asked Draco in shock. Surely she wasn’t visiting Weasley?
“Yes, to see Prudence,” she said, as she shook off her cloak and then swept past him to head
to her new room.
Draco was so surprised, he was frozen in place while he processed this. Before he could
think to ask her anything else, she was gone.
She didn’t appear for dinner that night, and at breakfast the next morning she was largely
silent as the post was delivered. She read The Daily Prophet quietly, as Draco looked
sideways at a small envelope that had been addressed to her, with a return address in
Hampstead Garden Suburb. He frowned. It looked to be a muggle address. She seemed to
sense him staring at it, however, because she slipped it into her pocket and cast a fierce look
at him that told him he wasn’t supposed to ask. Draco didn’t press her about it because he
suspected he already knew who lived there.
He just sighed and ate in silence as he waited for her to disappear yet again, and sure enough
it wasn’t long before she was sweeping out of the room to go do whatever it was she was
doing all day without Draco.
He pushed his eggs around moodily with his fork.
“What on earth have you done, Draco?” his mother finally asked.
Draco shrugged. “I don’t know. I went with her to see the Weasleys a couple Sundays ago,
and it went horribly. She’s barely spoken to me since.”
“You didn’t do anything, did you?”
“I threatened them a little, but only after she was gone. No, I think she’s second guessing
everything.”
Lucius perked up at this, and Draco scowled at him.
“Don’t, Father. I still want her very much. She’s just sorting her own feelings.”
Narcissa opened her mouth to speak, but Draco couldn’t stand to listen to his parents question
him about it any further. He shoved his chair back from the table.
“I’m going out,” he said curtly, and he strode out of the breakfast room and into the foyer,
where he left through the front door toward the apparition point. He wasn’t sure why he was
doing this, other than the fact that he wanted to get to the bottom of whatever was going on in
Granger’s mind, and she seemed very reluctant to share it with him directly.
He made it to the apparition point and turned with a CRACK! soon appearing at the familiar
dock. The air was colder than the last time he had been here. Winter was fully setting in, and
Draco cast a warming charm as he climbed into one of the small boats and launched off.
Twenty minutes later he found himself staring at the door to Azkaban once again, and he
raised his hand to knock. He wasn’t terribly surprised to find Maywood on duty at the front,
though Maywood seemed surprised to see Draco there.
“Mr. Malfoy, it’s been too long,” he grinned as he let him in.
“I hope everything worked out well for you after our last encounter?” asked Draco.
Maywood waved him off. “The boss wasn’t happy, I can tell you that much, but I took your
advice and followed protocol strictly. There wasn’t anything he could do about it without
exposing his own little racket.”
Draco nodded in satisfaction. He had hoped that was the case.
“Well I’m here to see Prudence Weasley,” said Draco. “If she’ll allow it, of course.”
The guard raised an eyebrow. “Just like your wife then.”
“Pardon?” asked Draco in what he hoped was a casual voice.
Maywood snorted. “Your wife. She’s been visiting Mrs. Weasley every day for the last week
and a bit.”
Draco blinked, feeling both surprised and foolish.
“Well Prudence is an old friend of mine,” he said carefully.
Maywood gave him a knowing look, but said nothing more as he went back to check on
Prudence. To Draco’s relief she consented to the visit, and soon Draco found himself back in
the small room where he got married.
“I said my vows here,” he muttered, as he walked in to find Prudence already sitting at the
table.
“Draco,” she said cordially, though there was some frostiness in her tone.
“Prudence,” he said. “I hate to see you like this.”
She gave an inelegant snort. “Yes, well, between your father, my husband, and my best
friend it seems that most everyone forgot about me.”
There was an awkward pause as Draco absorbed this. It was true he had hardly spared
Prudence a second thought when making his plan to marry Granger. He didn’t think about
what would happen to her if Draco successfully intervened.
“I heard my wife’s been by to visit,” he said in an effort to switch the subject.
Prudence raised an eyebrow. “Yes. I’ll admit I was not keen to see her the first time, but I’m
afraid my curiosity got the better of me.”
“And?”
Prudence sighed. “And I wish I could hate her, but I don’t. It’s not her fault Ron did what he
did.”
“And how is he?” asked Draco carefully. “I haven’t heard.”
Prudence rolled her eyes.
“Trying to find out if your wife has been visiting him? She’s not. I get his reports, and he
gets mine.”
Draco exhaled with relief. He wasn’t exactly proud of it, but he had to acknowledge that was
one reason he came.
“I’m not a fan of Weasley’s,” said Draco. “He hurt Granger.”
“And me,” pointed out Prudence. “He really hurt me.”
Draco gave her a sympathetic look. She appeared troubled.
“You really had no idea then?” he asked.
She shook her head. “No. None. In fact… we were getting along. He was kind to me. He
said he wanted to take things slow, and I appreciated that. It was all rather new for me of
course, but he seemed to be making an effort to make the marriage work. I actually…”
“You actually what?”
“I fell for him,” admitted Prudence.
Draco stared at her in slight disbelief. Prudence caught his expression and scowled.
“Don’t look at me like that Draco, I did. And Merlin help me, but I thought I had actually
gotten luckier than Astoria for once. She was always so confident in her match with you.
Not that she cared about you very much…”
Draco snorted in agreement.
“...but she never worried about finding her person because she had you. Then you jilted her –
I still have very mixed feelings about that by the way – and suddenly we were on the same
page. Of course, my name got called and hers didn’t, and for a while I thought she was the
lucky one again. She had lost you, but she still had her freedom to find somebody else and
Merlin knows Beatrice is relentless when it comes to that sort of thing. But after a few weeks
I realized Ron was funny and was trying hard to be kind. His family did what they could to
embrace me. I knew I wasn’t Hermione, but the fact that she jilted him made several of the
Weasleys very angry. It opened a door to give me an in. After a couple months I was
smitten, and I thought that luck had turned in my favor for once. No, I hadn’t picked my
husband, but I really liked who had been chosen for me. I thought I could even fall in love
with him, which was more than I ever dreamed to have.”
“Prudence,” sighed Draco.
She grimaced. “I know. Believe me, I know. It was stupid of me. Then he went behind my
back to get Hermione anyway. It broke my heart.”
“That’s why you’re still here then,” said Draco.
“No, I’m still here because the law is terrible, and Hermione was inspirational. I wanted to
hate her, but I couldn’t. She told me she’s never felt that strongly for Ron, and she thinks he
never felt that strongly for her either. She was just the comfortable choice, the easy choice.
That and there is so much history there that he felt the need to save her from you in some
misguided way. She was actually shocked to hear that he seemed to try for me, at least at the
beginning. She says he never really did that for her.”
Draco frowned. He had to admit that it was out of character for Weasley to try to adapt. If he
really had then perhaps hope wasn’t lost for Prudence.
“If you really want him Prudence…”
“I do, but not like this,” she insisted. “That’s what Hermione and I have been talking about
for the last week – her history with Ron, and the ironic fact that she and I have found
ourselves with an identical problem.”
“Which is what?”
“Wanting our husbands, even though we shouldn’t.”
Draco’s heart seized. “She wants me?” he said carefully. At one point he thought she must,
but her behavior since that disastrous meeting at the Weasleys had shaken his selfconfidence. He had never met somebody who could swing between hot and cold like
Granger.
Prudence laughed a little. “She does. Very much. And it’s messing with that enormous head
of hers. She told me about the meeting with the Weasleys and the things Molly said.”
“It was cruel,” said Draco.
“I agree,” said Prudence, “but not entirely wrong either. You were a Death Eater, and your
parents hate the kind of people Hermione represents. By all rights, Hermione shouldn’t want
you. She should want Ron and the security his family could give her. It’s confusing for her.
Plus that dig about her parents…”
“She told you about that?”
“Of course. I’ve spent hours talking to her this past week.”
“Molly shouldn’t have mentioned their obliviation,” said Draco hotly. “That was way out of
line.”
“Oh I don’t think that’s what Molly was referencing,” said Prudence.
Draco looked at her in confusion.
“No, Molly was referring to the fact that Hermione never told her parents she was marrying
Ron. And she also hasn’t told them that she went to prison and then married you instead.
She feels exceptionally guilty about it, but she doesn’t know how to bridge that gap with
them after so much has happened. Apparently her failure to confess her engagement to Ron
was a sore point between her and Molly for months. The family was split about it. Some of
the Weasleys and Harry supported Hermione’s silence about it, but some of the other
Weasleys didn’t. They felt it was dismissive of their family – like she was in denial about her
impending marriage because she couldn’t be honest with her parents about it.”
Draco just stared at Prudence. He had no idea.
“She wants them to know though?” he asked slowly. “Everything?”
Prudence nodded. “Yes, but her parents really resent Ron and Harry. She told me they resent
most wizards. The few times she has interacted with them since the war was over, she has
pretended the wizarding world doesn’t exist and underplayed her own role in the Dark Lord’s
defeat. But they’re her parents, Draco. She loves them and wants them in her life. How is
she supposed to tell them about her failed engagement to Ron? And now she’s supposed to
tell them that not only did she marry a different wizard three months after her engagement fell
apart, but she married a former Death Eater whose agenda was the entire reason she
obliviated them in the first place? She told me she’s always held out hope that they would be
able to patch things up eventually, but I think Molly’s comment reminded her of just how
much she hasn’t told them. She doesn’t think she will ever have them in her life now.”
Draco’s stomach sank as he realized Prudence was probably correct.
“And as for me,” added Prudence bitterly, “how am I supposed to work it out with a husband
who went behind my back like that? I understand why he wanted to save Hermione. She’s
exceptional, and they were the closest of friends. But she rejected him at their wedding, and
he still couldn’t let it go. Whether he really wants her romantically or not is a bit of an open
question, but it appears that he never imagined anything else because she has been such a
fixture in his life since they were children. Regardless of his motives, he betrayed me just as
much as he betrayed her. Between that and the fact that my being here is continuing to
highlight just how lousy the MLPP is, I’m not inclined to shag him any time soon. It doesn’t
keep me from wanting him though, even though I shouldn’t.”
Draco gave her a sympathetic look. “This is a damned mess.”
“It is,” she agreed. “It’s all an enormous tangle with far too many hurt feelings and
competing desires. Hermione wants you, but she also wants her parents. She wants to be
friends with Ron and his family again, but she wants some retribution for what he did and the
things Mrs. Weasley said. I would like to shag Ron’s brains out, but then Shacklebolt wins,
and Hermione and I both agree that is the one thing that can’t happen. And most of all, I
want to be able to enjoy a Sunday lunch at the Burrow with my husband, his family, and my
new friend Hermione and her husband Draco – whom I always liked much more than Astoria
did, by the way. Ideally that Sunday lunch would happen after the MLPP has been repealed.”
She gave him a kind smile at this, and Draco smiled back. He had always liked Prudence
too, and it occurred to him that this was probably the longest conversation he had ever had
with her. Most of their encounters over the years had involved Astoria as well.
“It sounds like a pipe dream doesn’t it?” he acknowledged.
“Yes,” she sighed. “And I truly don’t know what should be done to get us to that point.”
“The MLPP is where we begin,” said Draco slowly. “That and some groveling too. I assume
Weasley has groveled?”
“Extensively,” she confirmed, her eyes twinkling.
“Well that’s a start,” said Draco. “But don’t let him get off too easily.”
“Oh I won’t,” said Prudence firmly. “There’s a long way to go before I trust him again.”
Draco rose and Prudence did too.
“Hang in there, Pru,” he said. “I’ll come by to visit again, unless you take pity on Weasley
and jump him during your next conjugal.”
Prudence laughed lightly. “Thanks, Draco. You should assume I’ll be here at least until the
new year, if not longer – I plan to keep him hanging.”
“And he hasn’t… forced himself on you in any way?” asked Draco carefully. “During a
conjugal, I mean. I assume he can request one with you.”
She looked at him askance. “Of course not. Ron would never do that.”
Draco narrowed his eyes. “He told Shacklebolt he would do whatever it took to make sure
Granger consummated with him in the time limit if he married her.”
Prudence frowned. “Perhaps he said that, but I really don’t think he would force a woman to
have sex with him. Coax and cajole… sure. But force? No, he’s not capable of that, Draco.
He would have done it to me already if that were true. He hates it here, even more than I do.
I’m sure he just meant that he would try his best to convince her and would say anything or
promise anything to get it done.”
Draco felt a squirm of guilt, as he remembered the thing he had said to the Weasleys about
him. It wasn’t false exactly, but it implied he would commit certain acts Prudence believed
him incapable of performing.
What a fucking mess.
It was. The whole thing was an enormous mess, and Draco scarcely knew how to begin
cleaning it up. He knew he had to try though, because he would never have his wife the way
he wanted her if things continued to be this broken.
Draco smiled tightly at Prudence as he turned to leave, nodding at the guard who had been in
the room silently the whole time. By the time he left the prison and made it to the small dock
on the other side, Draco was nearly frozen but scarcely noticed due to the thoughts swirling
in his head. Things were bad. Things were messy. Things were decidedly not right.
Draco apparated back to the Manor and shut himself in his room. He sat down at his desk
and began to craft a plan to fix it.
Chapter 15: To Woo A Wife.
Several hours later.
Draco stared down at the words scribbled on his piece of parchment. Prudence’s insistence
that Granger wanted him had given Draco hope again, but he knew she was fighting herself
about it. And she was stubborn — very stubborn — so Draco determined he had to win her
over.
What was the appropriate word for this? Wooing? Seduction? Enticement? Temptation?
He wasn’t certain, but he knew he could no longer sit back and let Granger’s stubbornness
and hyper-rational tendencies drive their relationship. She would never make the first move
if things continued like this, and that meant Draco would be waiting forever if he didn’t do
something. Nailing down that something, however, posed a bit of a challenge.
Draco was still committed to his earlier decision not to take. He also had no great urge to
cajole. While it was true he had asked her to marry him repeatedly, Draco really wanted his
wife to come to him. Besides, now that he knew Weasley had done that to her for years, it
rather put him off of that tactic for future efforts. Draco was a Malfoy and should be
naturally better at this sort of thing than a Weasley, after all.
No, Draco wouldn’t take or cajole. He would woo. He would convince that beautiful mind
of hers that he was good for her, despite their history and family issues. He would draw her
back to him so he could kiss those lips and neck and tits and…
Just find her and fuck her you imbecile.
Draco shoved his magic away. It had become more ornery since Granger put up her walls.
Draco doubled down on his plan to make Granger come to him, and knew he would have to
be intentional and methodical. He could do this. He just had to figure out what to do.
His first order of business was organizing his thoughts, so he started by making a list of
things he knew she did and didn’t like.
Likes
That mad cat of hers
Books
Snuggles (maybe?)
Winning
Steak
Fucking with my parents
Disney movies
Teddy & Aunt Andy
Politics
Potter(s)
Smoked salmon
Dislikes
My parents
The MLPP
Bigots
Weasleys (temporary)
Shacklebolt and the Wizengamot (likely permanent)
Relationship with her parents
When I turn into a caveman (possibly neutral?)
Health checks
Azkaban
The fact that she’s attracted to me
Draco frowned as he stared down at the lists. He’d been seeing her frequently for more than
three months and married for more than two weeks, and this was all he could come up with.
Shouldn’t a husband know his wife’s favorite flower or her favorite color or whether she
prefers Belgian to Swiss chocolate for her monthlies (Draco was no longer certain if Pansy’s
preferences were universal)? How had he failed to learn these things?
He narrowed his eyes as he read over them again and decided that he had to find some way to
move the relationship with her parents and the fact that she was attracted to Draco from the
‘dislike’ to the ‘like’ list. Those were the things that were critical if he was going to be
allowed to sleep with her and touch her again, beyond the Ministry-imposed minimums.
Draco also hoped he could find a way to move his parents from ‘dislike’ to ‘like,’ because he
sensed this was the key to long-term domestic bliss given their living arrangements. He
wrinkled his nose and concluded the Weasleys would probably need to move too since they
had the capacity to hurt her, and she would be Angry Granger until that issue was resolved.
But Draco privately assigned them the lowest priority because he himself was still very angry
with the lot of them too.
Ginny was a Potter now and no longer counted as a Weasley of course. Granger still had a
couple of friends from her old life, and Draco sighed as he realized he might need to lean on
that a little. He and Potter were capable of behaving around each other. They had proven
that already. And perhaps if she saw that Draco was making an effort with her friends her
brain would rewire itself a little and become less resistant to him. In any event, he needed
Potter at least one more time to help with a certain Project he had in mind…
He grabbed a piece of parchment and jotted a note off to Potter before he could second guess
himself and sent it off with his owl.
Then he scanned the list of ‘likes’ again, and his eyes landed on two other things he could
work with while he waited for Potter to respond. He called an elf and requested some
preparations, and then he went hunting for the creature that could truly make or break his
marriage with Granger.
Draco found the beast performing what could only be described as barrel rolls across his
father’s prized Persian rug in the study. With each rotation he left behind a trail of thick,
orange hair that he then turned and walked across several times to grind it into the rug.
Draco allowed him to complete his chores before drawing his attention.
“Beast,” he said.
The animal gave him an unimpressed look.
“I have come to propose a truce. Nay, an alliance.”
The beast studied him and cocked his head at this suggestion. Draco took this as an
invitation to continue. He snapped his fingers and an elf immediately arrived with several
plates that he placed in front of the beast.
“Let’s see what we have here. This is a perfect foie gras made from goose liver of course.
Then a beautifully marbled cut of Kobe beef. Here is our Atlantic bluefin tuna. Over there is
our pule cheese, which I’m sure you know comes from the milk of Balkan donkeys. Then we
have brownlip abalone harvested from Australia, and finally some almas caviar from an
albino sturgeon.”
The beast approached and surveyed Draco’s offerings.
“I will call you by your name, provide you with a collar befitting your position in this
household, give you access to my father’s bedroom and closet, and feed you any of these
delicacies once a day provided you do two things for me in return.”
The beast met his eye as if to say, do go on.
“First, I want you to show affection toward me in front of Granger. And second, I want you
to sleep in my room.”
The beast stared at him, narrowed its eyes, and then meowed.
Draco started to smile slowly. It was just as he suspected: this animal wasn’t a Granger, not
really. It was a Malfoy. And that meant it could be corrupted. He sat back on his heels and
gestured toward the offerings.
“Well then, Crookshanks,” he said cordially. “Please make your selection.”

Draco bided his time until dinner that evening, where he made sure to arrive early.
As soon as his wife walked in, he rose and moved swiftly toward her chair to help her into it.
She blinked in surprise, but lowered herself into it. He dropped a kiss on top of her head and
then moved to his own chair.
“How was your day darling?” he asked, totally ignoring both of his parents whose mouths
were hanging open.
Her cheeks were pink at the sudden attention, but she seemed to focus on him for the first
time since that disaster at the Weasley’s.
“Productive. I spent some time at Hogwarts and visited Prudence again.”
Draco hummed at this. “I saw her this morning myself,” he said. “She mentioned she has
become rather fond of you.”
Granger narrowed her eyes at this. “Did you now?”
“Yes, of course. She’s an old friend. I always liked her more than Astoria.”
Lucius choked at this, and Granger’s mouth twitched. For the first time in days the twinkle
of mirth lit her eyes, and Draco relished seeing it.
This is what I should have been doing for the last week instead of sitting silently by and
letting her put up walls.
Granger’s voice was warmer as they chatted about Prudence and the next article she would be
publishing in The Daily Prophet.
“She has a true flair for it,” said Granger. “Once she’s out of Azkaban she said she may try to
work for The Prophet. Other than the very poor living conditions, she’s rather enjoying
herself in Azkaban.”
It was the most animated Draco had seen her since that terrible afternoon, and his parents
were largely silent as they watched Draco engage her. A glance at his father told Draco that
Lucius was watching the play by play, as though wondering if the rules of the game had
changed yet again. Narcissa, however, looked oddly approving.
Before long dinner was served, and Granger raised one eyebrow when she saw what Draco
had selected: it was steak of course, but hers had a lobster tail on top while the others were
bare.
“Let’s try this again,” said Draco. “It’s been a few weeks now.”
“And why does she get lobster?” sniffed Lucius, as he looked at his own plate askance.
“Because I like her more than I like you,” said Draco without missing a beat. “Start
behaving, and I’ll tell the elves you can have some too.”
He glanced at Granger as he said it, and she turned crimson but nearly cracked a laugh while
Lucius scowled. Draco just gave her a conspiratorial smile.
“Go on, darling. Let’s see if you can eat it. Small bites until we know.”
Granger took a deep breath but then nodded and tucked in, slowly but surely working her
way through the meal. By the time she was finished, the others had completed their own
meals too, and Draco studied her as he watched her reach the end. Again, her manners were
flawless, and he could see from her face that she was savoring her food. She glanced at him,
and though she was still a little guarded her expression warmed. Draco thought he might be
chipping away at those walls by reminding her of their wedding night.
“That was delicious, thank you,” she said.
Draco gave her a slow smile. “I’ve ordered the elves to prepare it twice a week until you tell
me to stop.”
She gave him an exasperated look, which he relished.
“Malfoy, that will —”
“Bring you back,” he said softly, as he reached for her hand and raised it to kiss the back of
it. As he lowered it, he allowed his eyes to rove over her and for once he didn’t try to hide
his interest. He didn’t care that his parents were watching. He wanted her to see how badly
he craved her.
“I can’t wait to have you back,” he added. “You know I take my Projects seriously.”
She blushed at this, but he thought she looked pleased as her eyes dropped to her empty plate,
and she just nodded slightly.
Draco shot his father a challenging look as they all rose, silently telling him to keep any
snarky comments to himself.
“I’m going to spend some time in my room,” Hermione then said.
Draco just nodded cordially and held the door for her, but internally he was eager to see if his
next trick would work. He made his own excuses and headed to his room to read for a couple
of hours, and sure enough as night was falling Crookshanks came sauntering in.
Draco smirked and fastened a collar around his neck, and then gestured toward a luxury cat
bed he had asked the elves to purchase that afternoon that was placed on Draco’s window
seat. Crookshanks hopped up to investigate and kneaded biscuits for several minutes as
though testing its plushness. Once satisfied, he turned in a circle and sank down with a
contented purr.
Draco himself prepared for bed too, and just as he was settling in, he heard a knock on his
door.
“Come in,” he called, trying to keep the eagerness out of his voice.
“Malfoy, have you seen –” started Granger as she opened the door. Then she came to a
complete halt as she stared at Crookshanks.
“Have I seen what?” he asked innocently.
She said nothing, but just looked at her familiar, a mixture of annoyance and confusion on her
face.
“What is this?” she finally asked, gesturing toward him.
“A cat bed,” said Draco. “I apologize it’s taken me so long to acquire one, but the Magical
Menagerie was out of their luxury line, and I had to wait for them to be restocked.”
This was not, of course, strictly the truth. But what was a little white lie if it got his wife to
share his bed again?
She gaped as she approached the cat. Only then did she seem to notice the thing around his
neck.
“Is that a diamond and emerald collar?” she gasped, as she spun around to look at Draco in
horror.
Again, Draco schooled his face into an innocent expression. “Of course, darling. Only the
best will do for our pet.”
“Our pet?”
“Well yes,” said Draco, now affecting some concern. “What kind of husband would I be if I
didn’t accept your familiar as my own? And he’s a very good boy, aren’t you Crooks?”
Crookshanks purred contentedly and blinked in confirmation.
“But… but…” she said weakly.
Draco ignored her and climbed out of bed to scratch the cat behind the ears. “Yes, he’s
certainly an excellent companion. It took us a few days to become acquainted, but now we’re
the best of friends, right Crooksy?”
The beast glared at him as if to say, you’re laying it on too thick, but he did raise his chin for
a scratch so Draco thought he probably got away with it.
Then he turned back to Granger.
“Now then… what were you looking for… Hermione?”
This was purely experimental on his part, but her jerk of shock told Draco he had struck
gold. Her head whipped up to look at him, her eyes huge. She was thrown totally off kilter,
and Draco could practically see her walls crumbling as she tried to make sense of all the
abrupt changes that had taken place that day.
Then she seemed to shake herself out of it. “I was looking for Crookshanks,” she said
cautiously. “I was about to head to bed.”
Draco gestured toward his own bed. “Me too.”
He didn’t invite her in, but he climbed in and watched her debate something with herself. To
his credit, Crookshanks was putting on a very good show of lazing comfortably in his brand
new cat bed, and he could tell Granger was reluctant to make him move. Then again, she
also didn’t want to leave him with Draco all alone.
“I… I guess I could sleep in here tonight?” she asked tentatively.
“Of course,” said Draco instantly, utterly thrilled that his scheme had worked.
Take her to your bed. Touch her. Cherish her.
He scooted to the middle, and soon Granger was joining him. Draco slipped an arm around
her waist and whispered, “Is this alright, Hermione?”
She hesitated for a moment, but then nodded, and Draco tightened his grip on her in
response. Slowly, he felt the tension drain out of her, and his magic seemed to sigh with
relief to have his wife back in his arms.
He was hesitant to press his luck, but he couldn’t help himself when he dropped a small kiss
near her ear. “And that?” he whispered.
Again, she nodded slowly, and Draco took the opportunity to pepper small kisses around the
shell of her ear and column of her neck.
“What’s all this then?” she asked a bit breathlessly.
“I told you downstairs. I want to bring my wife back.”
She said nothing to this, but she laced her fingers into his and settled against him more
securely. Draco thought – or maybe he just hoped – that she wanted to come back too.

20 December 2003
“This is the worst idea you’ve ever had,” said Potter and he and Draco stared at the handsome
muggle home.
Draco just snorted. He had a mission that required Harry Potter’s help. So here they were,
once again working together, though this time nobody was aware of it except for the two of
them.
“I have to try,” he said. “Most of it is my fault.”
Potter gave him a shrewd look. “That’s not really true.”
Draco shrugged. “I’m more at fault than anybody else in her life.”
Potter said. “Perhaps. Though I’m guilty of it too.”
Draco inclined his head. He suspected Potter felt this way, even if it wasn’t entirely fair. It
was precisely how Draco felt – guilt by association. And Draco wasn’t above leveraging
Potter’s insecurities if they helped Granger – no, Hermione.
The past few days had found Hermione in his bed each night, just as she was at the beginning
of their marriage. She was trying to resurrect her walls again, but Draco wasn’t letting her do
it. He flirted with her outrageously, lavished attention on her, and was picking his own fights
with his father in front of her simply to make a point that he chose her over him. Between his
new behavior and the alliance with Crookshanks, she couldn’t seem to stay away even if she
wanted to. He could see that she was both baffled and frustrated by it.
But Draco wanted to take it further than that. He wanted to convince her that she didn’t need
to try to put up walls at all. He may not deserve her – but then again, who did? And whether
he deserved her or not, he wanted her very much. The war and the years following it had
wrought many changes in him, but it had not burned out Draco’s sincere belief that he was as
good or better than most everybody else. He was still a Malfoy. So no, it didn't particularly
bother him that he didn't deserve Hermione because nobody else did either. That simply
evened the playing field, as far as he was concerned.
Draco just gestured toward Potter, and he grimaced as they approached the front door
together. Potter reached out to press a button, and Draco listened curiously as something that
sounded like a bell rang inside the house.
Several seconds later, the door opened, and Draco was staring at a woman who appeared to
be Hermione thirty years from now. She was attractive, with curly hair piled on top of her
head, dressed casually in muggle jeans and a jumper. She looked at the wizards
questioningly for a moment, before her eyes narrowed in on Potter, and she started to close
the door in their faces.
Draco shoved his foot in the door to stop her, and now she glared at him.
“Excuse me,” she hissed.
“Mrs. Granger, I was hoping to speak with you about something,” said Draco quickly.
“Potter is here to vouch for me.”
“Vouch for you? What on earth are you talking about? Who are you?”
“If we could come in for just a few minutes?” Draco asked hopefully. “It’s about Hermione.”
Mrs. Granger went pale, and Draco saw fear in her eyes as she looked at Potter again. Finally
she swallowed and nodded as she opened the door and gestured for them to come inside.
Draco’s stomach was in knots as he followed her into a surprisingly spacious and welldecorated sitting room. A man who must have been Hermione’s father stood and looked at
them both questioningly.
“Helen,” he said. “What is this?”
“They said it’s about Hermione.”
The man swallowed hard, and cast the same suspicious look at Potter, before nodding briefly
and lowering himself into a chair. Draco waited for Helen to sit as well before he did the
same thing.
“First,” said Draco, “I wish to apologize for ambushing you like this. I wasn’t raised by
muggles you see, and I wasn’t sure of the best way to get in touch with you.”
“Is Hermione alright?” asked Helen, ignoring Draco’s opening gesture.
Draco nodded quickly. “Yes, of course. She’s healthy… for the most part. But there are
some things that have happened over the last several months, and we… well, I… thought you
should be made aware of them.”
“Another war?” asked the man nervously. Potter had told Draco he was named David.
“No Sir, rather the opposite in fact… though it does relate to the war we had a few years
ago…”
“Malfoy, just spit it out,” said Potter in exasperation.
The Grangers glanced at Potter, and then at Draco.
“Malfoy?” asked Helen. “That name…”
Draco scowled at Potter who gave him an apologetic look.
“Yes, my name is Draco Malfoy,” he said quickly. “I went to school with Hermione. We
were… on opposite sides of the war.”
Both Grangers’ eyes were huge now, and they started to look fearful.
“Please,” said Draco, “just let me tell you the whole story, alright? I don’t mean any harm to
you or any other muggles, I swear it. That’s one reason why Potter is here.”
The Grangers were looking at him cautiously now, but they had fallen silent so Draco took a
deep breath and began.
“About eighteen months ago a law was passed in our world to encourage marriage and
procreation. You see, the war left our population decimated, and those of us who survived
and were of childbearing age were shell-shocked and not that keen to get married and have
children. The Ministry of Magic concluded that something had to be done, so they gave the
unmarried witches and wizards between the ages of twenty and forty a year to get married
themselves before they would be matched with somebody else. Hermione was engaged to
marry Ron Weasley at the end of August.”
The Grangers’ jaws dropped.
“She was going to marry Ron?” asked Helen. “But she never said…!”
“She was trying to get the law overturned,” said Potter, jumping in. “I’m not sure if you’re
aware, but Hermione worked for a think tank and was deeply involved in writing laws and
policy until very recently. She didn’t tell you about her engagement because she didn’t agree
with the law and thought the whole thing would become moot once the Wizengamot – that’s
our law-making body – got their heads on straight. She didn’t want to marry Ron, he was
just the best choice at the time. I had a girlfriend, and she’s always been like my sister.”
The Grangers turned a bit pale at this, as they studied Potter cautiously.
“In any event,” continued Potter, “by the time she finally gave up and realized the law was
not being repealed, the wedding date was so close she felt like she couldn’t tell you because
she had lost her chance to do it. We told her that wasn’t the case, but Hermione’s stubborn
and still felt very guilty for… you know.”
This reminder seemed to snap the Grangers out of it.
“That was your fault,” insisted Helen.
“It wasn’t,” said Draco, now jumping in. “It wasn’t Potter’s fault, and it wasn’t Hermione’s
fault either. It was my fault, and others like me.”
The Grangers now turned to look at Draco in disbelief.
“But that war…” said David.
“...was started because purebloods like me tried to push muggleborns like her out of our
world. It was wrong, I know that now, but it formed the very backbone of pureblood society
for a long time. I was raised to believe it from the cradle, as were others like me. It’s not an
excuse, simply an explanation. And that sort of thinking gave Hermione no good choices.
She could have fled the magical world, but then it would have meant the purebloods won.
But staying in the magical world meant she had to fight for something that should have been
hers all along. If she hadn’t obliviated you, odds are very good that you two would have
been tortured and killed. She did it because she loves you.”
“Taking our memories was not an act of love,” insisted Helen.
“It was,” said Draco softly. “And I know that Hermione still feels guilty for it, though she
had no choice if she was to save you. I also had to do terrible things to save the people I
loved. She took your memories for a year to save you. I tortured innocent people – including
children – to save my parents. The wizard who was at the center of it all cared for nobody but
himself. Even those of us who were supposedly aligned with him were at risk. I watched
many, many muggles die at his hands. I intervened for none of them because it would have
meant certain death for my own family. Hermione’s solution to save you was ruthless, but
utterly brilliant. You two would have been a prize if you had been found, and you would not
have survived it.”
The Grangers were staring at him wide-eyed.
“You have to understand that Potter here was made a target through no fault of his own, and
Hermione became one too. It wasn’t just her association with him and the Weasleys that did
it. She was… is… one of the smartest witches in our generation. The Dark Lord couldn’t
abide a muggleborn who was so brilliant, and it put a target on her back. She’s also a good
person and a fighter. She would not stand by and let others fight without her. You two raised
an incredible, strong woman who has continued to fight for the rights of marginalized people
and creatures ever since the war concluded. The one fight she couldn’t win, however, was
the Marriage Law and Procreation Plan.”
“So she married Ron,” said David in a resigned voice.
“No, actually,” said Draco. “She jilted him.”
Now her parents were staring at him incredulously. “She jilted him?” cried Helen.
“She did,” said Draco calmly. “And as it happens, I jilted my partner as well.”
Both of the Grangers’ eyebrows flew up, and Draco hurried to justify himself. “You have to
understand, I was betrothed to Astoria from the time I was a young child, and she was just…
bad for me. She’s not a bad person, but she was bad for me. I couldn’t stand the thought of
actually marrying her, so I left her at the altar. Hermione had a similar realization about
Weasley.”
At this, Helen’s eyes fell to Draco’s hand, and she furrowed her brow as she saw the wedding
ring on his finger. Almost unconsciously Draco looked at her hand too and was jolted by
what he saw there: a ring, very much like his own, was gracing her left hand. Draco glanced
at David and saw a matching band there as well. Draco could scarcely believe it. He had
inadvertently selected the same rings as Hermione’s parents. Hermione’s own ring was a bit
more elaborate than her mother’s, being dotted with diamonds, but Draco’s ring was a perfect
match.
It was no wonder Hermione had recognized them and knew all about them. And he could see
that Hermione’s mother also recognized the ring on Draco’s hand, and her eyes started to get
wide as the truth hit her. Draco hurried to finish it.
“She and I both ended up in the Ministry’s Matching Ceremony a couple days later, and we
were matched together. But she objected to the match and opted to go to prison instead of
marrying me.”
“SHE WENT TO PRISON?” shouted Helen, now standing, so Draco did too. She was
pacing. “Are you telling me my only daughter was in prison and nobody thought to inform
us? Nobody wrote? Aren’t we her next-of-kin?”
“You would have been,” said Draco quickly, “except the law made me her next-of-kin, and
I’m afraid I was so preoccupied by trying to convince her to marry me so she could leave
prison that I didn’t think to reach out. I sincerely apologize for that.”
“Is she still there?” asked David worriedly, and Draco shook his head.
“No, she came around a few weeks ago. Hermione used her prison time to cause a shitstorm
for the Minister of Magic. It was her platform to try to get the MLPP repealed. She’s very
popular in our world, you know – she helped Potter here take down the Dark Lord. She’s
known as the ‘Golden Girl’ and the ‘Brightest Witch of Our Age.’ She’s famous. And she
used all of it, along with her prison sentence, to cause so much trouble for the Minister that
they passed an amendment to the law behind her back. It would have forced her to marry
Weasley to get her to shut up. Her match with Weasley was a popular one, and the Ministry
believed they could undermine her if they forced it. She married me at the last minute both
because Weasley had gone behind her back to get the amendment passed and also because
my… history… means she stays a sympathetic figure in the public eye. The public is
horrified that the Golden Girl married a former Death Eater.”
Both of Granger’s parents looked stunned by this, but then resigned.
“I missed her wedding…” said Helen in a small voice.
“Mrs. Granger, we got married late at night in a prison visitation room. There was an
officiant, two witnesses, and a prison guard. My parents also weren’t there, nor were any of
her friends,” said Draco. “The entire ceremony took less than a minute. I can assure you that
you didn’t miss very much.”
Draco felt a bit dishonest as he said this because the truth was it did mean something to him.
But he didn’t want her parents to have another reason to resent her. He could tell the
Grangers thought this was a small consolation, but neither of them said anything more about
it, and Draco breathed a mental sigh of relief.
“Hermione doesn’t know I’m here,” he continued. “She feels tremendously guilty that you
two were unaware of everything, but so much happened so quickly that she wasn’t sure how
to tell you. I do know that she wants you in her life, and I wanted to meet you since I’m
technically your son-in-law. I wish I could have asked for your permission to marry your
daughter, but there really wasn’t time. All I can say is that I’m deeply sorry for the role I
played in the war. I wish Hermione never had to make such a difficult choice when it came
time to save you both. And now that she’s my wife, I will protect her and cherish her, despite
what the papers may write. I’m quite… taken with her. And if there is anything I can do to
help mend fences, please consider it done.”
Out of the corner of his eye, he could see Potter looking at him in shock. The Grangers also
appeared to be at a loss for words as they considered everything Draco had just said.
Finally David took a deep breath and opened his mouth to speak.
“Tell us about yourself, then.”
Draco faltered for a moment, but then cleared his throat. “Like I said, I’m a pureblood. My
family is an old one — we’ve been in England since William the Conqueror came over. I’m
an only child, and I was in Hermione’s year at Hogwarts in Slytherin House. She and I…
rather despised each other.”
Potter snorted. “Malfoy really despised me.”
Draco laughed a little. “It’s true. We were school enemies.”
“He was jealous that I’m better on a broom than he is.”
“Bullshit,” said Draco. “Half of your catches were just luck.”
“He was also jealous of Hermione’s brilliance.”
“Now that I will admit,” acknowledged Draco. “She was ranked first in our class, and I was
ranked second. She would never give me the time of the day. It was maddening. And I’ll
admit, I bullied her because of it. I did grow up though, and I deeply regret it.”
“But you’re fond of each other now?” asked Helen carefully.
“I certainly am,” said Draco. “I think she is too, but she’s stubborn. I’m trying to bring her
around.”
“And do you plan to fight this law with her?” asked David shrewdly.
“Yes,” said Draco instantly. “I’ve told her she can use me and my resources in whatever
manner she requires. And if the law is repealed, I’ll do everything in my power to get her to
marry me again. I want her as my Lady Malfoy, marriage law or not.”
“Lady Malfoy?” asked Helen, with eyebrows raised.
“Yes, my father is the hereditary Earl of Wiltshire,” said Draco. “I’m the Viscount Malfoy.”
David looked at him sharply. “The person who currently holds the title of Earl of Wiltshire is
a marquess.”
Draco smiled a little, remembering that David Granger would be titled himself if his mother
had been a boy. Draco nodded in agreement.
“You’re right, as far as muggles go. My family held the title before muggles did though, and
after the Statute of Secrecy went into effect the title was split. The king was… prompted to
hand the title that was known to muggles to someone else to keep the magical secret, but his
portion of Wiltshire is missing quite a bit of land. My family’s ancestral lands still surround
the manor where I grew up. Quite a few pureblood families claim titles that have either
disappeared or been split with muggles.”
The Grangers were looking thoughtful now.
“So she jilted Ron and married a lord,” said Helen thoughtfully. “Well I don’t suppose she’ll
do better than that…”
Draco almost choked as David rolled his eyes. “Christ, you sound like my mother…” he
muttered.
Then he turned to Draco again. “And your parents? The Lord and Lady Wiltshire — how
have they taken this?”
Draco hesitated, but decided he owed it to them to be honest.
“They had trouble with it at first, though Mother has come around. Father though… well
he’s a bastard. He's the reason my family swore allegiance to the Dark Lord in the first place,
and then he fucked it up — pardon my language, but it’s true — and I was forced to take his
place. He’s not at all pleased that Hermione is my wife, but we have family magic that
prevents him from harming her, and in any event she’s rather well-matched against him. She
enjoys making him squirm.”
Both Grangers looked a little overwhelmed by this.
“And I don’t suppose you two can get divorced?” asked David.
Draco shook his head. “Not until we have had three children or the law changes. And
Hermione isn’t that keen on kids yet.”
Both of their eyebrows flew up at this. “Children?”
Draco shrugged. “It was the entire point of the law.”
“You will need at least one child,” pointed out David. “A boy.”
“Yes, but I can be patient. Our family magic guarantees a boy first, so if Hermione ever
comes around to it we will have one. I hope she agrees to it eventually, but if she doesn’t…”
he shrugged again.
For some reason, this seemed to reassure the Grangers more than anything else. Seeing their
hesitant approval, Draco stood.
“Hermione wants you in her life, and I want her to be happy. If you can find it in yourselves
to forgive her and me, we would welcome you at Malfoy Manor at any time. Potter has a
number he says you can call to get in touch with us. And I also brought you this….”
Now he pulled out a book titled The Rise and Fall of the Dark Lord.
“This is the best book on the last war that either of us has found. If I know Hermione, I
suspect she has underplayed her role in it when she had told you about it. This book is not at
all flattering for my family of course, but I think you deserve to understand the kind of
woman you raised and the challenges she was up against when she obliviated you. She’s
extraordinary, and this book tells her story, alongside Potter’s of course.”
The Grangers looked stunned as they accepted the book with slightly shaky hands.
“Thank you for hearing him out,” said Potter. “And for what it’s worth, I’m sorry Hermione
got pulled into the war because of me. I’m not sorry she’s my friend, though. She stuck with
me through some really rough years, and I’ll always love her for it.”
The Grangers looked like they didn’t know what to think, and Draco gave them a tight smile
as he and Potter left them in their sitting room, staring down at the book a bit nervously.
“Still think it’s the worst idea I’ve ever had then?” asked Draco.
Potter sized him up for a moment and then slowly shook his head. “No. I mean, she’s
probably going to kill you if she ever finds out you did this, but it was overdue. Ron and I
should have done this years ago.”
Draco inclined his head. He happened to agree.
“If it brings them around the Manor, it will be worth it.”
“And I’ll come if they do,” said Potter. “Since your father…”
“Yes,” said Draco shortly.
He turned to face Potter, who looked like he was warring with himself for a moment before
finally raising a hand and extending it toward Draco.
Draco was surprised, but he grasped it and shook it.
“I’ll let you know if I hear from them,” he said. “This was good, Malfoy.”
Draco smiled a little. “Thanks Potter.”
Chapter 16: Progress Report.
25 December 2003.
Draco woke on Christmas morning to his wife in bed with him and a dusting of snow that had
fallen overnight. She was still asleep, and Draco took a moment to relish the stillness that
surrounded them. They wouldn’t be disturbed on Christmas morning. His family
traditionally held a late breakfast before gifts were exchanged, though over the last few years
the gifts had noticeably dwindled because what could the Malfoys possibly get each other
that they didn’t already have? Draco wasn’t sure what to expect this year and almost hoped
they would skip the whole thing. He had had no ingenious brainwaves for a physical gift for
Hermione… no, the thing that was her real gift would come later in the day. He just hoped
she would like it.
For now though, he felt peace as he held her and inhaled her scent. She was still trying to put
up walls with him, but her efforts had been half-hearted over the last few days. Draco was
cautiously optimistic that she was starting to accept him and any feelings she might be
harboring for him. As for Draco, his feelings seemed to be growing stronger with each
passing day, and he felt his magic slowly destabilizing as he continued to tamp down on the
physical urges. It was becoming increasingly difficult as her mood slowly improved and her
figure did too. After nearly a month of fattening meals she was still not back to normal, but
she was trending in that direction. As Draco watched her curves emerge he found himself
growing truly weak for her.
Just two more months and a bit.
He continued to remind himself of that. By the time their consummation deadline arrived he
would surely be desperate, but he could wait if he had to. He swore he wouldn’t push her. If
it happened before then it would be because she came around on her own.
And Merlin but Draco wanted her to come around. It wasn’t just his need for her. He wanted
to know she chose it, chose him and wasn’t being pressured into it because of the law and
their vow.
He felt her stirring, and instinctively he tightened his hold on her, and his hand slipped under
the hem of her top and gripped her stomach. He had no interest whatsoever in leaving bed
this morning. To his delight she seemed to have a similar idea, because instead of rolling out
of bed like normal she stretched back into him and settled her bum firmly against his morning
erection.
Draco tried not to groan, but he also didn’t move away. It wasn’t the first time she felt it, and
what was the point of trying to hide it from her? The moment she was willing, Draco would
happily shag her into the mattress.
He nuzzled his face into her neck, and he felt her give a little sigh as she relaxed back into
him.
“Happy Christmas darling,” he murmured.
“Happy Christmas,” she said softly.
They were quiet for a time and then Draco asked, “What is your tradition?”
She seemed to shrug a little and said, “Christmas morning at the Burrow. It was always
really loud. And most years I would visit my parents for dinner.”
There was a slightly awkward silence at this until Draco asked hesitantly, “Is this… okay?”
She nodded a little. “Yes. It’s different, but I’ve been thinking about it a lot, and the situation
with Ron really isn’t my fault. Molly will come around eventually or she won’t. If she
doesn’t, then that’s the answer. Harry and Ginny reached out so I still have them. I also have
Teddy and Andy of course.”
“And you have me now,” he added, “and Mother. I really do think Father will get on board
too. He just needs more time.”
“That’s true. It can be enough for now.”
Draco was determined that she would have more than that, but he was relieved that she
seemed to be settling into the idea that the Weasley’s might be distant for a time.
“If there’s anything you need from me to make it easier, don’t hesitate to ask.”
She was quiet for a long while as she considered this. Finally she said, “Would you give me
a real tour of the Manor then? There are so many places I haven’t seen yet… several parlors
and the study and the library and —”
“Wait,” said Draco, “you haven’t seen the library yet?”
She just shook her head.
“Why on earth not?” he asked in confusion. He was sure that would be the first place she
visited upon her arrival.
“I didn’t know if it was safe.”
“Why wouldn’t it be safe?”
“Because I’m muggleborn… I’ve heard there are spells…” she trailed off a bit awkwardly.
At this Draco nudged her until she rolled over to face him.
“Hermione, there’s no way a spell like that exists. It’s true there are parts of the Manor
warded to keep non-family members out, but you’re a Malfoy.”
“I’m a Granger,” she insisted.
Draco rolled his eyes at this. “The family magic and the wards don’t give a fuck what your
surname is. You’re a Malfoy for all magical purposes. You can go anywhere you want.”
“But antimuggleborn spells…”
“There aren’t any,” he said. “If such a thing existed it would mean that there was a true
difference between purebloods and muggleborns, wouldn’t it? And we both know there’s no
difference.”
Her eyes widened at this. “I suppose I never thought of it like that.”
Then a look of excitement started to cross her face. “So I can really go anywhere?”
Draco reached up and cupped her cheek. “Of course darling. If I had known you hadn’t
explored yet I would have rectified it immediately. Why didn’t you say anything?”
She shrugged. “No reason.”
He frowned a little. “Hermione, please tell me when you want something or if something is
not right. I know our situation is unconventional, but we’re married. That means a great deal
to me, and I want you to feel at home here.”
She softened a little at this and leaned her cheek against his hand as he stroked it with his
thumb. “I’m still… adjusting. But I’ll try.”
Draco desperately wanted to kiss her, but he settled for a peck on her forehead. She sighed a
little and snuggled in, and Draco enjoyed the novelty of feeling her facing toward him for
once.
“Malfoy…” she started.
“Hmmm?”
“What does the family magic feel like to you?”
Draco paused as he considered this. “There are… urges. But they’re fairly mild most of the
time. It’s a bit like being prodded. Small jolts, some intrusive thoughts, that sort of thing.”
She was quiet for a long while.
“Does it make you… want me?”
“Not really. It’s more like it draws my attention to you if I look away too long. And when I
touch you…”
“What?” she whispered.
“It rewards me. My magic feels pleased.”
“You’re sure it’s not manipulating your feelings?”
“Positive,” he said firmly. “I can almost always distinguish my own thoughts from the
magic.”
“But if it rewards you when you touch me isn’t that a sort of… I don’t know… training?
Like a Pavlovian response or something?”
Draco wasn’t entirely sure what she was talking about, but he got the gist.
“I don’t think so. Like I said, I can separate it from my own thoughts.”
“So you would want to touch me even without the magic then?” she asked, frowning a little.
Draco looked at her incredulously. “Hermione, I think I’ve been fairly obvious about that. I
told you I have no idea what I’m doing, and I don’t want to push you for something you’re
not into… but to answer your question, yes. I wanted to touch you in Azkaban. I’ve wanted
to touch you every time I’ve done it. Me. Not my family magic, but me.”
She studied him intently, and he was struck by a thought.
“Hermione… this whole time… have you thought it was just my family magic making me
want… this?”
She made an indistinct noise. “I don’t know. Maybe? The journals weren’t very clear. And
the thought of you being magically compelled to want… you know… doesn’t exactly thrill
me.”
“Well it doesn’t, not really,” he said firmly. “I told you before I don’t think it would have
been strong enough to make me want Astoria, and it wasn’t active at all while you were in
Azkaban. Don’t think about the magic, Hermione. I’m certain it’s not making me want
something I didn’t want on my own.”
She gave him another long look, and he willed her to see the truth of this on his face. At long
last she nodded slowly.
“Well then… that certainly gives me something to think about.”
Then she leaned in and gave him a lingering kiss on his cheek. Draco’s breath caught. It was
the first time she had initiated, the first hint that she might be open to…
Kiss her, touch her, fuck her.
Draco shoved the thoughts away.
Patience, man. Be patient.
It had never once occurred to him that the family magic might be putting her off, and now
that he thought about this he felt foolish. Of course she wouldn’t want to shag him if she
thought his interest in her was magically compelled. What woman would find that remotely
appealing? He was frustrated that he had never thought of this. If he had he could have
reassured her before now and perhaps be further along. But there wasn’t anything he could
do about it, and he tried to put it aside and enjoy the first time she had sought to kiss him.
As she pulled away, she seemed to be searching his face for something. Perhaps she found it,
because her eyes warmed before she disentangled herself.
“How about you show me that library of yours then? I must admit I’m exceedingly curious.”
Draco found himself smiling at this suggestion, and he hurried into the loo to complete his
morning routine before holding out his arm for her to take. She gripped it, and Draco sensed
a nervous excitement coming from her as he escorted her through the corridor, down the
stairs, and through a gallery to reach the double doors of the library, which was its own wing
of the Manor.
“Ready?” he asked.
She started to smile slowly as she nodded, and Draco pushed the doors open and gestured for
her to go inside.
He couldn’t tear his eyes from her face as her jaw dropped to see it. The library was large,
ancient, and practically hummed with magic from the texts it housed. Much like the
Hogwarts library it was filled with a maze of stacks a person could get lost in for days.
Unlike Hogwarts it was a couple stories tall, and there was an upper level with a catwalk that
took the collection deep into the second story of the Manor. It was large enough that there
was even a bridge connecting both sides of the upper level. As they watched a few books
drifted through the air to be reshelved.
“Fuck me,” she breathed as she saw it, and Draco’s magic and cock both jumped to attention.
Fuck her hard. Fuck her right here.
Draco tried to ignore it.
“So? Was I right?” he asked instead.
She turned to look at him, and Draco saw her eyes were sparkling.
“Right about what?”
“That my library is better than the Beast’s.”
She let out a peal of laughter at this and nodded.
“Yes… you were right… Draco.”
Draco felt something dislodge inside of him at the sound of his name. He had taken to
calling her Hermione, but she still stuck with Malfoy for the most part, unless she was trying
to distinguish between him and another member of his family. Hearing it like this was…
different. And good. Draco was struggling to prevent his optimism from getting the better of
him.
“Draco?” he asked in what he hoped was a casual voice.
“You’ve been calling me Hermione.”
“I have…” he said as he started to approach her. She had an odd expression on her face.
Draco struggled to identify it.
“And we are married,” she added.
“You are quite right,” he said as he slipped an arm around her waist.
“Let’s just say I’m becoming… accustomed to the idea.”
Joy leapt inside of Draco. She was giving him some assurance and hope that he was truly
making progress with her.
Draco bent down to kiss her cheek.
“Good. And you know that means this library is yours just as much as mine, right? You’re a
Malfoy, darling. I don’t care what you say about it, you know it’s true.”
She smiled prettily at this. “I’ll confess, I might be able to get on board with an unofficial
name change if it means this library is mine. I do think this is the best Christmas gift you
could have possibly given me.”
I hope that’s not true.
“Hmmm we will have to see about that, won’t we?”
She raised an eyebrow in challenge, and Draco couldn’t help but grin.
“Come along,” he said. “Let’s have breakfast and gifts, and then I’ll give you the full tour.”
Draco started to hold out his arm again, but shifted tactics at the last second. He reached for
her hand and entwined his fingers with hers as he led her toward breakfast. His heart
stuttered, but she didn’t pull away. Draco couldn’t help but think that perhaps a Christmas
miracle was unfolding.

Hermione Granger, it transpired, was rather good at giving gifts to people she didn’t know
very well. Whether it was a cashmere scarf and glove set for his mother in a tasteful shade of
cream or a specially magicked television for Draco that could play something she called a
‘DVD,’ she knew what she was about. Draco was almost relieved she decided to fuck with
Lucius by gifting him a fine bottle of liquor that was of muggle and not wizarding origins. It
told him the professional coldness she had assumed around his parents after the Weasley
fallout was thawing and returning to normal.
His parents had surprised him by gifting Hermione a gown for the annual New Year’s Eve
party the Malfoys traditionally hosted. Draco’s mouth went dry when he saw it, and he could
tell that Hermione was a bit thrown off but not displeased. It was a gesture from at least one
of his parents that they were bringing her into the fold to make sure her first truly public
appearance as his wife went smoothly.
As for Draco, he knew her real gift was coming later, but to give her something to open he
found a kit that allowed her to create her own tea blends. The idea had come after a truly
disastrous tea with his parents when she decided to mess with Lucius by requesting two
different kinds of tea from the elves and mixing them together. Lucius had looked on in
dismay as she drank it, but she told Draco later on that it was surprisingly good. To his relief,
she laughed when she saw his gift, clearly understanding his reference, but then a look of
interest crossed her face as she seemed to consider giving it an honest try.
Draco sensed she liked his gift more than the gifts that arrived from nearly every other
acquaintance of hers: books.
“Why books?” sniffed Lucius. “The Malfoy library is extensive. There is no need for people
to give you books.”
Hermione shot him an annoyed look. “I would wager most of my friends believe I haven’t
been allowed in. And besides, several of these are muggle.”
Still, Draco thought that a book was a lazy gift for Hermione, and that’s why she received so
many. She was a keen book lover to be sure, but giving them to her as a gift was almost
impersonal. And the books she received didn’t just come from the usual suspects; she
received quite a few from fans she had never met in person, because her love of books had
become almost as famous as she was.
“It’s been like this for every birthday and Christmas since the war,” she told Draco with a
shrug, as she stared around the small pile. “I usually donate the ones I don’t need.”
“Well let’s find space in the library for the ones you wish to keep,” he replied. “I’m certain
our muggle book collection is almost nonexistent, and we should certainly expand it if you
wish.”
This was how they spent the afternoon once the promised Manor tour was complete and
Draco had shown her every room of significance she hadn’t visited yet. And of course, it
naturally meant that Hermione had to learn precisely how the Malfoy library was organized.
“This is absolutely senseless,” she declared. She was surveying a shelf of books about
hydra. Immediately next to it was book titled, Hydrangeas in the Wild.
“It’s alphabetical by topic,” sniffed Draco. “Hydrangea comes after Hydra.”
“The book on hydrangeas should be shelved with ‘flowers,’ if that’s the case. Or is it
‘flora?’ You see? You can’t find anything this way. In fact, I think I have a new Project.”
Draco looked at her warily. “And what is that, my dear?”
“I will rearrange the library usig the Dewey Decimal System. Libraries all around the world
use it.”
Draco narrowed his eyes at her. “They do?”
“Hmmm, yes. Though it’s muggle so I may have to take some liberties with it. But it is far
more sensible than this.”
“I don’t know that it’s sensible at all,” he objected.
“But you said it’s my library, isn’t it?” she asked with mock sweetness.
Draco weighed his options here, but his Slytherin instincts came to the surface as he
recognized the opportunity to make a deal. “Fine,” he said. “You’re right it’s yours, but only
as long as you’re married to me.”
Her eyes seemed to burn into him as she contemplated this statement.
“So you’re saying…”
“I’m saying if our marriage is dissolved for any reason, you will no longer have the right to
reorganize the library, unless you marry me again. And there are several hundred thousand
books, so we both know it’s going to take you longer than a few weeks to achieve it. You are
going back to Hogwarts soon, and I know the MLPP requires your attention too.”
She huffed an exhale as she narrowed her eyes at him, but he thought he saw the glint of a
challenge.
“Fine. But as long as I’m married to you, I’m organizing my library my way.”
“As is your right, my darling,” he said blithely.
Secretly, Draco was thrilled. While he had serious doubts about her proposed organizational
methods, he knew Hermione was not the type to abandon a Project. Now that she had taken
this on it might be years before she finished it. It would give him some leverage in case the
MLPP was repealed and their marriage dissolved.
“I’ll start tomorrow,” she announced.
“Excellent plan. And now, it’s time to head to dinner.”
Again, Draco grabbed her hand, rather than offering his arm. He saw a faint smile play about
her mouth as she let him take it and tug her toward the dining room.
“You said there would be guests?” she asked.
“Mmmm,” he responded. “Pansy, Theo, and Blaise join most years, and I know my mother
reached out to Aunt Andy and Teddy too.”
Hermione brightened at this, and Draco’s heart started to pound as they made their way down
the long hall toward the dining room. He had second guessed this a hundred times, but he
had his mother on board. It would have to be enough. And even if it went poorly, hopefully
Hermione would understand the intent of the gesture, even if the execution was questionable.
“Hermione,” he said, coming to a halt just outside of the dining room doors.
“Yes?” she asked in confusion.
“Please don’t hate me for this.”
She furrowed her brow and opened her mouth to question him, but before she could say
anything he pushed the door open.
“Happy Christmas, darling,” he said quietly as she came to a complete halt.
Her parents rose from the table and started walking toward her.
“Mum? Dad?” she asked in a voice Draco could scarcely recognize. There wasn’t a trace of
Professional Hermione or Snarky Hermione or Confident Hermione or even Angry Hermione
that he could hear. Instead, she sounded like a little girl, overwhelmed and a bit scared.
“Hermione,” said Helen, pulling her in for a hug, which Hermione returned stiffly. “Happy
Christmas. Draco invited us for dinner, along with the Potters.”
Now Hermione looked past her parents and saw Harry and Ginny Potter both there, who were
smiling a little at her stunned expression. Inviting the Potters had been both a necessity and a
wish of Draco’s. It was necessary because if Lucius put a toe out of line with Hermione’s
parents there, Harry Potter could subdue him. Potter could perform magic against his father
that Draco, his mother, and his wife could not. But Draco also wanted them there to prove to
Hermione that she hadn’t lost them. He knew the Potters had reached out, but he didn’t think
they had seen much of each other since that terrible afternoon at the Burrow. The Potters had
opted to skip Christmas dinner with the Weasleys and spend it with Hermione instead.
She spun to look at Draco, and he saw her eyes were huge.
“How?” she asked weakly.
He shrugged and gave her a small smile. “I thought I should meet my in-laws. Potter and I
went to see them a few days ago. After that it was just some tweaking of the wards around
the Manor so they could visit, and here we are.”
That was not, of course, strictly true. Inviting the Grangers had taken an enormous amount
of research to modify the muggle repelling wards to accommodate them, and of course he
had to plead his case to his mother who then pleaded his case to his father. Lucius’s
expression was cold, but he wasn’t saying anything and Draco prayed he would just stay
quiet for this. He knew the Grangers were now aware of who and what his father was, so
they would be expecting some hostility. They had read the book Draco left them, and there
was an entire chapter on the Malfoy family sins.
“I brought wine,” said David Granger, now pulling out a bag that had several sleeves to keep
wine bottles separate from one another. “And I have a non-alcoholic delight as well. Draco
tells us one of the guests tonight is expecting, and I would never presume that everybody
likes to drink.”
Draco glanced at Pansy as he said this, and he saw she looked surprised, but also rather
gratified that she hadn’t been forgotten.
Hermione took a shuddering breath, and Draco saw she was steeling herself a little, as she
nodded and led her parents back to the table. “That’s great, Dad.”
Then she looked at Draco. “Dad became a sommelier after he… retired from his dental
practice. He has certifications for it and everything.”
“Yes, I’m studying to become a Master Sommelier,” said David. “It’s far more rigorous than
my dental degree ever was, but the study is truly gratifying. It’s a wonderful way to spend
retirement."
Blaise perked up at this, and he drew the Grangers into a conversation about wine as an elf
decanted the offerings and poured.
Draco swirled, sniffed, tasted and…
“Holy mother of Merlin that’s good,” said Theo.
“It’s a bordeaux,” said David. “Full-bodied with notes of red currant, plum, and clove. The
vineyard that produces it is small, but exceptional.”
“And it’s muggle?” chimed Lucius’s cold voice from the head of the table.
There was a slightly uncomfortable silence, but David Granger raised an eyebrow in a
manner that was so reminiscent of his daughter that Draco couldn’t help but gape a little.
“It is. And far more interesting than the elf made wine Hermione gave me to try a couple
years ago. They were some of the best bottles in the wizarding world, she said. And yet,
they couldn’t hold a candle to this.”
Draco held his breath, but before his father could respond, the door opened again and a tiny
tornado known as Teddy Lupin came sprinting in.
“UNCLE HARRY! AUNT GINNY! AUNT MINNIE! COUSIN DRACO! I GOT A
BROOM FOR CHRISTMAS!”
Andromeda followed him, looking slightly worse for the wear. She just gave an exhausted
sigh and sank down on a free seat near Hermione.
“Christmas with a five year old is magical, but truly exhausting,” she said.
This had the effect of breaking the tension as Hermione laughed, introduced her parents to
Andromeda, and then poured her some wine too.
“Bloody hell this is wonderful,” she sighed as she sipped. Then she seemed to catch Lucius’s
scowl at the head of the table. “Honestly Lucius, no need to be a stubborn bastard on
Christmas. Try it.”
Lucius grumbled, but after a stern look from Narcissa he assumed a grim expression while he
sampled a taste. His eyes widened a bit and he said nothing, but Draco couldn’t help but
notice his father took a second sip and then a third. David Granger’s smirk was worthy of his
daughter as he watched out of the corner of his eye.
The room settled into several smaller conversations as dinner was served. Draco said little,
but observed Hermione closely as she spoke with her parents. Every so often she glanced at
him and Harry, and he thought – or maybe just hoped – that they seemed to be warming to
each other as the evening moved along.
Draco’s friends also appeared to be making an effort, and Theo was exchanging movie
recommendations with Hermione’s mother, who was apparently a bit of a movie buff. Draco
marveled at the similarities he noted between Hermione and each of her parents. She was
such a fascinating blend of them both.
It was only as the dinner plates were being cleared that he heard Hermione ask, “Gin, don’t
you want some wine? I know you favor red.”
Ginny Weasley had spent most of the evening talking to Pansy, which came as a great
surprise to Draco until this question from Hermione pulled her away.
“Oh… well…” she started as she turned crimson.
Hermione’s eyes narrowed and then widened, and then she positively squealed.
“You aren’t!” she cried.
“I am,” acknowledged Weasley. Potter assumed a smug look, which Draco didn’t understand
at all.
“She’s what?” he asked. “What is all this?”
To his consternation, every woman in the room looked at him and gave him an identical eyeroll as though he was missing something incredibly obvious.
“Mrs. Potter has some good news, Draco,” said Narcissa primly.
“And what is it?” pressed Draco.
“Bloody hell, Malfoy, I’m pregnant!” said Ginny.
Draco’s eyes widened, and he stared at Potter in disbelief.
“You… she… really?” he asked weakly.
“Yeah, Malfoy, we’re married, remember?”
Draco just gaped, as the table laughed at him. He could scarcely make sense of it.
“But you don’t look pregnant,” Draco finally insisted.
“You prat!” said Pansy. “Have you forgotten everything from my early weeks? Of course
she doesn’t look pregnant! It will be some weeks still before she’s showing!”
Draco glanced at Pansy’s very obvious bump. She was more than halfway done and getting
larger by the week, not that Draco would ever dare say as much to her face.
“Erm… right,” said Draco uncomfortably, rubbing the back of his neck.
“We can find a book for you to read if that would help,” said Hermione with a sly grin. “Like
that time I assigned you reading about –”
“Thank you!” he said, cutting her off. “Yes, of course darling.”
The looks on his friends' faces told him he was not going to get away with this, and he would
be forced to divulge his truly mortifying lack of knowledge about human reproduction. He
just prayed they would drop it while his parents and in-laws were at the same table.
Thankfully, with Ginny’s secret revealed it occupied the entirety of dessert, and the tension
only returned when everyone rose and Hermione said, “Mum, Dad, could I talk to you both?
And maybe Harry too?”
They smiled tightly at this, but nodded, and Hermione led them out of the dining room but
not before casting Draco an inscrutable look. Ginny also made her excuses and lifted a very
tired Teddy in her arms to take him back to Andromeda’s place. Once they were gone he
turned back to find the others staring at him.
“That was exceptional, Draco,” Andromeda finally said.
“I hope so,” he said worriedly.
“I liked them,” declared Theo. “Her mother knows film and her father knows wine. What is
there not to like?”
“Their background,” snapped Lucius.
The whole table turned to scowl at him. To Draco’s surprise, it was Pansy who spoke up.
“Honestly, Lucius, can’t you give it up already? A meal with them a few times a year won’t
kill you, and if Draco can fix this relationship then maybe she’ll finally shag him and
continue the Malfoy line. It’s a small price to pay.”
Everyone just stared at her.
“What?” she said irritably. “I’m pregnant, hot, exhausted, and worrying about a couple of
muggles – who were perfectly lovely by the way – is about the last thing I wish to do on
Christmas.”
“I quite agree,” said Narcissa firmly. “I appreciate your silence, Lucius. The next time you
see them perhaps you can find it in yourself to complement David’s wine choice. I notice
you drank three glasses.”
Lucius turned crimson at this, and Draco failed to hide his smirk as everyone rose.
“We must be off,” said Theo, and Blaise and Andromeda made their excuses as well.
Draco didn’t linger, not wishing to listen to his father’s opinions any longer. His nerves were
mounting as he made his way to his room and hopped in the shower in a futile attempt to
relax.
It could have been much worse, he assured himself as he allowed the hot water to pour over
him. Nobody had said anything truly offensive, not really, and Hermione’s parents seemed to
hold their own against a room full of witches and wizards. Hermione herself had clearly been
wary but seemed cautiously optimistic by the end of the meal. Draco just hoped that
whatever they were talking about in private wouldn’t undo any progress they had just made.
He shut off the shower, dried himself off, and wrapped a towel around his waist as he left the
loo to get dressed. He pulled on some boxers and joggers and was rummaging through his
dresser for a T-shirt when the door opened, and he spun around to find Hermione staring at
him.
Her eyes widened as she took in the sight of him without his shirt on, and Draco stilled as he
watched her survey him.
She looked at him slowly, from top to bottom, and his magic roared to life.
See how she wants you? Show her how good you can be for her.
Unconsciously Draco flexed, and he saw her throat bob.
“Draco,” she said. Her voice sounded rough, almost gravely, and he felt a lurch of fear that it
had all gone horribly wrong.
He said nothing, but just stared at her.
“You reached out to them. You told them… everything.”
He nodded slowly.
“Why?”
She looked overwhelmed again and confused.
“Because you missed them. I know I was overstepping by going to visit them without you,
but Prudence told me how much you wanted to reconcile with them. I hoped that if they
heard about the war from somebody on the other side they might finally understand the
predicament you were in a little better. That and I had the idea to bring them around the
Manor for Christmas. It's only right we see them too. The necessitated an introduction.”
She took a shuddering breath and nodded slowly.
“They… still have some concerns. But they want to meet again and talk. They said they
want to know everything that’s happened since I obliviated them.”
The knot in Draco’s stomach eased ever so slightly.
“That’s wonderful.”
“And you brought them here… convinced your parents… your father…”
Again Draco said nothing. He was transfixed as he stared at her. He wasn’t sure if she was
talking to herself or to him. But she approached him slowly, and Draco’s magic hummed as
she reached out one hand and traced a scar on his chest.
“I know there are a lot of reasons I shouldn’t want you,” she whispered.
The knot in Draco’s stomach immediately returned. Was that it then? Had he royally fucked
this up by going directly to her parents without involving her in the decision?
“A lot of reasons…” she said again, “but I can’t seem to remember what they are anymore.”
Draco’s breath caught. She looked up at him, and he was spellbound as he stared into her
golden eyes. She pressed a hand to his chest, and he allowed himself to be pushed back so he
was sitting on the small sofa. She stood over him and cupped his face in her hands.
His heart was racing, and his eyes fluttered closed at her touch, as she tilted his face up.
“You’ve been so good to me Draco.”
Be good for her. Show her you’ll do anything.
Her fingers slid into his hair, and his heart started to pound as he felt her move into his lap.
His eyes opened, and he found her staring at him with a look of determination on her face.
“Do you still want this?” she asked quietly.
Draco inhaled, as he nodded slowly.
She leaned toward him, and Draco felt lightheaded as she whispered in his ear.
“Then maybe you’d like to get a progress report on your Project.”
Draco’s eyes widened as she pulled back and yanked her jumper over her head. Then she
started to unbutton the shirt she was wearing underneath. His gaze immediately dropped to
track the progress of her fingers, scarcely believing this was actually happening to him. She
went slow, and as each button was unfastened Draco caught the plunge of her cleavage and
the hint of pale blue lace appeared beneath.
She shrugged out of the shirt, and then Draco was staring at her breasts mounding over her
bra. Merlin but her tits were larger than he realized, and he gripped her waist to keep himself
from reaching up and touching her there without her permission.
He thought she might be studying his face, but he couldn’t tear his eyes away from her tits
that were just inches from his nose. She let out a low chuckle and then reached behind
herself and unfastened her bra but didn’t remove it.
Draco’s self control was nearly gone. He reached up and touched the bra straps on her
shoulders.
“May I?” he asked roughly.
“You may,” she said.
Draco knew his hands were shaking as he pulled the straps off her shoulders with the lightest
brush.
The moment her bra fell forward, Draco groaned and squeezed her shoulders, though he
wanted nothing more than for his hands to be lower than that.
Her tits were fucking glorious. Round and large with dusty pink nipples that were tightening
as he watched. This was so much better than Blaise’s naughty magazines. They were real
and warm and in his face.
“Fuck Hermione,” he breathed. “This is… you are…”
He finally looked up at her expression. Her eyes were dark, and she was studying him.
“Draco,” she said with a small smile. “You can touch them.”
Draco groaned again as his hands fell from her shoulders and gave the lightest brush along
her breasts with his thumbs. He watched her nipples respond to his touch and goosebumps
erupt, and then he was lost.
He tore his gaze away and back up to her face, only to find her lowering her mouth to his,
and in a moment she was snogging him senseless.
Draco truly had no idea what he was doing, but his magic and instincts seemed to take over
as he opened his mouth and then gripped her tits with both hands. She whimpered in his
mouth, and her hips thrust over him. Draco gasped as he felt her moving over his erection.
Fuck but that feels good.
His wife was here and topless and kissing him and grinding on him, and no witch had ever
been this perfect. He couldn’t remember the last time he had been this hard. He was
desperate for her, desperate to be good for her.
He wrenched his mouth away and moved to her ear.
“Hermione…” he gasped. “Tell me what you want. Let me give it to you, please darling…”
“Make me come,” she breathed, and Draco’s heart nearly stalled out.
He had thought about this moment approximately ten thousand times since the day he was
matched with Hermione. He had told her that he was inexperienced but had never told her
just how much. He had turned this problem over and over in his mind. He had done some
clandestine research in the library but had so little practical knowledge he was terrified he
would bollocks it up. But his wife was asking him to get her off, and there was only one
correct response to that. The words he had carefully selected for this situation came tumbling
out.
“Show me how you like it,” he murmured.
That was safe. That was fair. Draco wasn’t admitting to her that he had no fucking clue how
he was supposed to get her off. He was simply giving Hermione the opportunity to instruct
him about her body, as opposed to applying lessons she assumed he must have learned on
other nameless lovers. Draco thought this was a reasonable question in any event. He didn’t
care what other women liked, he only cared what Hermione liked. Draco was determined to
be a quick study so that if he did it once he could do it again with less instruction. His heart
was racing as he felt her reach up and grasp one hand.
She slid it down her abdomen as she said, “Kiss my breasts.”
Oh fuck he was going to be allowed to kiss them? How was he supposed to kiss her there
and do whatever she was about to show him with his hand at the same time? He had been
fantasizing about her tits for months — had noticed them years ago in fact — and Draco was
worried that this would require far too much coordination.
He found himself distracted as he pulled a nipple into his mouth for the first time, and his
wife groaned for him the moment he did it. Oh gods, the sound of it was going to make him
come in his pants like a fucking teenager. He was kissing, sucking, licking, and it was
becoming sloppy because his attention was pulled to her hand guiding his into her pants.
She lifted her hips ever so slightly and he felt the fabric of her knickers and then some
trimmed hair, and then finally…
Look how wet she is for you.
Draco thought he might actually be dying as all of his magic became laser focused on her
arousal, and she guided his fingers to it.
“My clit,” she gasped. “Small circles. Like this.”
Thank Merlin she was showing him, because Draco learned in that moment he never did find
the clit of the few witches he had fingered before. It was a little buried in her folds, but the
moment she guided him to the firm bud and swirled it like she asked, her hips jerked, and she
moaned again.
Panting for it.
That was what the other blokes in Slytherin had said about this elusive body part and Circe
but they were right. She was mewling, twitching, and instinctively Draco moved his thumb
to stay on it while he slipped two fingers inside.
She started to rock on his fingers.
“Let me fuck your hand,” she said, and Draco almost died again.
“Do whatever you want with me,” he groaned in response before latching back onto her
nearest nipple and swirling his thumb in that special place down low.
It was so wet and so crude and so fucking perfect. Draco focused every ounce of attention on
her so he wouldn’t come early, and before long she started to jerk again.
“Draco… I’m close… I’m gonna…”
Draco knew the moment she broke because his magic told him.
Look how beautiful she is when she comes for you.
Draco obeyed his magic and released her tits from his mouth so he could look up at her face.
He was breathless as he saw her head thrown back and her eyes closed, with her face screwed
up. The moan she released nearly sent him over the edge himself.
He immediately moved to extract his fingers, but she placed a hand to stop him.
“Slow,” she coached. “Draw it out for me first… there… that’s perfect.”
Draco and his magic both preened at the praise.
Perfect. She said it was perfect.
Draco followed her lead and after several long moments she deemed herself satisfied as she
tugged on his hand to remove it from her pants. Draco didn’t know what to do next, but she
made the decision for him as she placed his fingers in her mouth and sucked.
Fucking hell.
The blood rushed straight to Draco’s cock as his jaw dropped in disbelief, and he was
perilously close. A few pumps was all he would need to finish.
“May I?” she asked.
Draco had no idea what she was asking about, but he didn’t even think to clarify it with her.
She could do anything she wanted to him. Anything at all.
He nodded, and she gave him a sweet smile as she leaned down for another deep kiss before
breaking away and kissing down his neck before reaching his chest.
Draco’s head fell back at the odd but delicious sensation as she slowly worked her way lower.
“You’re far too handsome for your own good,” she murmured.
“I’ve got scars,” he countered.
“So do I,” she retorted. “And yours are hot.”
Did she have scars? Draco scarcely noticed, so distracted was he by her bare tits. But he
supposed whatever scars she had weren’t nearly as serious as his, and in any event he thought
she was beautiful. Perfect. Perhaps she was right that things like scars could be hot. He
certainly had no complaints.
He was contemplating this as she continued to kiss down his abdomen and it was only when
she was kneeling on the floor between his legs that he realized with a lurch what she was
intending to do.
Fuck. Fuck, fuck, fuck…
How was he supposed to last for her like that? He figured she would maybe give him a hand
job if he was very lucky. He had never imagined this…
Well okay, he had imagined it certainly, but he had never once believed she would actually do
it.
She was tugging on his trousers and peeling them down his legs. Automatically Draco lifted
his hips to help, and before he knew it his cock was springing free. It was pulsing, almost
painful with how much he wanted her.
He stared at her face as she saw it for the first time, and her mouth dropped to a perfect O.
Draco heard himself whimper.
“That is… a gorgeous cock…” she breathed.
Oh fuck, that might make him come too. She had to stop complimenting him, it was going
straight to his head — both heads, in fact.
Draco knew he was trembling as he waited for whatever was coming next. Her eyes flicked
up at him, and she smirked at him like she knew she owned him.
Gods, but did she own him. Draco was fully willing to admit it. She had him by the balls,
and he hoped she would never let go.
“I’m not going to last…” he warned her. “It’s been… a long time.”
The truth was, he had never done this before in his life. But Hermione just twinkled up at
him.
“Then I had better make it good for the time we’re doing it.”
At that she proceeded to wrap her hand around the base of his cock and lean forward to draw
the tip into her mouth.
Draco gasped at the sensation. It was so wet, so warm, so soft. He had never felt anything
like this in his life, and the fact that it was Hermione Granger… his wife, his witch…
Tell her what you’re thinking.
“Merlin Hermione, you’re perfect,” he groaned, as he instinctively threaded his fingers
through her curls to hold her head in place. She was teasing the tip of him with her tongue,
and then she opened her throat and took him in, all the way down to her hand.
“Fuck!” he cried, and she did it again and again.
“Fuck I’m gonna…”
He thought she would release her mouth, but she didn’t. Draco tried to hold back, but he was
too far gone, and then he found himself squeezing his eyes shut and spurting down her throat.
The moment it was done he wrenched his eyes open to stare down at her, and she sat back,
still nude from the waist up and swallowed.
Draco’s brain shorted out.
Had he ever thought something like this might happen to him? No. Not ever. And yet here
she was, and she had just done that…
“Come here,” he said roughly as he pulled her up and back into his lap. He caught her lips
and kissed her like his life depended on it. He could taste himself on her — something
musky but not entirely unpleasant — and it prompted his magic.
Always spill your seed inside of her.
He knew he had to end this or he would be hard again in a moment.
He wrenched his mouth off of her and stared at her eyes for a moment. They were that dark
caramel color that held so much promise for him. Then he looked back down at those
glorious tits of hers. He couldn’t help himself. He brushed a nipple lightly and sighed with
satisfaction as it pebbled under his thumb.
“Well?” she asked. “How was that progress report?”
A broad smile broke out on his face at that. “Excellent. Spectacular. You have truly
stunning tits my darling.”
“I lost a cup size in Azkaban,” she said. “They’ll get a little bigger.”
“Salazar save me,” he murmured. “That might actually kill me, Granger.”
She laughed lightly at that, and Draco pulled her in closer, placing his head on her chest to
breathe in her scent. He wanted to suffocate himself against the pillow of her breasts. He
nuzzled them as he considered it.
“You are rather like an enormous cat when you do that,” she commented.
“Take that back,” he retorted. “Crooks is a good boy to be sure, but I should be your best
boy. And these are the most gorgeous breasts I could possibly imagine.”
She reached down to lift his head so he was looking at her face. He complied with a slightly
forlorn sigh.
“You really don’t mind the curves then,” she said seriously. It wasn’t phrased as a question,
but Draco heard the note of nervousness in her voice.
Fuck Weasley for giving her body image issues.
Draco wasn’t entirely ignorant. He knew this was common for witches. But this witch — his
witch — was utterly perfect. He could happily crucio Weasley for whatever he said to her to
make her believe she was not.
Draco was determined to fix this.
“I am fucking obsessed with your curves,” he said. He ran his hands over her breasts and
down the soft swell of her stomach and hips before wrapping them around to grip her arse.
“Seriously, this is what I fantasize about. This and… even more.”
She blushed a little, but seemed pleased.
“So I should keep eating the steak.”
“Please Hermione, eat all the steak. Every last damn bite, I’m begging you. And don’t hide
your body from me…. I mean, obviously you shouldn’t do anything that makes you
uncomfortable, but all this… it will make me feel like the luckiest bloke alive if I get to see it
and touch it. I’m already hard again.”
She said nothing to this, but gave him a truly beautiful smile as she leaned down and kissed
him once more. Draco sighed into it, riding on the high of making his wife come, getting his
first blowjob, and assuaging her doubts so she would remain topless for him.
There was no question about it: this was the best Christmas ever.
*
Continue in part 2!
